




MONSTER BLOOD II 
Goosebumps - 18 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Evan Ross backed into the corner of the den as he stared at his dog Trigger. 

The tan cocker spaniel lowered his head and stared back at Evan with wet, 
brown eyes. The old dog’s tail began to wag excitedly. 

“Trigger—” Evan cried angrily. “Did you eat Monster Blood again?” 

The dog’s tail began wagging faster. Trigger let out a low bark that rumbled 
like thunder. 

Evan’s back pressed against the dark-paneled den wall. 

Trigger took a few heavy steps toward him, panting hard. His huge pink 
tongue, as big as a salami, hung out of his enormous mouth. 

“Did you?” Evan demanded. “Did you eat more Monster Blood?” 

The answer to Evan’s question was obvious. 

Trigger had been normal cocker spaniel size that morning. Now the dog 
stared down at Evan, as big as a pony. 

Trigger’s furry paws, the size of elephant hooves, thudded on the den 
carpet. His enormous tail pounded louder than a bass drum against the side of a 
leather couch. 

Evan covered his ears as Trigger let out an excited, high-pitched bark that 
shook the den walls. “Stay! Stay!” Evan shouted. 

The enormous dog panted hard, his tail wagging furiously. 

Oh, no! Evan thought in horror. He wants to play! 

“Sit!” Evan screamed. “Sit!” 

But Trigger didn’t know how to sit. For ten years —seventy dog years !— 
Evan had tried to teach Trigger to sit on command. 

But Trigger just didn’t get it. 

“Where did you find the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded. “We all saw it 
disappear into thin air. Gone. It was just gone. You know that stuff makes you 
grow. And grow and grow and grow. Where did you find it?” 

Trigger tilted his big head at an angle, as if trying to understand Evan’s 
words. Then, wagging his huge tail excitedly, he started to run to Evan. 

No! Evan thought. He’s going to jump on me! He’s going to jump! If he 
jumps, he’ll crush me! 



An enormous glob of drool escaped Trigger’s open mouth and hit the carpet 
with a loud smack. 

“Sit!” Evan cried, his voice choked with panic. “Sit, boy! Sit!” 

Trigger hesitated, staring down at Evan. To Evan’s horror, the dog was 
growing even bigger. Trigger was now as tall as a horse! 

Where did he find the container of Monster Blood? Evan wondered, his 
back pressed against the wall. Where? 

The dog’s brown eyes gaped at Evan like shimmering, dark pools. Trigger 
uttered another deafening bark that shook the whole house. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, squeezing his nose with two fingers. The dog’s breath 
rushed at him like a strong wind. And it smelled as sour as a dead mouse. 

“Back! Get back, Trigger!” Evan pleaded. 

But Trigger had never learned that command, either. 

Without warning, the giant dog leaped at Evan. 

“Down! Down!” Evan shrieked. 

Trigger’s mouth gaped open. The dog’s huge tongue licked the side of 
Evan’s face. The tongue felt scratchy and hot. Evan’s carrot-colored hair was 
matted down with sticky dog saliva. 

“No—please!” Evan screamed. “I’m only twelve! I’m too young to die!” 

He started to scream again. But Trigger’s big teeth clamped around his 
waist, cutting off his breath. 

“Trigger—put me down! Put me down!” Evan choked out. 

The dog’s wagging tail sent a lamp crashing to the floor. 

The teeth held Evan gently but firmly. He felt himself being lifted off the 
floor. 

“Put me down! Put me down!” 

Why wouldn’t the stupid dog listen? 

Evan thrashed his arms and legs frantically, trying to squirm free. But 
Trigger held on tightly. 

The dog’s enormous paws pounded on the carpet. He carried Evan through 
the hall and across the kitchen. Then he lowered his head and butted the kitchen 
screen door open. 

The door slammed hard behind them. Trigger began trotting over the grass. 

“Bad dog! Bad dog!” Evan cried. His voice came out in a tiny squeak. 

Had Trigger grown even bigger? 

Evan was at least three feet off the ground now! 



“Put me down! Down!” he cried. 

Evan watched the green grass of the back yard bounce beneath him. Trigger 
was panting as he walked. The panting sounds made Evan’s whole body vibrate. 
He realized his jeans and T-shirt were soaked from dog saliva. Trigger doesn’t 
mean to hurt me, Evan told himself. He’s just being playful. Thank goodness 
he’s such an old dog. His teeth aren’t very sharp. 

The dog stopped at the edge of the flower garden in the back of the yard. 
He lowered Evan nearly to the ground, but didn’t let go. 

His paws began to churn up the soft dirt. 

“Let me down!” Evan shrieked. “Trigger—listen to me!” 

Breathing hard, his hot, sour breath pouring over Evan, the big dog 
continued to dig. 

A wave of horror swept over Evan as he realized what Trigger was doing. 
“No!” Evan shrieked. “Don’t bury me, Trigger!” 

The dog dug faster, its front paws churning furiously. The soft dirt flew past 
Evan’s face. 

“I’m not a bone!” Evan cried frantically. “Trigger—I’m not a bone! Don’t 
bury me, Trigger! Please—don’t bury me!” 



2 


“Don’t bury me. Please don’t bury me!” Evan murmured. 

He heard laughter. 

He raised his head and glanced around—and realized that he wasn’t home 
in his back yard. He was sitting in his assigned seat in the third row near the 
window in Mr. Murphy’s science class. 

And Mr. Murphy was standing right at Evan’s side, his enormous, round 
body blocking the sunlight from the window. “Earth calling Evan! Earth calling 
Evan!” Mr. Murphy called, cupping his chubby pink hands over his mouth to 
make a megaphone. 

The kids all laughed. 

Evan could feel his face growing hot. “S-sorry,” he stammered. 

“You seem to have been somewhere in Daydream Land,” Mr. Murphy said, 
his tiny black eyes twinkling merrily. 

“Yes,” Evan replied solemnly. “I was dreaming about Monster Blood. I—I 
can’t stop thinking about it.” 

Ever since his frightening adventure the past summer with the green, sticky 
stuff, Evan had been dreaming and daydreaming about it. 

“Evan, please,” Mr. Murphy said softly. He shook his round, pink head and 
made a “tsk-tsk” sound. 

“Monster Blood is real!” Evan blurted out angrily. 

The kids laughed again. 

Mr. Murphy’s expression grew stern. His tiny eyes locked onto Evan’s. 
“Evan, I am a science teacher. You don’t expect a science teacher to believe that 
you found a can of sticky green gunk in a toy store that makes things grow and 
grow.” 

“Y-yes, I do,” Evan insisted. 

“Maybe a science-fiction teacher would believe it,” Mr. Murphy replied, 
grinning at his own joke. “Not a science teacher.” 

“Well, you’re dumb!” Evan cried. 

He didn’t mean to say it. He knew immediately that he had just made a 
major mistake. 

He heard gasps all around the big classroom. 



Mr. Murphy’s pink face darkened until it looked like a red balloon. But he 
didn’t lose his temper. He clasped his chubby hands over the big stomach of his 
green sportshirt, and Evan could see him silently counting to ten. 

“Evan, you’re a new student here, isn’t that right?” he asked finally. His 
face slowly returned to its normal pink color. 

“Yes,” Evan replied, his voice just above a whisper. “My family just moved 
to Atlanta this fall.” 

“Well, perhaps you’re not familiar with the way things work here. Perhaps 
at your old school the teachers liked it when you called them dumb. Perhaps you 
called your teachers ugly names all day long. Perhaps—” 

“No, sir,” Evan interrupted, lowering his head. “It just slipped out.” 

Laughter rang through the classroom. Mr. Murphy glared sternly at Evan, 
his face twisted in an angry frown. 

Give me a break, Evan thought unhappily. Glancing quickly around the 
room, Evan saw a sea of grinning faces. 

I think I’m in trouble again, Evan thought glumly. Why can’t I keep my big 
mouth shut? 

Mr. Murphy glanced up at the wall clock. “School is nearly over,” he said. 
“Why don’t you do us all a little favor, Evan, to make up for the time you made 
us waste today?” 

Uh oh, Evan thought darkly. Here it comes. 

“When the bell rings, go put your books away in your locker,” Mr. Murphy 
instructed. “Then come back here and clean Cuddles’ cage.” 

Evan groaned. 

His eyes darted to the hamster cage against the wall. Cuddles was 
scratching around in the wood shavings on the cage floor. 

Not the hamster! Evan thought unhappily. 

Evan hated Cuddles. And Mr. Murphy knew it. This was the third time Mr. 
Murphy had made Evan stay after school and clean out the gross, disgusting 
cage. 

“Perhaps while you clean the hamster cage,” Mr. Murphy said, returning to 
his desk, “you can think about how to do better in science class, Evan.” 

Evan jumped to his feet. “I won’t do it!” he cried. 

He heard shocked gasps all around him. 

“I hate Cuddles!” Evan screamed. “I hate that stupid, fat hamster!” 

As everyone stared in amazed horror, Evan ran over to the cage, pulled 



open the door, and grabbed Cuddles up in one hand. 

Then, with an easy, graceful motion, he flung the hamster across the room 
—and out the open window. 



3 


Evan knew he was having another daydream. 

He didn’t jump up screaming and throw the hamster out the window. 

He only thought about it. Everyone thinks about doing crazy, wild things 
once in a while. 

But Evan would never do anything that crazy. 

Instead, he said, “Okay, Mr. Murphy.” Then he sat quietly in his seat, 
staring out the window at the puffy white clouds in the bright blue sky. 

He could see his own reflection staring back at him in the glass. His curly, 
carrot-colored hair looked darker in the reflection. So did the freckles that dotted 
his cheeks. 

His expression was mournful. He hated being made fun of in front of the 
entire class. 

Why am I always getting myself into trouble? he wondered. Why can’t Mr. 
Murphy ever give me a break? Didn’t the teacher realize how hard it was to be 
the new kid in school? How am I supposed to make new friends if Murphy is 
always making me look like a total jerk in class? 

Bad enough that no one believed him about the Monster Blood. 

Evan had eagerly told the kids in his new school about it. How he had 
stayed with his great-aunt the past summer. How he and a girl he met named 
Andy had found the blue container of Monster Blood in a creepy, old toy store. 

And how the green, yucky Monster Blood had started to grow and grow. 
How it had bubbled out of its container, outgrown a bucket, outgrown a bath tub! 
And just kept growing and growing as if it were alive! 

And Evan had told kids how Trigger had eaten just a little of the Monster 
Blood—and had grown nearly as big as a house! 

It was such a frightening, amazing story. Evan was sure his new friends 
would find it really cool. 

But, instead, they just thought he was weird. 

No one believed him. They laughed at him and told him he had a sick 
imagination. 

Evan became known around his new school as the kid who made up stupid 
stories. 



If only I could prove to them that the story is true, Evan often thought sadly. 
If only I could show them the Monster Blood. 

But the mysterious green gunk had vanished from sight before Evan left his 
great-aunt’s house. Not a trace of it had been left. Not a trace. 

The bell rang. Everyone jumped up and headed for the door, talking and 
laughing. 

Evan knew that a lot of his classmates were laughing at him. Ignoring them, 
Evan picked up his backpack and started to the door. 

“Hurry back, Evan,” Mr. Murphy called from behind his desk. “Cuddles is 
waiting!” 

Evan growled under his breath and stepped out into the crowded hallway. If 
Murphy loves that stupid hamster so much, why doesn’t he ever clean out the 
cage? he wondered bitterly. 

A group of kids laughed loudly as Evan passed by. Were they laughing at 
him? Evan couldn’t tell. 

He started jogging to his locker—when something hit his leg just above the 
ankle. His feet flew out from under him, and he toppled face down onto the hard 
tile floor. 

“Hey—!” Evan cried angrily. 

He stared up at a big, tough-looking kid from his class named Conan 
Barber. All the kids called him Conan the Barbarian. For good reason. 

Conan was twelve, but he looked about twenty years older! He was taller 
and wider and stronger and meaner than any kid in the school. 

He wasn’t a bad-looking guy, Evan grudgingly admitted. He had wavy, 
blond hair, blue eyes, and a handsome face. He was very athletic-looking, and 
played all the sports at school. 

He was an okay guy, Evan thought wistfully. 

Except that he had one very bad habit. Conan loved to live up to his 
nickname. 

He loved being Conan the Barbarian. 

He loved strutting around, pounding kids who weren’t his size—which 
included everyone! 

Evan had not hit it off with Conan. 

He met Conan on the playground a few weeks after moving to Atlanta. 
Eager to make a good impression, Evan told him the whole Monster Blood story. 

Conan didn’t like the story. He stared back at Evan with his cold, blue eyes 



for a long, long time. Then his expression hardened, and he murmured through 
clenched teeth: “We don’t like wise guys down here in Atlanta.” 

He gave Evan a pretty good pounding that day. 

Evan had tried to stay away from Conan ever since. But it wasn’t easy. 

Now he gazed up at Conan from his position on the floor. “Hey—why’d 
you trip me?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

Conan grinned down at him and shrugged. “It was an accident.” 

Evan tried to decide whether it was safer to stand up or to stay down on the 
floor. If I stand up, he’ll punch me, he thought. If I stay down here, he’ll step on 
me. 

Tough choice. 

He didn’t get to make it. Conan reached down and, with one hand, pulled 
Evan to his feet. 

“Give me a break, Conan!” Evan pleaded. “Why can’t you leave me 
alone?” 

Conan shrugged again. It was one of his favorite replies. His blue eyes 
twinkled merrily. “You’re right, Evan,” he said, his grin fading. “I shouldn’t have 
tripped you.” 

“Yeah,” Evan agreed, straightening his T-shirt. 

“So you can pay me back,” Conan offered. 

“Huh?” Evan gaped at him. 

Conan stuck out his massive chest. “Go ahead. Hit me in the stomach. I’ll 
let you.” 

“Whoa. No way,” Evan replied, trying to back up. He stumbled into a group 
of kids. 

“Go ahead,” Conan urged, following after him. “Hit me in the stomach. As 
hard as you can. It’s only fair.” 

Evan studied his expression. “You really mean it?” 

Conan nodded, tight-lipped. He stuck out his chest. “As hard as you can. 
Go ahead. I won’t hit back. I promise.” 

Evan hesitated. Should he go ahead and do it? 

I may never get a chance like this again, he thought. 

A lot of kids were watching, Evan realized. 

If I hit him really hard, if I hurt him, if I make him cry out—then maybe 
kids around here will have a little respect for me. 

I’ll be Evan the Giant Killer. The guy who pounded Conan the Barbarian. 



He balled his hand into a tight fist and raised it. 

“Is that your fist?” Conan cried, laughing. 

Evan nodded. 

“Oooh—this is going to hurt!” Conan cried sarcastically. He made his knees 
tremble. 

Everyone laughed. 

I may surprise him, Evan thought angrily. 

“Go ahead. As hard as you can,” Conan urged. He sucked in a deep breath 
and held it. 

Evan pulled his arm back and swung his fist as hard as he could. 

The fist made a solid thud as it hit Conan’s stomach. 

It felt like hitting a concrete wall. 

Evan’s hand throbbed with pain. 

“Hey—!” a man’s voice called angrily. 

Startled, Evan spun around—to see Mr. Murphy glaring at him. 

“No fighting!” Mr. Murphy yelled at Evan. 

The teacher came bouncing up to them and stepped between the two boys. 
Huffing for breath, he turned to Conan. “Why did Evan hit you?” he demanded. 



4 


Conan shrugged. His blue eyes went wide and innocent. “I don’t know, Mr. 
Murphy,” he replied in a tiny, forlorn voice. “Evan just walked up and hit me as 
hard as he could.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach and uttered a short whimper. “Ow. He really hurt 

me.” 

Mr. Murphy narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. His chubby face turned 
bright red again. “Evan, I saw the whole thing. I really don’t understand you,” he 
said softly. 

“But Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

The teacher raised a hand to silence him. “If you were angry about what 
happened in class,” Mr. Murphy said, “you shouldn’t take it out on other kids.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach tenderly. “I hope Evan didn’t break anything!” 
he murmured. 

“Do you want to see the nurse?” Mr. Murphy asked. 

Conan shook his head. Evan could see he was having trouble keeping a 
straight face. “I’ll be okay,” he said, and staggered away. 

What a phony! Evan thought bitterly. 

Did Conan know the whole time that Murphy was standing there? Probably. 

“Go take care of Cuddles,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, frowning. “And try to 
shape up, Evan. I’m going to be watching you.” 

Evan muttered a reply and trudged back into the classroom. Sunlight 
streamed in through the wall of windows. A strong breeze made the window 
shade flap over the open window near the teacher’s desk. 

Feeling angry and upset, his stomach churning, Evan made his way through 
the empty room to the hamster cage. Cuddles wrinkled his nose in greeting. The 
hamster knew the routine by now. 

Evan gazed into the metal cage at the brown-and-white creature. Why do 
people think hamsters are cute? he wondered. 

Because they wrinkle their noses? Because they run around and around on 
wheels like total jerks? Because of their cute little buck teeth? 

Cuddles stared up at him with his little black eyes. 

He has Mr. Murphy’s eyes, Evan thought, chuckling to himself. Maybe 



that’s why Murphy likes him so much. 

“Okay, okay. So you’re kind of cute,” Evan told the hamster. “But I know 
your secret. You’re just a big fat rat in disguise!” 

Cuddles wrinkled his nose again in reply. 

With a loud sigh, Evan went to work. Holding his breath because he hated 
the smell, he pulled out the bottom tray. 

“You’re a messy little guy,” he told the hamster. “When are you going to 
learn to clean up your own room?” 

Still holding his breath, he dumped out the old newspaper shavings and 
replaced them with fresh shavings from the box in the supply closet. 

He returned the bottom tray to its place as Cuddles watched with great 
interest. Then he poured fresh water into the water bottle. 

“How about some sunflower seeds?” Evan asked. He began to feel a little 
more cheerful, knowing his job was almost finished. 

He removed the seed cup from the cage and made his way across the room 
to the supply closet to get fresh sunflower seeds. 

“Okay, Cuddles,” he called, “these look yummy!” 

He started to carry the seeds back to the cage. Halfway across the room, 
Evan stopped and uttered a startled gasp. 

The cage door hung wide open. 

The hamster was gone. 



5 


A choking sound escaped Evan’s lips as he stared at the empty cage. 

His eyes darted frantically around the room. “Cuddles? Cuddles?” he called 
in a frightened voice. 

Why am I yelling? he asked himself, spinning around in a total panic. The 
dumb hamster doesn’t know its name! 

He heard footsteps out in the hall. 

Mr. Murphy? 

No, please—no! Evan pleaded silently. 

Don’t let it be Mr. Murphy. Don’t let him return until I have Cuddles safely 
back in his cage. 

Cuddles was Mr. Murphy’s most precious possession. He had told this to 
the class time and again. 

Evan knew that if anything happened to Cuddles, Mr. Murphy would be on 
Evan’s case for the rest of the year. No—for the rest of his life! 

Evan froze in the center of the room, listening hard. 

The footsteps passed by the room. 

Evan started breathing again. 

“Cuddles? Where are you, Cuddles?” he called in a trembling voice. “I have 
some delicious sunflower seeds for you.” 

He spotted the furry, brown-and-white creature on the chalk tray under the 
front chalkboard. 

“There you are! I see you!” Evan whispered, tiptoeing toward it. 

Cuddles was busily chewing on something. A small piece of white chalk. 

Evan tiptoed closer. “I have seeds for you, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Much 
tastier than chalk.” 

Cuddles held the stick of chalk in his front paws, turning it as he chewed. 

Evan crept closer. Closer. 

“Look. Seeds.” He held the plastic seed cup toward the hamster. 

Cuddles didn’t look up. 

Evan crept up closer. Closer. 

Close enough to dive forward— 



—and miss! 

The hamster dropped the chalk and scampered down the chalk tray. 

Evan made another frantic grab—and came up with nothing but air. 

Letting out a frustrated groan, Evan saw the hamster dive to the floor and 
scamper behind Mr. Murphy’s desk. The hamster’s feet skidded and slid on the 
linoleum floor, its toenails clicking loudly. 

“You can’t get away! You’re too fat!” Evan cried. He dropped to his knees 
and peered under the desk. 

He could see Cuddles staring back at him from the darkness. The animal 
was breathing rapidly, its sides swelling with each breath. 

“Don’t be scared,” Evan whispered soothingly. “I’m going to put you back 
in your nice, safe cage.” 

He crawled quickly to the desk. 

The hamster stared back at him, breathing hard. It didn’t move—until Evan 
reached for him. Then Cuddles scampered away, his tiny paws sliding on the 
floor. 

Evan jumped angrily to his feet. “Cuddles—what’s your problem?” he 
demanded loudly. “This isn’t a stupid game!” 

It wasn’t a game at all, Evan knew. 

If he didn’t get the hamster back in the cage, Mr. Murphy would flunk him 
for sure. Or suspend him from school. Or get his family kicked out of Atlanta! 

Calm down, Evan urged himself. Don’t panic. 

He took a deep breath and held it. 

Then he saw the hamster on the window ledge just inside the open window. 

Okay, Evan—go ahead and panic! he told himself. 

This was definitely panic time. 

He tried to call to the hamster. But his voice came out a choked whisper. 

Swallowing hard, Evan edged slowly toward the window ledge. 

“Come here, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Please, Cuddles—come here.” 

Closer, closer. 

Almost close enough to reach the hamster. 

Almost close enough. 

“Don’t move, Cuddles. Don’t move.” 

He reached out his hand slowly. Slowly. 

Cuddles glanced back at him with his soft black eyes. 

Then the hamster jumped out the window. 



6 


Evan hung back for only a second. 

Then he jumped out the window after the hamster. 

Luckily, the science classroom was on the ground floor. Evan landed face 
down in a low evergreen hedge. Struggling and squirming, it took him a while to 
climb to his feet. 

He took several steps over the grass, then turned and stared back along the 
bottom of the long hedge. “Cuddles—are you under there?” 

Evan squatted down to get a better view. The hedge stretched the entire 
length of the school building. Cuddles could hide under there forever. 

And if I don’t find him, Evan told himself bitterly, I’d better hide under 
there forever, too! 

To the right, Evan could hear voices from the playground. Happy, shouting 
voices. Carefree voices. 

Still squatting, he turned toward the happy voices—and saw a fat brown 
ball wobbling over the grass toward the playground. 

No. Not a ball. “Cuddles!” 

That fat hamster isn’t getting away this time! Evan decided, jumping up and 
starting to chase after the creature. I’ll catch him if I have to sit on him! 

A picture flashed into Evan’s mind of Cuddles, flat as a pancake after Evan 
had sat upon him. A little, round, furry hamster rug. 

Despite his panic, the thought of Cuddles as a rug brought a smile to Evan’s 
perspiring face. 

As he ran, he kept his eyes on Cuddles. The hamster was wobbling rapidly 
over the grass toward the playground. 

“Oh, no!” Evan cried out in horror as Cuddles darted in front of two girls 
speeding across the grass on bikes. 

Laughing together, they didn’t even see the hamster. 

Cuddles is about to be road kill! Evan thought, shrinking back. He shut his 
eyes and waited for the squish. 

But the bikes rolled smoothly on. And when they had passed, Evan spotted 
Cuddles continuing his journey to the playground unharmed. 

“Cuddles—come back here!” he shouted furiously. 



The hamster appeared to speed up. He tumbled onto the baseball diamond, 
all four paws scurrying over the dirt of the third-base line. 

Several kids stopped their game to stare. 

“Stop him! Grab the hamster!” Evan shouted desperately. 

But the kids only laughed. 

“Know how to catch him?” a joker named Robbie Greene called to Evan. 
“Make a sound like a sunflower seed!” 

“That’s an old joke!” a girl called to Robbie. 

“Thanks for your help!” Evan shouted sarcastically. He ran over the 
pitching mound and had crossed second base when he realized he had lost sight 
of Cuddles. 

He stopped and spun around, his heart thudding wildly in his chest. He 
searched the grass of the infield. “Where—where is he?” he stammered. “Do you 
see him?” 

But the kids had returned to their softball game. 

I can’t lose him now! Evan told himself, choked with panic. I can’t! 

Sweat poured down Evan’s forehead. He mopped it with one hand, 
brushing back his curly, red hair. His T-shirt clung wetly to his back. His mouth 
felt dry as cotton. 

Jogging into the outfield, he searched the grass. 

“Cuddles?” 

No sign of him. 

A round, brownish lump in the grass turned out to be someone’s baseball 
glove. 

“Cuddles?” 

A kickball game was underway on the opposite diamond. Kids were 
shouting and cheering. Evan saw Bree Douglas, a girl from his class, slide hard 
into second base just before the ball. 

“Has—has anyone seen Cuddles?” Evan gasped, trotting onto the diamond. 

Kids turned to gawk at him. 

“Out here?” Bree called, brushing off the knees of her jeans. “Evan, did you 
take the hamster out for a walk?” 

Everyone laughed. Scornful laughter. 

“He—he got away,” Evan replied, panting. 

“Is this what you’re looking for?” a familiar voice called. 

Evan turned to see Conan Barber, a pleased smile on his handsome face, his 



blue eyes gleaming. 

Gripping it by its furry back, Conan held the hamster up in one hand. 
Cuddles’ four legs scurried in midair. 

“You—you caught him!” Evan cried gratefully. He let out a long sigh of 
relief. “He jumped out the window.” 

Evan reached out both hands for the hamster, but Conan jerked Cuddles out 
of his reach. “Prove it’s yours,” Conan said, grinning. 

“Huh?” 

“Can you identify it?” Conan demanded, his eyes burning into Evan’s, 
challenging Evan. “Prove this hamster is yours.” 

Evan swallowed hard and glanced around. 

Kids from the kickball game were huddling near. They were all grinning, 
delighted with Conan’s mean joke. 

Evan sighed wearily and reached again for the hamster. 

But Conan was at least a foot taller than Evan. He lifted the hamster high 
above Evan’s head, out of Evan’s reach. 

“Prove it’s yours,” he repeated, flashing the others a grin. 

“Give me a break, Conan,” Evan pleaded. “I’ve been chasing this stupid 
hamster for hours. I just want to get him back in his cage before Mr. Murphy—” 

“Do you have a license for him?” Conan demanded, still holding the 
squirming hamster above Evan’s head. “Show me the license.” 

Evan jumped and stretched both hands up, trying to grab Cuddles away. 

But Conan was too fast for him. He dodged away. Evan grabbed air. 

Some kids laughed. 

“Give him the hamster, Conan,” Bree called. She hadn’t moved from 
second base. 

Conan’s cold blue eyes sparkled excitedly. “I’ll tell you how you can get the 
hamster back,” he told Evan. 

“Huh?” Evan glared at him. He was getting really tired of Conan’s game. 

“Here’s how to get old Cuddles back,” Conan continued, holding the 
hamster tightly against his chest in one hand and petting its back with the other. 
“Sing a song for it.” 

“Hey—no way!” Evan snapped. “Give it to me, Conan!” 

Evan could feel his face growing even hotter. His knees started to tremble. 
He hoped no one could see it. 

“Sing ‘Row, Row, Row Your Boat’, and I’ll give you Cuddles. Promise,” 



Conan said, smirking. 

Some kids laughed. They moved closer, eager to see what Evan would do. 

Evan shook his head. “No way.” 

“Come on,” Conan urged softly, stroking the hamster’s brown fur. “'Row, 
Row, Row Your Boat.’ Just a few choruses. You know how it goes, don’t you?” 

More cruel laughter from the others. 

Conan’s grin grew wider. “Come on, Evan. You like to sing, don’t you?” 

“No, I hate singing,” Evan muttered, his eyes on Cuddles. 

“Hey, don’t be modest,” Conan insisted. “I’ll bet you’re a great singer. Are 
you a soprano or an alto?” 

Loud laughter. 

Evan’s hands tightened into hard fists at his sides. He wanted to punch 
Conan, and punch him and punch him. He wanted to wipe the grin off Conan’s 
handsome face with his fists. 

But he remembered what it had felt like to punch Conan. It had felt like 
hitting the side of a truck. 

He took a deep breath. “If I sing the stupid song, will you really give me 
back the hamster?” 

Conan didn’t reply. 

Evan suddenly realized that Conan wasn’t looking at him anymore. No one 
was. They had all raised their eyes over Evan’s shoulder. 

Confused, Evan spun around—to face Mr. Murphy. 

“What is going on here?” the teacher demanded, his tiny black eyes moving 
from Evan to Conan, then back to Evan. 

Before Evan could reply, Conan held up the hamster. “Here’s Cuddles, Mr. 
Murphy,” Conan said. “Evan let him get away. But I rescued Cuddles just as he 
was going to get run over.” 

Mr. Murphy let out a horrified gasp. “Run over?” he cried. “Cuddles? Run 
over?” 

The teacher reached out his chubby pink hands and took the hamster from 
Conan. He held the hamster against his bulging shirt and petted it, making 
soothing sounds to it. 

“Thank you, Conan,” Mr. Murphy said after calming Cuddles. He glared at 
Evan. “I’m very disappointed in you, Evan.” 

Evan started to defend himself. But Mr. Murphy raised a hand to silence 
him. “We’ll talk about it tomorrow. Right now I must get poor Cuddles back into 



his cage.” 

Evan slumped to the ground. He watched Mr. Murphy carry the hamster 
back to the school building. Mr. Murphy waddles just like the hamster, Evan 
realized. 

Normally, that thought would have cheered him up. 

But Evan was far too unhappy to be cheered up by anything. 

Conan had embarrassed him in front of all the others. And the big, grinning 
hulk had managed to get Evan in trouble with Mr. Murphy twice in one 
afternoon! 

The kickball game had started up again. Evan climbed slowly to his feet 
and began trudging to the school building to get his backpack. 

He couldn’t decide who he hated more—Cuddles or Conan. 

He had a sudden picture of Cuddles stuffed inside a muffin tin, being baked 
in an oven. 

Even that lovely thought didn’t cheer Evan up. 

He pulled his backpack out of the locker and slung it over his shoulder. 
Then he slammed the locker shut, the sound clanging down the empty hallway. 

He pushed open the front door and headed for home, walking slowly, lost in 
his unhappy thoughts. 

What a horrible day, he told himself. At least nothing worse could happen 
to me today. 

He had just crossed the street and was making his way on the sidewalk in 
front of a tall hedge—when someone leaped out at him, grabbed his shoulders 
hard from behind, and pulled him roughly to the ground. 

Evan let out a frightened cry and gazed into his attacker’s face. “You!” he 
cried. 



7 


“Here’s a little advice, Evan,” Andy said, grinning down at him. “Don’t go out 
for the wrestling team.” 

“Andy!” Evan cried, staring up at her in surprise. “What are you doing 
here?” 

She reached out both hands and helped tug him to his feet. Then she tossed 
back her short, brown hair with a flick of her head. Her brown eyes flashed 
excitedly. 

“Didn’t you read any of my letters?” she demanded. 

Evan had met Andy the past summer, when he’d stayed with his great-aunt 
for a few weeks. He and Andy had become good friends. 

She was with him when he bought the container of Monster Blood. She 
shared the whole frightening Monster Blood adventure with him. 

Evan liked Andy because she was funny, and fearless, and kind of crazy. He 
never could predict what she would do next! 

She didn’t even dress like other girls Evan knew. Andy loved bright colors. 
Right now she was wearing a sleeveless magenta T-shirt over bright yellow 
shorts, which matched her yellow sneakers. 

“I told you in my last letter that my parents were sent overseas for a year,” 
Andy said, giving Evan a playful shove. “I told you they were sending me to 
Atlanta to live with my aunt and uncle. I told you I’d be living just three blocks 
away from you!” 

“I know. I know,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “I just didn’t expect to see 
you jump out of the hedge at me.” 

“Why not?” Andy demanded, her dark eyes exploring his. 

Evan didn’t know how to answer that question. 

“Glad to see me?” Andy asked. 

“No,” he joked. 

She pulled up a thick blade of grass and stuck it in the corner of her mouth. 
They began walking toward Evan’s house. 

“I’m starting at your school on Monday,” she told him, chewing on the 
blade of grass. 

“Thrills and chills,” he replied, snickering. 



She shoved him off the sidewalk. “I thought people were supposed to be 
polite in the South.” 

“I’m new here,” Evan replied. 

“How’s Trigger?” she asked, kicking a pebble across the sidewalk. 

“Good,” Evan told her. 

“Like to talk a lot?” she asked sarcastically. 

“I’m in a bad mood,” he confessed. “It hasn’t been the greatest day.” 

“It couldn’t be as bad as the day the Monster Blood went berserk!” Andy 
exclaimed. 

Evan groaned. “Don’t mention Monster Blood to me. Please!” 

She studied him. Her expression turned serious. “What’s wrong, Evan? You 
look really upset,” she said. “Don’t you like it here?” 

He shook his head. “Not much.” 

As they walked, he told her about all the trouble he was having in his new 
school. He told her about Mr. Murphy and Cuddles, and how the teacher was 
always on his case. 

And he told her about Conan the Barbarian, and how Conan was always 
picking on him, always getting him into trouble, always playing tricks on him 
and making him look bad. 

“And no one will believe me about the Monster Blood,” Evan added. 

They were standing at the bottom of his driveway. They glanced up at 
Evan’s new house, a two-story red brick house with a sloping red tile roof. The 
late afternoon sun dipped behind a large puff of cloud, and a broad shadow 
rolled across the lawn. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. The blade of grass fell out. “You told kids 
about the Monster Blood?” she asked in surprise. 

Evan nodded. “Yeah, why not? It’s a cool story, isn’t it?” 

“And you expected kids to believe you?” Andy cried, slapping her 
forehead. “Didn’t they just think you were weird?” 

“Yeah,” Evan replied bitterly. “They all think I’m weird.” 

Andy laughed. “Well, you are weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch, Annnndrea!” Evan muttered. He knew she hated to be 
called by her real name. 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she replied sharply. She raised a fist. “I’ll pound 
you.” 

“Annnnnndrea,” he repeated. He ducked away as she swung her fist. “You 



punch like a girl!” he exclaimed. 

“You’ll bleed like a boy!” she threatened, laughing. 

He stopped. He suddenly had an idea. “Hey—you can tell everyone I’m not 
weird!” 

“Huh? Why would I do that?” Andy demanded. 

“No. Really,” Evan said excitedly. “You can tell everyone at school that the 
Monster Blood was real. That you were there. That you saw it.” 

Andy’s expression suddenly changed. Her dark eyes lit up, and a sly grin 
crossed her face. “I can do better than that,” she said mysteriously. 

Evan grabbed her shoulder. “Huh? What do you mean? What do you mean 
you can do better?” 

“You’ll see,” she replied, teasing him. “I brought something with me.” 

“What? What is it? What do you mean?” Evan demanded. 

“Meet me tomorrow after school,” she told him. “At that little park over 
there.” 

She pointed to the next block. A narrow park, only a few blocks long, ran 
along the bank of a shallow creek. 

“But what is it?” Evan cried. 

She laughed. “I love torturing you!” she declared. “But it’s a little too easy.” 

Then she turned and headed down the street, running at full speed. 

“Andy—wait!” Evan called. “What have you got? What did you bring?” 

She didn’t even turn around. 



8 


Evan dreamed about Monster Blood that night. 

He dreamed about it nearly every night. 

Tonight he dreamed that his dad had eaten a glob of it. Now Mr. Ross 
wanted to go to his office, but he had grown too big to fit through the door. 

“You’re in trouble now, Evan!” Mr. Ross bellowed, making the whole 
house shake. “Big trouble!” 

Big trouble. 

The words stuck in Evan’s mind as he sat up in bed and tried to shake away 
the dream. 

The curtains flapped silently in front of his open bedroom window. Pale 
yellow stars dotted the charcoal sky. Staring hard, Evan could see the Big 
Dipper. Or was it the Little Dipper? He never could remember. 

Shutting his eyes and settling back on the pillow, Evan thought about Andy. 
He was glad she had come to stay in Atlanta for a while. She could be a real 
pain. But she was also a lot of fun. 

What did she want to show him in the park after school? 

Probably nothing, Evan guessed. It was probably just a dumb joke. Andy 
loved dumb jokes. 

How can I get her to tell the kids at school about Monster Blood? he 
wondered. How can I get Andy to tell everyone that I didn’t make it up, that it’s 
true? 

He was still thinking about this problem as he fell back into a restless sleep. 

The next day at school wasn’t much better than the last. 

Somehow during free reading period, Conan had crept under the table and 
tied Evan’s sneaker laces together. When Evan got up to go to the water 
fountain, he fell flat on his face. He scraped a knee, but no one cared. The kids 
laughed for hours. 

“Evan’s mommy tied his shoes funny this morning!” Conan told everyone. 
And they laughed even harder. 

In science class, Mr. Murphy called Evan over to the hamster cage. “Look 
at poor Cuddles,” the teacher said, shaking his round head solemnly. 



Evan peered down into the metal cage. Cuddles was curled up in a corner 
under a pile of shavings. The hamster was trembling and breathing in short 
gasps. 

“Poor Cuddles has been like that ever since yesterday,” Mr. Murphy told 
Evan with an accusing frown. “Cuddles is sick because of your carelessness.” 

“I—I’m sorry,” Evan stammered. He stared hard at the quivering hamster. 
You’re faking—aren’t you, Cuddles? Evan thought. You’re faking just to get me 
in trouble! 

The hamster twitched and stared up at him with mournful, black eyes. 

When Evan sat back down in his seat, he felt cold water seep through the 
back of his jeans. With a startled cry, he jumped right back up. Someone— 
probably Conan—had poured a cup of water on his chair. 

That had the class laughing for at least ten minutes. They stopped only 
when Mr. Murphy threatened to keep everyone after school. 

“Sit down, Evan,” the teacher ordered. 

“But, Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

“Sit down—now!” Mr. Murphy insisted. 

Evan dropped back down into the wet chair. What choice did he have? 

Andy was waiting for Evan by the trickling brown creek that rolled through the 
tiny park. The old sassafras trees bent and whispered in a hot breeze. A tall 
Georgia pine leaned over the water as if trying to reach across the creek. 

Andy was wearing a bright blue T-shirt over lime-green short-shorts. She 
had been staring at her reflection in the muddy creek water. She spun around 
smiling as Evan called to her. 

“Hey, how’s it going?” he called. He stepped up beside her and dropped his 
backpack to the ground. 

“How was school?” Andy asked. 

“Same as always,” Evan replied, sighing. Then his expression brightened. 
“What did you bring?” he asked eagerly. 

“You’ll see.” She clasped a hand over his eyes. “Shut your eyes, Evan. And 
don’t open them until I say.” 

He obediently shut his eyes. But when she pulled her hand away, he opened 
them a tiny crack, just enough to see. He watched her go behind the pine tree and 
pick up a small brown paper bag. 

She carried the bag over to him. “You’re peeking—aren’t you?” she 



accused him. 

“Maybe,” he confessed, grinning. 

She punched him playfully in the stomach. He cried out and his eyes shot 
open. “What’s in the bag?” 

Grinning, Andy handed the bag to him. 

He pulled it open, peered inside—and his mouth dropped open in shock. 

The familiar blue can, about the size of a can of soup. 

“Andy—you—you—” Evan stammered, still staring wide-eyed into the 

bag. 

He reached in and pulled out the plastic can. 

He read the faded label: MONSTER BLOOD. 

Then he read the words in tiny type below it: SURPRISING MIRACLE 
SUBSTANCE. 

“I saved it,” Andy said, beaming proudly. 

Evan couldn’t get over his shock. “You brought Monster Blood! I don’t 
believe it! You brought Monster Blood!” 

“No.” She shook her head. “It’s empty, Evan. The can is empty.” 

His face fell. He sighed in total disappointment. 

“But you can show the can to everyone,” Andy insisted. “That will prove 
you didn’t make it up. It will prove that Monster Blood really exists.” 

Evan sighed again. “What good is an empty can?” he groaned. 

He pulled off the top, peered inside—and screamed. 



9 


With a trembling hand, Evan tilted the can so that Andy could see inside. 

“Oh, no!” she shrieked, pulling her hands to her cheeks. 

The can was half full. 

Inside, a green glob of gooey Monster Blood shimmered in the sunlight like 
lime jell-o. 

“But it was empty!” Andy protested, staring into the can. “I know it was!” 

Evan shook the can. The green glob inside quivered. 

“There must have been a tiny speck in there,” Evan guessed. “Down at the 
bottom of the can. And now it’s growing and growing again.” 

“Great!” Andy declared. She slapped him on the back so hard, he nearly 
dropped the blue can. 

“Great? What’s so great?” he demanded shakily. 

“Now you can show this to the kids at your school,” she replied. “Now 
they’ll have to believe you.” 

“I guess,” Evan replied in a low voice. 

“Oh! I have a better idea!” she exclaimed, her dark eyes lighting up 
mischievously. 

“Uh-oh,” Evan moaned. 

“Slip a little glob of it in that guy Conan’s lunch tomorrow. When he starts 
to grow as big as a hippo, everyone will see that the Monster Blood is real.” 

“No way!” Evan cried. He cupped the blue can in both hands, as if 
protecting it from Andy. “Conan is already big enough!” he told her, taking a 
step back. “I don’t want him to grow another inch. Do you know what he could 
do to me if he became a giant?” 

Andy laughed and shrugged. “It was just an idea.” 

“A bad idea,” Evan said sharply. “A really bad idea.” 

“You’re no fun,” she teased. She leaped forward and tried to wrestle the can 
from his hands. 

He spun around, turning his back to her, and hunched over, protecting the 

can. 

“Give it to me!” she cried, laughing. She started tickling his sides. “Give it! 
Give it!” 



“No!” he protested, breaking free. He ran to the safety of a tall evergreen 
shrub. 

“It’s mine!” Andy declared, coming after him, hands at her waist. “If you’re 
not going to use it, hand it back.” 

Evan stood his ground. His expression turned serious. “Andy, don’t you 
remember?” he demanded shrilly. “Don’t you remember how scary this stuff 
was? Don’t you remember how dangerous it was? All the trouble it caused?” 

“So?” she replied, her eyes on the blue can. 

“We have to get rid of it,” Evan told her firmly. “We can’t let it out of the 
can. It will grow and grow and never stop.” 

“But I thought you wanted to show it to the kids to prove that it’s real.” 

“No,” Evan interrupted. “I changed my mind. This stuff is too dangerous. 
We have to get rid of it.” He locked his eyes on hers, his features tight with fear. 
“Andy, I’ve had nightmares every night because of this stuff. I don’t want any 
new nightmares.” 

“Okay, okay,” she muttered. She kicked at an upraised tree root. Then she 
handed him the brown paper bag. 

Evan clicked the top back on the can of Monster Blood. Then he shoved the 
can into the bag. “Now how do we get rid of it?” he wondered out loud. 

“I know. Dump it in the creek,” Andy suggested. 

Evan shook his head. “No good. What if it gets out and pollutes the creek?” 

“This creek is already polluted!” Andy exclaimed. “It’s just a big mud 
puddle!” 

“It isn’t deep enough,” Evan insisted. “Someone will find the can and pull it 
out. We can’t take a chance.” 

“Then how do we get rid of it?” Andy asked, twisting her face in 
concentration. “Hmmmm. We could eat it ourselves. That would get rid of it!” 

“Very funny,” Evan muttered, rolling his eyes. 

“Just trying to be helpful,” Andy said. 

“You’re about as helpful as a toothache!” Evan shot back. 

“Ha-ha. Remind me to laugh at that sometime,” she replied, sticking her 
tongue out at him. 

“How can we get rid of it?” Evan repeated, gripping the bag in both hands. 
“How?” 

“I know!” a boy’s voice called, startling them both. 

Conan Barber stepped out from behind a tall shrub. 



“You can give it to me!” he declared. He reached out a big, powerful- 
looking hand to grab the bag. 



10 


Evan swung the paper bag behind his back. 

Conan lumbered toward them over the tall grass. His eyes were narrowed 
menacingly at Evan. 

How long has he been hiding there? Evan wondered. Did he hear us talk 
about the Monster Blood? Is that why he wants the bag? 

“Hi, I’m Andy,” Andy chirped brightly. She stepped in between the two 
boys and flashed Conan a smile. 

“Andy is a boy’s name,” Conan said, making a disgusted face. He turned 
his hard stare on her, challenging her. 

“And what kind of a name is Conan?” Andy shot back, returning his stare. 

“You know me?” Conan asked, sounding surprised. 

“You’re famous,” Andy replied dryly. 

Conan suddenly remembered Evan. He stuck out his big paw. “I’ll take the 
bag now.” 

“Why should I give it to you?” Evan demanded, trying to keep his voice 
calm and steady. 

“Because it’s mine,” Conan lied. “I dropped it here.” 

“You dropped an empty bag here?” Evan asked. 

Conan swatted a fly from his blond hair. “It isn’t empty. I saw you put 
something in it. Hand it over. Now.” 

“Well... okay.” Evan handed him the paper bag. Conan eagerly reached 
inside. 

His hand came out empty. 

He peered inside the bag. Empty. 

He stared hard at Andy, then at Evan. 

“I told you it was empty,” Evan said. 

“Guess I made a mistake,” Conan muttered. “Hey, no hard feelings. Shake.” 
Conan reached out his big right hand to Evan. 

Evan reluctantly stuck out his hand. 

Conan slid his hand over Evan’s and began to tighten his grip. Harder. 
Harder. 



Evan’s fingers cracked so loudly, they sounded like a tree falling! 

Conan squeezed Evan’s hand harder and harder until Evan screamed in 
pain. When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a slab of raw hamburger. 

“Nice handshake you got there!” Conan exclaimed, grinning. 

He snapped his finger against Andy’s nose, then headed off quickly toward 
the street, taking long strides, laughing to himself. 

“Great guy,” Andy muttered, rubbing her nose. 

Evan blew on his hand, as if trying to put out a fire. “Maybe I can learn to 
be left-handed,” he murmured. 

“Hey—where’s the Monster Blood?” Andy demanded. 

“I—I dropped it,” Evan replied, still examining his hand. 

“Huh?” She kicked away a clump of weeds and stepped over to him. 

“I thought I could shove the can into my back jeans pocket while Conan 
was talking to you,” Evan explained. “But it slipped out of my hand. I dropped 
it.” 

He turned, bent over, and picked it up from the tall grass. “Good thing it 
didn’t roll or anything. Conan would have seen it.” 

“He wouldn’t know what to do with it if he had it,” Andy said. 

“What are we going to do with it?” Evan demanded. “It’s already caused us 
trouble. We’ve got to hide it, or throw it away, or—or—” 

He pulled open the lid. “Oh, wow! Look!” He held the can up to Andy’s 
face. The green goo had grown nearly to the top of the can. “It’s starting to grow 
a lot faster. I guess because we exposed it to the air.” 

Evan slammed the lid on tight. 

“Let’s bury it,” Andy suggested. “Here. Right under this tree. We’ll dig a 
deep hole and bury it.” 

Evan liked the idea. It was simple and quick. 

They squatted down and began digging with their hands. The dirt beneath 
the tree was soft. The hole grew deep before they had worked up a sweat. 

Evan dropped the blue can of Monster Blood into the hole. Then they 
quickly covered it with dirt, smoothing it out until it was impossible to tell a hole 
had been dug. 

“This was a good plan,” Andy said, climbing to her feet, playfully wiping 
the dirt off her hands on the back of Evan’s T-shirt. “If we need it, we’ll know 
where it is.” 

Evan’s red hair was matted to his forehead with sweat. He had a wide smear 



of dirt across his freckled forehead. “Huh? Why would we need it?” he 
demanded. 

Andy shrugged. “You never know.” 

“We won’t need it,” Evan told her firmly. “We won’t.” 

He was very, very wrong. 



11 


“Hey, Dad, what’s up?” Evan stepped into the garage. 

Mr. Ross stopped hammering and turned around. He smiled at Evan. “Want 
to see my newest work?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. Every weekend, his father spent hour after hour 
in his garage workshop, banging away on large sheets of metal, making what he 
called his “works”. 

He chiseled and hammered and sawed, and put a lot of effort into his 
sculptures. But to Evan, they all looked like banged-up sheets of metal when 
they were finished. 

Mr. Ross took a few steps back to admire his current project. He lowered 
his heavy mallet in one hand and pointed with the chisel he held in his other 
hand. “I used brass for this one,” he told Evan. “I call it ‘Autumn Leaf’.” 

Evan studied it thoughtfully. “It looks like a leaf,” he lied. It looks like Dad 
mined a perfectly good piece of brass, he thought, trying to keep a straight face. 

“It’s not supposed to look like a leaf,” Mr. Ross corrected Evan. “It’s 
supposed to look like my impression of a leaf.” 

“Oh.” Evan scratched his curly, red hair as he studied it some more. “Neat, 
Dad,” he said. “I see what you mean.” 

Then something else caught his eye. “Hey—what’s this?” 

Evan carefully stepped over several jagged, bent shards of metal. He made 
his way to another metal sculpture and ran his hand over the smooth, shiny 
surface. It was an enormous aluminum cylinder that rested above a flat wooden 
base. 

“Go ahead. Spin it,” Mr. Ross instructed, smiling proudly. 

Evan pushed the cylinder with both hands. It spun slowly over the wooden 

base. 

“I call it ‘The Wheel’,” his father told him. 

Evan laughed. “That’s cool, Dad. You invented the wheel!” 

“Don’t laugh!” Mr. Ross replied, grinning. “That sculpture was accepted at 
the annual arts competition at your school. I have to take it to the auditorium 
later this week.” 

Evan gave “The Wheel” another spin. “I’ll bet no one else made a wheel 



that really spins,” he told his father. “You can’t lose with this, Dad,” he teased. 

“Sarcasm is the lowest form of humor,” Mr. Ross muttered with a frown. 

Evan said good-bye and made his way out of the garage, stepping carefully 
over the jagged pieces of brass and tin. As he headed to the house, he could hear 
the clang clang clang as his dad hammered away on his impression of a leaf. 

In the halls after school on Monday, Evan hurried around a corner and bumped 
right into Andy. “I can’t talk now,” he told her breathlessly. “I’m late for 
basketball tryouts.” 

He glanced down the long hall. It was nearly empty. The gym door opened, 
and he could hear the thump of basketballs against the floor. 

“How come you’re late?” Andy demanded, blocking his path. 

“Murphy kept me after class,” Evan told her with a groan. “He put me on 
permanent hamster duty. I have to take care of Cuddles every afternoon for the 
rest of my life.” 

“Bad news,” Andy murmured. 

“No. That’s the good news,” Evan replied bitterly. 

“What’s the bad news?” 

“The bad news is that Mr. Murphy is also the basketball coach!” 

“Well, good luck,” she said. “Hope you make the team.” 

Evan ran past her, his heart pounding. 

Mr. Murphy is such a rat, he thought unhappily. He’ll probably keep me off 
the team because I’m late to practice—even though it’s his fault I’m late! 

Evan took a deep breath. No. Stop thinking like that, he scolded himself. 

Think positive. I’ve got to think positive. 

Sure, I’m not as tall as the other guys. Maybe I’m not as big or as strong. 
But I’m a good basketball player. And I can make this team. 

I can make this team. I know I can! 

Having finished his pep talk to himself, Evan pulled open the double gym 
doors and stepped into the huge, brightly lit gym. 

“Think fast!” a voice called. 

Evan felt his face explode with pain. 

Then everything went black. 



12 


When Evan opened his eyes, he found himself staring up at about twenty guys 
and Mr. Murphy. 

He was stretched out fiat on his back on the gym floor. His face still hurt. A 
lot. 

He reached a hand up and touched his nose. To his dismay, it felt like a 
wilted leaf of lettuce. 

“You okay, Evan?” Mr. Murphy asked quietly. As the teacher leaned over 
Evan, the whistle that was on a string around his neck bumped against Evan’s 
chest. 

“Did my face explode?” Evan asked weakly. 

Some of the guys snickered. Mr. Murphy glowered at them angrily. Then he 
turned back to Evan. “Conan hit you in the face with the basketball,” he 
reported. 

“He’s got bad reflexes, Coach,” Evan heard Conan say from somewhere 
above him. “He should’ve caught the ball. I really thought he’d catch it. But he’s 
got bad reflexes.” 

“I saw the whole thing,” Conan’s friend, a huge hulk of a kid named Biggie 
Malick, chimed in. “It wasn’t Conan’s fault. Evan should’ve caught the ball. It 
was a perfect pass.” 

Perfect, Evan thought with a sigh. He touched his nose again. This time, it 
felt like a lump of mashed potatoes. At least it isn’t broken, he thought glumly. 

Evan’s basketball tryout went downhill from there. 

Mr. Murphy helped him to his feet. “You sure you want to try out?” he 
asked. 

Thanks for the support, Evan thought bitterly. 

“I think I can make the team,” he said. 

But Conan, Biggie, and the other guys had other ideas. 

During the ball-handling tryout, Evan confidently began dribbling across 
the floor. Halfway to the basket, Biggie bumped him hard—and Conan stole the 
ball away. 

They blocked Evan’s shots. They stole his passes. 

They bumped him every time he moved, sending him sprawling to the 



hardwood floor again and again. 

A fast pass from Conan caught Evan in the mouth. 

“Oops! Sorry!” Conan yelled. 

Biggie laughed like a hyena. 

“Defense! I want to see defense!” Mr. Murphy shouted from the sidelines. 

Evan lowered himself into a defensive stance. As Conan dribbled the ball 
toward him, Evan prepared to defend the basket. 

Conan drove closer. Closer. 

Evan raised both hands to block Conan’s shot. 

But to Evan’s surprise, Conan let the ball bounce away. In one swift motion, 
he grabbed Evan by the waist, leaped high in the air, and stuffed Evan into the 
basket. 

“Three points!” Conan shouted in triumph. 

Biggie and the other guys rushed to congratulate Conan, laughing and 
cheering. 

Mr. Murphy had to get a stepladder to help Evan down. 

His hand on Evan’s shoulder, the teacher led him to the side. “You’re just 
not tall enough, Evan,” he said, rubbing his pink chins. “Don’t take it personally. 
Maybe you’ll grow. But for now, you’re just not tall enough.” 

Evan didn’t say a word. He lowered his head and sadly slumped out of the 

gym. 

Conan came running up to him at the door. “Hey, Evan, no hard feelings,” 
he said. He stuck out his big, sweaty hand. “Shake.” 

Evan held up his hand to show Andy. “It looks like a wilted petunia,” she said. “I 
can’t believe I fell for Conan’s stupid handshake trick twice!” Evan wailed. It 
was the next afternoon. Evan and Andy had walked from school to the small 
park near their houses. Evan had complained about Mr. Murphy and Conan and 
the other basketball players the whole way. 

The late afternoon sun beamed down on them as they walked. Andy 
stopped to watch two monarch butterflies, their black-and-gold wings fluttering 
majestically as they hovered over a patch of blue and yellow wildflowers along 
the creekbed. 

Even the trickling brown creek looked pretty on this bright day. Tiny white 
gnats sparkled like diamonds in the sunlight over the shimmering water. 

Evan kicked at a fallen tree branch. Everything looked dark to him today. 



Dark and ugly. 

“It just wasn’t fair,” he grumbled, kicking the branch again. “It wasn’t a fair 
tryout. Mr. Murphy should have given me a better chance.” 

Andy tsk-tsked, her eyes on the sparkling creek. 

“Someone should teach Mr. Murphy a lesson,” Evan said. “I wish I could 
think of some way of paying him back. I really do.” 

Andy turned to him. A devilish grin crossed her face. “I have a plan,” she 
said softly. “A really neat plan.” 

“What is it?” Evan demanded. 



13 


“What’s your idea?” Evan demanded again. 

Andy grinned at him. She was wearing a long, lime-green T-shirt over a 
Day-Glo orange T-shirt, pulled down over baggy blue shorts. The sunlight made 
all the colors so bright, Evan felt like shielding his eyes. 

“You might not like it,” Andy said coyly. 

“Try me,” Evan replied. “Come on. Don’t keep me in suspense.” 

“Well...” Her eyes wandered over to the tree where they had buried the 
Monster Blood. “It has to do with the Monster Blood,” she said reluctantly. 

He swallowed hard. “That’s okay. Go on.” 

“Well, it’s a pretty simple plan. First, we dig up the Monster Blood,” Andy 
said, watching his reaction. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we take some to school,” she continued. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we feed it to Cuddles.” 

Evan’s mouth dropped open. 

“Just a little bit!” Andy quickly explained. “We feed Cuddles a tiny glob of 
it. Just enough to make him the size of a dog.” 

Evan laughed. It was a terrible idea, a truly evil idea—but he loved it! 

He slapped Andy on the back. “You’re bad, Andy!” he cried. “You’re really 
bad!” 

Andy grinned proudly. “I know.” 

Evan laughed again. “Can you see the look on Murphy’s face when he 
comes in and sees his precious little hamster has grown as big as a cocker 
spaniel? What a riot!” 

“So you’ll do it?” Andy asked. 

Evan’s smile faded. “I guess,” he replied thoughtfully. “If you promise 
we’ll only use a tiny bit. And we’ll bury the rest right away.” 

“Promise,” Andy said. “Just enough to play our little joke on Mr. Murphy. 
Then we’ll never use the stuff again.” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed. 



They shook hands solemnly. 

Then they hurried to the tree. Evan searched the entire park, squinting 
against the bright sunlight. He wanted to make sure no one was spying on them 
this time. 

When he was sure the park was empty, he and Andy dropped to their knees 
under the tree and began scooping the dirt off the hole with their hands. 

They had dug nearly two feet down when they realized the hole was empty. 

“The Monster Blood!” Evan cried. “It—it’s gone!” 



14 


“We must be digging under the wrong tree,” Evan said, sweat pouring down his 
freckled forehead. 

Andy pushed a wet strand of brown hair off her face with a dirt-covered 
finger. “No way.” She shook her head. “This is the right tree. And the right 
hole.” 

“Then where is the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

They both came up with the answer to his question at the same time: 
“Conan!” 

“He must have watched us bury it,” Evan said, his eyes darting around the 
park as if he expected to see Conan jump out from behind a bush. “I thought he 
hurried away awfully fast that afternoon. He knew the paper bag wasn’t empty.” 

Andy agreed. “He hid and watched us bury it. Then he waited till we were 
gone, and dug it up.” 

They both stared into the empty hole in horrified silence. 

Andy broke the silence. “What is Conan going to do with it?” she asked, 
her voice just above a whisper. 

“Probably eat it so he can grow bigger and pound me harder,” Evan replied 
bitterly. 

“But he doesn’t know what Monster Blood does,” Andy said. “He doesn’t 
know how dangerous it is.” 

“Of course he does. I told him all about it,” Evan replied. He slammed his 
hand against the tree trunk. “We have to get it back!” 

Before science class the next afternoon, Evan found Conan in the hall. He and 
Biggie were standing next to Evan’s locker. They were laughing loudly about 
something, slapping each other high-fives. 

Conan wore a tight blue muscle shirt and baggy faded denim jeans with 
enormous holes at the knees. Biggie had wavy brown hair down to his shoulders. 
He wore a sleeveless white T-shirt and tight-fitting black denims. 

They look like a couple of tag-team wrestlers! Evan thought as he stepped 
between them. 

“Hey, look—it’s Air Evan!” Conan joked. “King of the slam dunk!” 



He and Biggie guffawed loudly. Conan gave Evan a slap on the back that 
sent him sprawling into Biggie. 

“Uh... Conan? Did you find something in the park?” Evan asked, 
struggling to regain his balance. 

Conan narrowed his eyes at Evan and didn’t reply. 

“Did you find something that belongs to Andy and me?” Evan repeated. 

“You mean like your brains ?” Conan exclaimed. He and his tag-team 
partner roared with laughter over that gem. 

“Why don’t we dribble him to class?” Biggie asked Conan. “Coach Murphy 
would like to see us get in some extra practice.” 

Conan laughed gleefully at that idea. 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” Evan said sarcastically. “Look, Conan—that stuff you 
took. It’s really dangerous. You have to give it back.” 

Conan opened his eyes in wide-eyed innocence. “I really don’t know what 
you’re talking about, Evan. Did you lose something?” 

“You know I lost something,” Evan replied sharply. “And I want it back.” 

Conan flashed a sly grin at Biggie. Then he turned back to Evan, his 
expression hardening. “I don’t know what you mean, Evan,” he said. “Really. I 
don’t know what you and that girl lost. But tell you what. I’m a nice guy. I’ll 
help you look for it.” 

He grabbed Evan around the waist with both hands. Biggie pulled Evan’s 
locker door open. 

“I’ll help you look for it in your locker,” Conan said. 

He shoved Evan inside the locker and slammed the door shut. 

Evan started pounding on the metal door, shouting for help. 

But the bell had rung. Evan knew the hall was empty. There was no one to 
hear his cries. 

He decided to try fiddling with the latch. But it was too dark to see 
anything. And he was so jammed in, he couldn’t raise his arms. 

Finally, two girls happened to walk by, and they pulled open the locker 

door. 

Evan came bursting out, red-faced, gasping for air. 

The girls’ laughter followed him all the way to Mr. Murphy’s class. “You’re 
late,” the teacher said sternly, glancing up at the wall clock as Evan staggered in. 

Evan tried to explain why. But all that escaped his lips was a whistling 
wheeze. 



“I’m really tired of you disrupting my class, Evan,” Mr. Murphy said, 
rubbing his nearly bald head. “I’m afraid I’ll be seeing you after school again. 
You can give Cuddles’ cage a double cleaning. And while you’re at it, you can 
scrub the chalkboards and clean out all the test tubes, too.” 


* * * 


“It’s so dark,” Evan whispered. 

“It usually gets dark at night,” Andy replied, rolling her eyes. 

“The streetlight is out,” Evan said, pointing. “And there’s no moon tonight. 
That’s why it’s so dark.” 

“Hide! ” Andy whispered. 

They ducked behind the hedge as a car rolled slowly past. Evan shut his 
eyes as the white headlights moved over him. When the car turned the corner, 
they climbed to their feet. 

It was a little after eight o’clock. They were standing in the street in front of 
Conan’s house. Leaning against the low hedge, they stared across the sloping 
front lawn into the large picture window in the front of the house. 

The lamp in the living room was lit, casting a dim rectangle of orange light 
that spilled onto the front yard. The old trees at the sides of the small brick house 
whispered in a hot breeze. 

“Are we really doing this?” Evan asked, huddling close to Andy. “Are we 
really going to break into Conan’s house?” 

“We’re not going to break in,” Andy whispered. “We’re going to sneak in.” 

“But what if the Monster Blood isn’t there?” Evan asked, hoping she 
couldn’t see his knees trembling. 

“We have to look, don’t we?” Andy shot back. 

She turned to study his face. He saw that she was frightened, too. “The 
Monster Blood will be there,” she told him. “It’s got to be.” 

Bending low, she started to creep across the dark yard to the house. 

Evan hung back. “You checked it out?” he called to her. “Everyone is really 
gone?” 

“His parents left right after dinner,” Andy told him. “Then I saw Conan go 
out about ten minutes ago,” 

“Where?” Evan demanded. 

“How should I know?” she asked sharply, putting her hands on her waist. 



“He left. The house is empty.” She came back and tugged Evan’s arm. “Come 
on. Let’s sneak into Conan’s room, get the Monster Blood, and get out of here!” 

“I can’t believe we’re doing this,” Evan said, sighing. “We—we could be 
arrested!” 

“It was your idea!” Andy reminded him. 

“Oh. Yeah. Right.” He took a deep breath and held it, hoping it would help 
calm him down. “If we don’t find it right away, we get out of there—right?” 

“Right,” Andy agreed. “Now come on.” She gave him a little shove toward 
the house. 

They took a few steps over the dew-wet grass. 

They both stopped when they heard the low barking. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s arm. 

The barking grew louder. They could hear the dog’s heavy paws pounding 
the ground, approaching fast. 

Two angry eyes. A loud warning bark. Another. 

The dog attacked at full speed. 

“Run!” Evan cried. “Conan has a guard dog!” 

“Too late to run!” Andy shrieked. 



15 


The dog barked again. 

Evan cried out and threw up his hands as the dog leaped for his throat. 

The dog wasn’t as big as Evan had thought—but it was strong. 

It licked his face, pressing its wet snout into his cheek. 

It licked his chin. And then his lips. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, laughing. “Trigger—how did you get here?” 

Evan pulled the cocker spaniel off him and lowered it to the ground. Its 
stubby tail wagging furiously, Trigger started jumping on Andy. 

“Your dumb dog scared me to death,” she moaned. 

“Me, too,” Evan admitted. “I didn’t hear him following us, did you?” 

Andy squatted down and gave Trigger a few quick pats. Then she glanced 
down the street. 

“Let’s get inside,” she said. “Conan or his parents could be back any 
minute.” 

Trigger pranced along as they made their way over the grass to the front 
door. The house loomed much bigger and darker as they crept onto the stoop. 

“Down, Trigger. Stay down,” Evan whispered. “You can’t come in with us.” 

Andy tried the front door. “Locked.” 

Evan groaned. “Now what?” 

“We try the back door, of course,” Andy replied. She had already jumped 
down off the stoop and was heading around the side of the house. 

“You’ve done this before—haven’t you?” Evan demanded, following her. 

“Maybe,” she replied, grinning at him in the dark. 

A loud howl somewhere nearby made them both stop. 

“What was that?” Evan cried. 

“A werewolf,” Andy told him calmly. “Or maybe a cat.” 

They both laughed. Nervous laughter. 

The back door was locked, too. But the kitchen window was open a crack. 
Evan pushed it open wider, and they crept into the dark kitchen. 

Holding his breath, Evan could hear every sound. Their sneakers scraped 
noisily against the linoleum. The refrigerator hummed. Water swirled in the 



dishwasher. 

I can even hear the pounding of my heart, Evan thought. What am I doing? 
Have I really broken into Conan’s house? 

“This way,” Andy whispered. “His room is probably upstairs.” 

Evan kept against the wall as he followed Andy to the front stairs. They 
passed the small living room, bathed in orange light. The floorboards creaked 
under their shoes. Evan stumbled over a pile of old newspapers stacked in the 
narrow hallway. 

Up the wooden stairs. The banister squeaked under Evan’s hand. A 
Venetian blind rattled against an open window, startling him. 

“Sure is dark,” Andy muttered as they reached the top of the stairs. 

Evan tried to reply, but his breath caught in his throat. 

Holding onto the wall, he followed Andy to the first bedroom. She fumbled 
until she found a light switch, then clicked it on. The ceiling light revealed that 
they had found Conan’s room. 

They both stood in the doorway, waiting for their eyes to adjust to the light. 
Then they quickly glanced around. 

The walls of the small, square room were filled with posters of sports stars. 
The biggest poster, above Conan’s bed, showed Michael Jordan jumping about 
ten feet in the air as he slam-dunked a basketball. A bookshelf against one wall 
held very few books—but was loaded with sports trophies that Conan had won 
on various teams. 

Suddenly, Andy started to laugh. 

Evan turned to her, startled. “What’s so funny?” 

She pointed to Conan’s bed. “Look—he still has a teddy bear!” 

Evan turned his eyes to the bed, where a forlorn-looking, nearly flat, one- 
eyed teddy bear rested on the pillow. “Conan the Barbarian?” he cried, laughing. 
“He sleeps with a teddy bear?” 

A loud creak made them cut their laughter short. 

They listened hard, their eyes wide with fear. “Just the house,” Evan 
whispered. 

Andy shivered. “Enough fooling around. Let’s find the Monster Blood and 
get out of here.” 

They moved into the center of the room. “Where do you think he hid it?” 
Evan asked, pulling open the closet door. 

“He didn’t,” Andy replied. 



“Huh?” Evan spun around. 

Andy had the blue can of Monster Blood in her hand. Grinning, she held it 
up to show Evan. 

Evan let out a surprised cry. “You found it? Where?” 

“Right on this shelf,” she replied, pointing. “He put it next to his tennis 
trophies.” 

Evan hurried over to her and took the blue can from her hand. As he held it 
up to examine it, the lid popped off. 

The green Monster Blood began bubbling over the top of the can. 

“It’s growing fast!” Evan declared. 

Andy stooped down and picked up the lid. She handed it to Evan. “Put it 
back on. Hurry.” 

Evan tried pushing the lid back on. It kept slipping off. 

“Hurry up,” Andy urged. “We’ve got to go.” 

“The Monster Blood—it’s up over the top,” Evan cried. 

“Shove it down,” Andy instructed. 

Evan tried pushing the green gunk down into the can, pressing against it 
with the palm of his hand. Then he tried pushing it with three fingers. 

He gasped as he felt the green goo tighten around his fingers and start to 
pull them down. 

“It—it’s got me!” Evan stammered. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“It’s got my fingers!” Evan cried shrilly. “It won’t let go!” 

As Andy hurried to help him, they both heard the front door slam. 

“Someone’s home!” Evan whispered, tugging to pull his fingers free. 
“We’re caught!” 



16 


Andy froze in the center of the room, her eyes wide with horror. 

Evan nearly dropped the can of Monster Blood. The sticky green substance 
tightened its grip on his fingers, making loud sucking sounds. 

But Evan only cared about the sounds coming from downstairs. 

“I’m home!” he heard Conan shout. 

“We’re home, too!” It was a woman’s voice, probably Conan’s mother. 

“They’re all home,” Evan whispered. 

“We’re dead meat!” Andy murmured. 

“I’m going upstairs,” Conan called to his parents. 

Evan let out a terrified cry as he heard Conan’s heavy footsteps on the 
stairs. “Andy—wh-what do we do?” he stammered. 

“The window!” she replied. 

They both lunged toward the open window and peered out. A narrow 
concrete ledge stretched just beneath the window. 

Without hesitating, Andy raised a leg over the windowsill and climbed out 
onto the ledge. “Evan—hurry!” she whispered, gesturing frantically. 

Evan was still desperately trying to pull his fingers from the bubbling green 
goo. Andy reached in through the window and grabbed him by the shoulder. 
“Evan—!” 

He heard Conan’s footsteps in the upstairs hall just outside the bedroom. 

Using his free hand for support, Evan scrambled out the window and joined 
Andy on the narrow ledge. 

“D-don’t look down,” Andy instructed in a trembling whisper. 

Evan didn’t obey. He glanced down. The ground seemed very far below. 

They each stood on a side of the window—Andy to the left, Evan the right. 
They pressed their bodies against the brick wall—and listened. 

They heard Conan step into the room. 

Did he notice that the light had been turned on? 

No way to tell. 

Loud rap music suddenly jarred the silence. Conan had turned on his boom 
box. He started chanting off-key along with the music. 



Evan pressed as tightly against the side of the house as he could. 

Go back downstairs, Conan, he pleaded silently. Please—go back 
downstairs! 

How will Andy and I ever get away from here? he wondered, feeling all of 
his muscles tighten in panic. 

Despite the hot night air, a cold chill ran down Evan’s back. He shuddered 
so hard, he nearly toppled off the ledge. 

The blue can stuck to his hand. The Monster Blood sucked at his fingers. 
But he couldn’t worry about that now. 

He could hear Conan moving around inside the room. Was he dancing to 
the loud music? 

Evan glanced across the window at Andy. Her eyes were shut. Her face was 
clenched in a tight frown. 

“Andy—!” Evan whispered. He knew that Conan couldn’t hear a whisper 
over the booming music. “Andy—it’ll be okay. As soon as he leaves, we’ll jump 
inside and sneak down the stairs.” 

Andy nodded without opening her eyes. “Did I ever tell you I’m afraid of 
heights?” she whispered. 

“No,” Evan replied. 

“Well, remind me to tell you!” 

“We’ll be okay,” he murmured. 

Clinging to the side of the house, Evan kept repeating those words to 
himself. “We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay.” 

Then Trigger started to bark. 

A low bark of surprise at first. And then a louder series of barks, insistent 
barks, excited barks. 

Evan swallowed hard. He glanced down to the ground. 

Trigger was peering up at him, jumping against the side of the house, as if 
trying to reach the ledge. The dog barked louder with each jump. 

“Trigger—no!” Evan called down in a frantic whisper. 

That only made the dog bark more furiously. 

Did Conan hear it? Could he hear Trigger’s ferocious barks over the music? 

“Trigger—stop! Go home! Go home!” 

Suddenly the music stopped. 

Trigger’s excited barks rose up even louder against the new silence. 

Conan must hear them now, Evan realized. 



The cocker spaniel threw himself wildly against the side of the house, 
trying to get up to Evan and Andy. Despite Evan’s frantic signals to be quiet, the 
dumb dog barked his head off. 

Evan’s breath caught in his throat as he heard Conan making his way to the 
window. 

A second later, Conan stuck his head out. “What’s going on?” he shouted. 

Evan’s knees buckled. He started to fall. 



17 


Evan clung to the brick wall and stopped his fall. 

He stared at Conan’s blond hair poking out the window. Evan was close 
enough to reach out and touch it. 

“Shut up down there!” Conan shouted. 

That made Trigger bark even louder. 

He’s going to see us, Evan thought, trembling all over. 

There’s no way Conan won’t see us. 

“Conan—come downstairs!” Mrs. Barber’s voice floated up from 
downstairs. “Conan—come down and have your cake and ice cream. You said 
you were dying for dessert!” she called. 

Conan’s head disappeared back into the bedroom. “There’s some stupid dog 
barking down there,” he called to his mother. 

Clinging to the side of the house, struggling to keep his quivering knees 
from buckling again, Evan shut his eyes and listened. 

He heard Conan’s footsteps cross the room. The bedroom light went out. 

Silence. 

“He—left,” Evan choked out. 

Andy let out a long breath. “I can’t believe he didn’t see us out here.” 

Evan glanced down to the ground. Trigger had finally stopped barking. But 
he continued to stand and stare up at them, his front paws against the side of the 
house, his stubby tail spinning like a propeller. 

“Dumb dog,” Evan muttered. 

“Let’s go,” Andy urged. She didn’t wait for Evan. She practically did a 
swan dive into the house. 

It took Evan a few moments to get his legs to work. Then he ducked his 
head and climbed through the window after Andy. 

Holding his breath, he led the way on tiptoe to the bedroom door. He 
stopped and listened. 

Silence. No one in the dark hallway. 

He could hear the Barbers’ voices downstairs in the kitchen. 

He and Andy made their way to the top of the stairs. Then, holding tightly 



to the banister, they crept halfway down. 

Evan stopped to listen again. Andy bumped right into him, nearly sending 
him sailing down the stairs. “Shhh!” she cried. 

They could hear Conan talking to his parents in the kitchen. He was 
complaining about the other guys on the basketball team. “They’re all wimps,” 
Evan heard Conan say. 

“Well, that’ll make you look even better,” Mr. Barber replied. 

Evan took another deep breath and held it. Then he made his way down to 
the bottom of the stairs. 

Almost out, he thought, his entire body shaking. Almost out of here. 

He reached for the front doorknob. 

“Conan, go upstairs and get your math book,” he heard Mr. Barber say. “I 
want to see the homework you had trouble with.” 

“Okay,” Conan replied. His chair scraped against the floor. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder. 

They stared in frozen horror at each other—one foot away from escape— 
and waited to be caught. 



18 


“Conan—don’t go now. Get the book later,” Mrs. Barber chimed in. Then they 
heard her scold Conan’s father: “Let the boy have his cake and ice cream.” 

“Fine, fine,” Mr. Barber replied. “He can show me the book later.” 

Conan’s chair scraped back into place under the table. 

Evan didn’t wait another second. 

He jerked open the front door, pushed open the screen door, and burst out of 
the house like a rocket. 

He could hear Andy gasping as she ran behind him. And then he could hear 
Trigger’s shrill yips as the dog followed, too. 

Down the Barbers’ front lawn, into the street. Their sneakers slapped the 
pavement as they ran full speed through the darkness. 

They didn’t stop until they reached Evan’s driveway. 

Evan leaned against his family’s mailbox and struggled to catch his breath. 
He raised his hand to wipe the sweat off his forehead—and saw the blue can still 
stuck there. 

“Help me,” he pleaded. He reached out his hand to Andy. 

She was breathing hard, too. Her eyes kept darting back down the street, as 
if she expected Conan to be chasing after them. 

“Close one,” she murmured. She turned to Evan. Her eyes glowed excitedly 
in the light from the streetlamp. “That was fun!” 

Evan didn’t agree. In his opinion, it was far too scary to be fun. And here he 
was, still stuck to the can of Monster Blood. 

He pushed his hand toward Andy. “Pull it off,” he told her. “I think you 
need both hands. I can’t do it.” 

She grabbed the can in both hands. The green gunk bubbled over the sides, 
making loud sucking sounds. 

Andy tugged. Then tugged harder. Then she took a deep breath, leaned 
back, and tugged with all her might. 

The Monster Blood finally let go of its grip on Evan’s fingers. The can slid 
off with a loud pop. Andy went tumbling back onto the pavement. 

“Ow!” Evan held up his three fingers and tried to examine them under the 
streetlight. They were all wrinkled and pruney, the way they looked when he had 



been swimming for an hour or two. 

“Yuck! That stuff is so gross!” he cried. 

Andy climbed slowly to her feet. She still cradled the Monster Blood can in 
both hands. “At least we got it back,” she murmured. 

“Yeah. Now we can bury it again,” Evan said, still examining his fingers. 
“Huh? Bury it?” Andy pulled the can away, as if protecting it from Evan. 
“You heard me,” Evan said firmly. “It’s just too dangerous to mess with, 
Andy. Take it home and bury it in your back yard, okay?” 

Andy stared down at the can. She didn’t reply. 

“Bury it,” Evan repeated. “Take it home and bury it. Promise?” 

“Well...” Andy hesitated. Then she said, “Okay. Promise.” 

Evan woke up with a bad sore throat the next morning. 

His mother worried that he might be coming down with the flu. So she kept 
him home from school. Evan spent the day reading comic books and watching 
MTV. His sore throat disappeared by midafternoon. 

He returned to school the next day, feeling refreshed and ready to see 
everyone. 

The good feeling lasted until he stepped into Mr. Murphy’s science class 
near the end of the day. Evan had to walk past the hamster cage to get to his seat. 
As he neared the cage, he peered in. 

That’s weird, he thought. Where’s Cuddles? 

When did Mr. Murphy get a rabbit? 

A rabbit?! 

He stopped and leaned closer to the cage. 

Familiar black eyes stared up at him. A familiar pink nose twitched at him. 

It was Cuddles, Evan realized. 

Cuddles had grown as big as a rabbit! 



19 


Evan leaned over the hamster cage, staring at the giant-sized Cuddles, as the bell 
rang. He turned to see that the other kids had all taken their seats. 

“Evan, I see you’re examining your victim,” Mr. Murphy said from the 
front of the room. 

“I—uh—” Evan couldn’t think of a reply. “Victim?” 

Mr. Murphy angrily narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. “You’ve been 
overfeeding Cuddles, Evan. Look how fat he has become.” 

Almost as fat as you! Evan wanted to say. 

Evan knew that Cuddles’ weight problem wasn’t his fault. 

And it had nothing to do with overeating. 

Cuddles had grown to triple-hamster size because of Monster Blood. 

“When I find Andy, I’ll strangle her!” Evan muttered. 

“What did you say, Evan?” Mr. Murphy demanded. 

Evan could feel his face turning bright red. He hadn’t meant to talk out 

loud. 

“Uh... nothing,” he replied, totally embarrassed. He slunk to his seat. 

Andy has gone too far this time, he thought bitterly. She promised she’d 
bury the Monster Blood. She promised! 

And now she’s turned Cuddles into a fat freak! And Murphy thinks it’s all 
my fault! 

“Please stay after school,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, “so we can discuss 
Cuddles’ diet.” 

Evan heard some kids snickering. He knew they were laughing at him. 

He saw Conan and Biggie at their seats in the back. Conan was twitching 
his nose, puffing out his cheeks, pretending to be a fat hamster. Biggie was 
laughing his head off. 

Evan stared at the hamster all through class. Cuddles appeared to grow right 
before Evan’s eyes. With each breath, the hamster seemed to puff up wider and 
taller. 

Its black eyes were as big as marbles now. They stared back at Evan, as if 
accusing him. 

When the hamster moved to its water tube, the entire cage rattled and 



shook. 

Please don’t grow anymore! Evan pleaded silently, staring at the shaking 
cage. Please stop right now, Cuddles. Okay? 

The hamster breathed noisily. Wheezing gasps. Evan could hear Cuddles 
panting all the way across the room. 

The cage shook again as Cuddles turned around. Evan watched in horror as 
the cage nearly toppled off its table. 

I’ll kill Andy! Evan thought bitterly. How could she do this to me? 

When the bell rang, the other kids all gathered up their books and headed 
out the door. Evan stood up and walked over to Cuddles’ cage. 

Panting loudly, Cuddles stared up at him. He’s too big to fit on his wheel, 
Evan realized. If he grows any more, he’ll burst out of the cage! 

How much Monster Blood did Andy feed him? Evan wondered. He had to 
find out. 

He turned to Mr. Murphy, who was reading over some papers at his desk. 
“I’ve got to find someone,” Evan called up to him. “I’ll be right back.” 

“Don’t take too long,” the teacher replied without looking up. 

Evan hurried from the room—and ran into Conan. “Hey, I was looking for 
you,” Conan said, sidestepping to the right, then the left, and stretching out both 
arms to keep Evan from getting away. 

“No time now,” Evan said sharply. But Conan wouldn’t let him pass. “I’m 
kind of in a hurry,” Evan told him. “I don’t have time to be stuffed into my 
locker right now.” 

A big grin crossed Conan’s handsome face. “Hey, I’m sorry about that,” he 
said, his blue eyes twinkling. 

“Huh? You’re sorry?” Evan’s mouth dropped open in shock. 

“Yeah. No hard feelings,” Conan said, lowering his eyes. “Shake.” 

Evan stuck out his hand. Then remembered Conan’s crushing handshake. 
He tried to pull back his hand. 

Too late. 

Conan gripped it tightly and began to squeeze. As he squeezed Evan’s hand, 
his grin grew wider and wider. 

Down the hall, Evan saw Andy heading out the door. He tried to call to her. 
But all that came out of his mouth was a squeak of pain. 

Andy disappeared out the front door of the school. 

The bones in Evan’s hand cracked and crunched. 



When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a sad lump of soft red clay. 

“Wow! That’s some handshake you’ve got!” Conan cried, laughing. He 
pretended his hand hurt. He shook it hard and blew on it. “You killed me that 
time! You been working out or something?” 

Conan headed off to basketball practice, laughing and shaking his hand. 

He really cracks himself up, Evan thought. An angry cry burst from his 
throat. He slammed his good hand into a locker. He was so furious, he thought 
he could feel steam pouring out his ears. 

“Evan—you’re keeping me waiting!” Mr. Murphy called in a singsong 
from the classroom doorway. 

“Coming,” Evan muttered miserably, and slunk back into the room. 

He tried calling Andy for hours that night. But there was no one home. 

In his sleep, he dreamed that Trigger ate a big glob of Monster Blood and 
grew to giant size. Evan tried to stop him. But the enormous dog took off after 
the mailman. 

It wasn’t much of a chase. Trigger caught the mailman easily. The mailman 
was the size of a hamster. 

Evan woke up drenched with sweat. He glanced at his bedtable clock. Only 
six in the morning. He normally didn’t get up until seven. 

He climbed out of bed, anyway, feeling shaky and scared. 

He decided he had to get to school before everyone else. He had to see if 
Cuddles had grown any bigger. 

“Evan—where are you going?” his mother called sleepily as Evan headed 
out the front door. 

“Uh—school,” Evan replied. He had hoped to sneak out before she woke 
up. 

“So early?” She padded into the room, struggling with the belt to her blue 
cotton robe. 

“Well... I have a science project I need to work on,” Evan told her. It was 
almost the truth. 

“A science project?” She eyed him suspiciously. 

“Yeah. It’s... big!” Evan replied, thinking quickly. “It’s really big! So I 
couldn’t bring it home.” 

“You’re going without any breakfast?” Mrs. Ross demanded, yawning. 

“I’ll grab something at school,” he said. “Later, Mom.” He disappeared out 



the door before she could ask any more questions. 

A red sun was just climbing over the trees in a gray sky. The air still carried 
the chill of the night. The lawns Evan passed shimmered wetly with morning 
dew. 

He jogged the whole way, his backpack flopping heavily on his shoulder. 
There were no other kids on the playground or on the walk heading into the 
building. 

He crept into the school and made his way down the silent, empty hall. His 
sneakers echoed loudly as he trotted toward the science classroom. 

Maybe Cuddles didn’t grow overnight, Evan told himself. 

Maybe he didn’t grow at all. Maybe he shrank. Maybe he shrank back to his 
old size. 

It was possible. 

It was possible that Andy had fed the hamster only a teeny tiny speck of 
Monster Blood. Just enough for Cuddles to swell up to the size of a fat rabbit— 
then shrink right back down to cute, cuddly hamster size. 

It was possible—wasn’t it? 

Yes! Yes! Evan crossed his fingers on both hands. He wished he could cross 
his toes. 

By the time he reached the classroom, he was breathless. His heart thudded 
loudly in his chest. 

He hesitated at the door. 

Please, Cuddles—be small. Be small! 

Then Evan took a deep breath, held it—and stepped inside. 



20 


Evan stepped into the room, staring at the cage against the far wall. At first, he 
didn’t see Cuddles. 

Had Cuddles shrunk? Had he? 

Sometimes prayers are answered, Evan told himself. Sometimes good 
things happen. 

Evan took a few hesitant steps closer. Then a few more steps. 

Every muscle in his body had tensed. He was so frightened, it was actually 
hard to walk. 

He could feel the blood throbbing at his temples. He mopped the cold beads 
of sweat off his forehead. 

He still couldn’t see Cuddles. Where was he? 

Where? 

Gray morning light filtered in through the windows. The floor creaked 
under Evan’s sneakers. 

Evan took another hesitant step toward the cage. 

Another step. 

Then he cried out in horror. 

Evan hadn’t seen Cuddles at first—because Cuddles was too big! 

Cuddles filled the entire cage. 

Evan held back, gaping in disbelief. 

The hamster groaned noisily with every loud breath. It let out several 
disgusting grunts as its body pressed against the wire cage. 

Its big, furry head pushed up against the top of the cage. Evan could see one 
enormous black eye, the size of a jar lid, staring out at him. 

“No!” Evan cried out loud, feeling his knees begin to tremble. “This is 
impossible!” 

The hamster uttered a few more low grunts. 

The cage shook on its table. 

The big black eye glared out at Evan. 

And then as Evan stared in horrified disbelief, the hamster reached up its 
two pink paws. The toes slipped around the wires of the cage. 



Cuddles let out an ugly groan. 

Evan saw its spongy pink nose twitch. He saw a flash of big white teeth. 
Another groan. 

The two front paws pushed against the cage wires. 

The wires bent away. 

Cuddles grunted again, wheezing loudly, excitedly. 

He pushed the cage wires aside. Then he started to squeeze his big, fur- 
covered body through the opening. What do I do? Evan frantically asked 
himself. What do I do now? Cuddles is escaping! 



21 


“So what did you do?” Andy asked. 

They were sitting together in the tall grass of the tiny park, watching the 
brown creek trickle past. The late afternoon sun felt warm on their backs. 
Crickets chirped in the trees behind them. 

Three boys rolled past on bikes on the other side of the creek, heading 
home from school. One of them waved to Evan. He didn’t wave back. 

Andy wore a bright red sleeveless T-shirt over white denim jeans. She had 
slipped off her yellow sneakers and was digging her bare feet into the soft 
ground. 

“So what did you do?” she repeated. 

Evan picked up a hard clump of dirt and tossed it into the creek. Then he 
leaned back, his hands planted firmly behind him on the ground. 

“I got a dog leash,” he told Andy. “In the supply closet.” 

Andy’s eyes widened in surprise. “Murphy keeps a dog leash? What for?” 

Evan shrugged. “He has all kinds of junk back there.” 

“So you put the leash on Cuddles?” 

“Yeah,” Evan told her. “He was just the right size. As big as a dog. Maybe a 
little bigger.” 

“As big as Trigger?” Andy demanded. 

Evan nodded. “Then I tied the other end to the leg of Murphy’s desk—and I 
ran out of there as fast as I could.” 

Andy laughed. But she cut it short when she caught Evan’s angry glare. 
“What happened when you went to science class?” she asked, turning back to the 
creek. 

“I didn’t,” Evan muttered. 

“Huh?” 

“I didn’t go,” Evan said softly. “I was afraid to go. I didn’t want Murphy to 
start blaming me in front of everyone.” 

“So you cut class?” Andy asked, startled. 

Evan nodded. 

“So what did you do?” Andy asked. She pulled up a handful of the tall grass 
and let it sift through her fingers. 



“I sneaked out and came here,” Evan replied, frowning. 

“Everyone was talking about Cuddles all day,” Andy reported. Her dark 
eyes flashed. She couldn’t keep an amused grin off her face. “Everyone had to 
go in and see him. The stupid hamster practically caused a riot!” 

“It isn’t funny,” Evan murmured. 

“It’s kind of funny!” Andy insisted. “Mr. Murphy was bragging that 
Cuddles could beat up any other hamster in the country. He said he was going to 
try to get Cuddles on TV!” 

“Huh?” Evan jumped to his feet. “You mean Mr. Murphy wasn’t upset?” 

“I heard that he was at first,” Andy replied thoughtfully. “But then I guess 
he got used to Cuddles being so big. And he was acting kind of proud. You 
know. Like he had the biggest pumpkin at the fair or something. A blue-ribbon 
winner!” Andy snickered. 

Evan kicked at the grass. “I know he’s going to blame me. I know it!” 

“Everyone was feeding Cuddles carrots all day,” Andy said, not seeming to 
hear Evan’s unhappy wails. “The hamster ate the carrots whole. One big chomp. 
Then it made this really gross swallowing sound. It was a riot.” 

“I can’t believe this!” Evan groaned. He lowered his eyes angrily to Andy. 
“Why did you do it? Why?” 

Andy gazed up at him innocently. “I wanted to give you a laugh,” she 
replied. 

“Huh? A laugh?” he shrieked. 

“You were looking pretty down. I thought it might cheer you up.” 

Evan let out an angry cry. 

“I guess it didn’t cheer you up,” Andy muttered. 

She pulled up another handful of grass and let the blades fall over the legs 
of her white jeans. 

Evan stomped over to the edge of the creek. He kicked a rock into the 
water. 

“Come on, Evan,” Andy called. “You have to admit it’s a little funny.” 

He spun around to face her. “It’s not,” he insisted. “Not funny at all. What if 
Cuddles just keeps growing and growing? Then what?” 

“We could put a saddle on his back and give everyone hamster rides!” She 
giggled. 

Evan scowled and kicked another rock into the creek. “You know how 
dangerous that Monster Blood is,” he scolded. “What are we going to do? How 



are we going to get Cuddles back to hamster size?” 

Andy shrugged. She pulled up another handful of grass. 

The sun sank lower behind the trees. A shadow rolled over them. Two little 
kids chased a white-and-red soccer ball on the other side of the creek. Their 
mother shouted to them not to get wet. 

“Where’s the Monster Blood can?” Evan demanded, standing over Andy. 
“Maybe it tells the antidote on the can. Maybe it tells how to reverse the whole 
thing.” 

Andy shook her head. “Evan, you know it doesn’t say anything on the can. 
No instructions. No ingredients. Nothing.” She climbed to her feet and brushed 
off the legs of her jeans. “I’ve got to get home. My aunt doesn’t know where I 
am. She’s probably having a cow.” 

Evan followed her toward the street, shaking his head. “How big?” he 
muttered. 

She glanced back at him. “What did you say?” 

“How big will Cuddles be tomorrow?” Evan asked in a trembling voice. 
“How big?” 



22 


“Andy—will you hurry up?” 

Evan had agreed to meet Andy at her aunt’s house the next morning so they 
could go to school early. But Andy had found a spot on her jeans and had gone 
back up to her room to change. 

And now they were no longer early. 

“Sorry,” she said, hurtling down the stairs two steps at a time. She had 
changed her entire outfit. Now she had on a red-and-black-striped vest over a 
yellow T-shirt, pulled down over pale blue shorts. 

“Didn’t you leave out a color?” Evan demanded sarcastically, grabbing 
Andy’s backpack for her and hurrying to the front door. 

She made a face at him. “I like bright colors. It suits my personality.” 

“Your personality is late!” he declared. 

She followed him out the door and down the front lawn to the sidewalk. “At 
least I have a personality!” she cried. “What’s your hurry, anyway?” 

Evan didn’t answer. He adjusted his backpack on his shoulder, then began 
running toward school. 

“Hey—wait up!” Andy called, running after him. 

“How much Monster Blood did you give Cuddles, anyway?” Evan 
demanded without slowing his pace. “The whole can?” 

“No way!” Andy called breathlessly. “Just a spoonful. He seemed to like 
it.” 

“I guess he liked being as big as a dog, too,” Evan said, turning the corner. 
The tall, redbrick school building came into view. 

“Maybe he’s back to normal today,” Andy said. 

But as they came near the building, it was easy to tell that things were not 
normal. 

Evan heard a loud crash from the side of the building. It sounded like glass 
shattering. 

Then he heard excited shouts. Loud kids’ voices filled with alarm. 

“What’s going on?” Andy cried. 

They dove up the stairs and burst into the building. Running full speed, they 
turned the corner and made their way to the science classroom. 



Evan reached it a few steps ahead of Andy. Hearing excited shouts and 
cries, he lurched into the room—and then stopped with a startled cry. 

“No! Oh, please—no!” 

“Stand back! Everyone stand back!” a red-faced Mr. Murphy was 
screaming. 

Cuddles uttered a loud grunt and flailed his giant legs wildly in the air. 

“He—he’s ten feet tall!” Evan heard Andy scream at his side. 

“Al-almost!” Evan stammered. 

The grunting, groaning hamster towered over Mr. Murphy. Its pink paws 
batted the air. Its monstrous mouth opened wide, revealing two enormous, sharp 
white teeth. 

“Back! Everyone back!” Mr. Murphy shrieked. 

The terrified kids in the classroom pressed back against the walls. 

Mr. Murphy picked up a wooden chair in one hand, the torn dog leash in the 
other. Holding the chair by the back, he came at the grunting monster like a lion 
tamer. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down! Sit! Sit!” 

He poked the wooden chair up at the giant hamster and snapped the dog 
leash like a whip. 

Cuddles’ watery black eyes, as big as soccer balls, glared down at the red¬ 
faced teacher. The hamster didn’t seem terribly impressed with Mr. Murphy’s 
lion-tamer act. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down!” The teacher’s chins quivered, and his big 
belly bounced up and down beneath his tight gray knit polo shirt. 

Cuddles pulled back his huge lips and bared his white teeth. He let out a 
growl that made the light fixtures shake. 

Terrified cries rang out through the room. Evan glanced back to see a 
horrified crowd of teachers and students jammed in the doorway. 

“Down, Cuddles!” 

Mr. Murphy shoved the wooden chair up at the raging hamster. He cracked 
the dog-leash whip near the hamster’s throbbing, fur-covered belly. 

The huge black eyes stared down angrily at Mr. Murphy. The pink hamster 
paws clawed in the air. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder and held on tight. “This is terrible!” she 
cried. “Terrible!” 

Evan started to reply—but frightened shrieks drowned out his words. 



Cuddles grabbed the chair with both paws. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy screamed. He struggled to hold on to the chair. 

Cuddles pulled the chair. Mr. Murphy desperately held tight. He let the 
leash fall so he could hold on to the chair with both hands. 

The teacher and Cuddles had a short tug-of-war. 

Cuddles won easily. The hamster pulled the chair up, nearly jerking Mr. 
Murphy’s arms out of their sockets. 

With a loud groan, the teacher toppled heavily to the floor. 

Kids screamed. 

Two teachers rushed forward to help the gasping Mr. Murphy to his feet. 

Evan stared up as the hamster raised the wooden chair to its mouth. The 
enormous white teeth opened quickly. The pink nose twitched. The watery black 
eyes blinked. 

Then Cuddles chewed the wooden chair to pieces. 

Splinters rained down on the floor. 

The chomping teeth sounded like a lumberjack’s ax biting into a tree. 

Evan froze in horror along with everyone else in the room. 

Andy was squeezing his shoulder so hard, it hurt. “This is our fault,” she 
murmured. 

“Our fault?” Evan cried. “Our fault?” 

She ignored his sarcasm. He saw the fear in her eyes as she stared up at the 
hamster. Cuddles had turned the chair into toothpicks! 

“We’ve got to do something, Evan,” she whispered, huddled close to him. 

“But what?” Evan replied in a trembling voice. “What can we do?” 

Then, suddenly, he had an idea. 



23 


“Come with me!” Evan cried, tugging Andy’s arm. 

She hesitated, staring up at the giant hamster. “Where?” 

“I have an idea,” Evan told her. “But we have to hurry!” 

Cuddles lumbered over to Mr. Murphy’s desk. The hamster’s heavy 
footsteps made the floor sag. 

“Here, fella! Here!” Mr. Murphy was tossing handfuls of sunflower seeds 
up to Cuddles. Cuddles glared down at him. The seeds were too small to bother 
with. 

“Hurry!” Evan pleaded. He pulled Andy through the frightened crowd of 
kids and teachers at the door. Then he began running full speed toward the 
auditorium. 

“We can’t just run away! We have to do something!” Andy cried. 

“We’re not running away,” Evan called back to her, turning a corner. “My 
father’s sculpture—it’s in the auditorium.” 

“Huh?” Andy’s eyes narrowed in confusion. “Evan—have you totally lost 
it? Why do you want to look at your father’s sculpture now?” 

He burst through the auditorium doors and ran past the dark rows of seats 
toward the stage. Several pieces of sculpture had been set up there. 

“Evan—I don’t get it!” Andy cried, right behind him. 

“Look,” Evan said breathlessly. He pointed to his father’s work near the 
back of the stage. “My dad’s sculpture. It’s just like a hamster wheel—see?” 

Her mouth dropped open as she stared at it. 

“It’s a big metal wheel and it spins,” Evan explained as they pulled 
themselves up onto the stage. “Come on. Help me drag it back to Murphy’s 
room. It’s big enough for Cuddles.” 

“Whoa!” Andy cried. “You want to bring Cuddles a wheel? What for?” 

“To distract him,” Evan replied, grabbing one side of the big sculpture. “If 
we can get Cuddles running on this wheel, it will give us time to figure out 
where to keep him. And it will stop him from chewing the whole school to 
pieces.” 

Andy grabbed hold of the other side, one hand on the wheel, one hand on 
the platform. “Maybe Cuddles will mn so hard, he’ll lose weight. Maybe he’ll 



shrink back to his normal size,” she said. 

Luckily, the platform was on wheels. They rolled the sculpture toward the 
stage door at the side. “I just want to distract him,” Evan said, tugging hard. “I 
just want to give us time to think, to make a plan.” 

“Wow! This is heavy!” Andy cried. They rolled it into the hall. “Heavy 
enough for Cuddles, I guess.” 

“I hope,” Evan replied solemnly. 

By the time they rolled the sculpture to the classroom, the crowd of 
frightened kids and teachers had grown even bigger. “Make way! Make way!” 
they both shouted, pushing their way through the crowd. 

They set the wheel down in the center of the floor and gazed over at 
Cuddles. The hamster had two teachers cornered, their backs pressed against the 
chalkboard. It was gnashing its huge teeth at them, slapping its pink paws 
together as if eager to fight them. 

Evan gasped when he saw Mr. Murphy’s desk, crushed flat on the floor. 

“I—I called the police! ” Mr. Murphy cried, his face beaded with large drops 
of sweat. “I begged them to come. But when I said it was a giant hamster, they 
didn’t believe me! They thought it was a practical joke!” 

“Stand back, everyone!” Evan cried shrilly. “Stand back—please! Let 
Cuddles see the wheel!” 

The giant hamster turned suddenly. The two teachers scrambled away from 
the wall. Kids and teachers screamed and hurried toward the door. 

“Maybe he’ll run on the wheel for a while,” Andy explained to Mr. Murphy. 
“Then we can figure out what to do with him!” 

“He—he sees it!” Mr. Murphy cried breathlessly, all of his chins quivering 
at once. 

Cuddles stared down at the wheel. His stub of a tail thudded loudly against 
the chalkboard. He dropped heavily to all fours and took a lumbering step 
toward the wheel. 

“He sees it. He’s going to it,” Evan murmured softly. 

A hush fell over the room as everyone stared at the hamster. 

Will Cuddles climb inside? Evan wondered, holding his breath. 

Will he run on the wheel? 

Will my plan work? 



24 


The hamster sniffed the wheel. Its pink nose twitched. It uttered a low grunt. 

Then it raised itself back onto its hind legs. The hamster’s massive shadow 
fell over the room. 

With another disgusting grunt, it picked the sculpture up in its front paws 
and raised it to its face. 

“No!” Evan cried. “Cuddles—no!” 

The metal clanged as Cuddles bit into the wheel. Evan saw deep tooth 
marks in the aluminum. Cuddles bit down again. Then, seeing that he couldn’t 
chew the wheel up, he pulled it apart, holding the sculpture in his paws and 
twisting it furiously with his teeth. 

Then he tossed the mangled wheel away. It slammed into a window, 
shattering it into a thousand pieces. 

“Back to the drawing board,” Andy muttered to Evan. 

Evan shook his head glumly. That plan was a bust, he told himself. Now 
what? 

He didn’t have time to think about it. 

He heard shrill cries and shrieks of terror. 

“Put him down! Cuddles—put him down!” Mr. Murphy was screaming. 

Evan turned and saw that the giant hamster had picked up a kid. 

Conan! 

Cuddles held Conan in both paws and was raising him toward his gaping 
mouth. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy was shouting. 

Conan thrashed his arms and legs. “Help me! Ohhh, hellllp me!” he 
shrieked. He started to cry. Gasping sobs. Tears rolled down his red cheeks. 

“Helllllp! Mommmmmy! Mommmmmy! Hellllp me!” 

Normally Evan would have enjoyed watching Conan cry like a baby. But 
this was too serious. Cuddles could chew Conan in half! Evan realized. 

He grabbed Andy. “Where’s the Monster Blood?” 

“Huh? In my locker. I hid it under a bunch of stuff in my locker. Why?” 

“I need it,” Evan said. “Come on. I have another idea.” 



“I hope it’s better than the last one,” Andy muttered. 

They hurried to the door, then glanced back. 

Cuddles was playing with Conan, tossing him from paw to paw, licking him 
with his huge, pink tongue. Conan was wailing his head off. 

Evan led the way to Andy’s locker. “I’m going to eat some Monster Blood,” 
he told her, thinking out loud. “I’ll eat a lot. I’ll grow bigger than Cuddles.” 

“I get it,” Andy said, running beside him. “You’ll turn yourself into a giant. 
You’ll make yourself as big as Cuddles.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Bigger. Much bigger. I’ll make myself so big that 
Cuddles will look hamster size. Then I’ll stuff him in the supply closet and lock 
the door.” 

“It’s a stupid plan,” Andy said. 

“I know,” Evan agreed. 

“But it’s worth a try,” Andy added. 

Evan swallowed hard and didn’t reply. He was staring across the hall at 
Andy’s locker. 

“Oh, no!” Andy cried out when she saw what Evan was gaping at. 

The locker door bulged as if about to burst open. And green goo poured out 
from the sides and the bottom. 

“The Monster Blood—it outgrew my locker!” Andy cried. 

Evan ran up to it and grabbed the door handle. He started to tug. “Is it 
locked?” 

“No,” Andy replied, hanging back. 

Evan tugged. He tugged harder. With a loud groan, he tugged with both 
hands. “It won’t open!” he cried. 

“Let me try it,” Andy said. 

But before she could step forward, the locker door burst open with a loud 
whoooosh. 

Sticky, green gunk splashed over Evan. 

He didn’t have a chance to cry out. 

It poured over him like a tall, cresting ocean wave. 

An ocean wave of Monster Blood. 

It’s burying me! Evan realized. 

The huge, sticky glob splashed out of the locker, plopped over him, 
smothering him, choking him. 

It’s sucking me in! I can’t move! 



I can’t move! 



25 


Evan shut his eyes as the heavy, green gunk rolled over his head. He shot his 
arms out, trying to push it away. 

As it swept over him, he fell to his knees. Kicking and thrashing, it forced 
him down to the floor. 

I’m stuck inside, he thought. Stuck inside... 

He felt hands grab his ankles. 

The hands tugged hard. 

He began to slide. Over the floor. Over the thick layer of Monster Blood. 

“I’ve got you!” he heard Andy cry. “I’ve got you out!” 

He opened his eyes. He saw her pulling him, tugging him out of the thick 
green gunk by the ankles. 

It clung to his clothes and his skin. But he was out. 

“Thanks,” he murmured weakly. He climbed shakily to his feet. 

He could hear Conan screaming and crying back in the classroom. There 
was still time to save him, Evan realized. 

He pulled a hunk of Monster Blood off the quivering green mound—and 
jammed it into his mouth. 

“I’m going to be sick,” Andy groaned, holding her stomach. 

Evan swallowed and reached for another mouthful. “It doesn’t taste bad,” 
he told her. “A little lemony.” 

“Don’t eat too much!” she cried, half-covering her eyes as she watched him 
swallow another mouthful. 

“I have to grow big enough so that Cuddles is hamster size compared to 
me,” Evan said. He grabbed another hunk. 

He could already feel himself start to grow. His head was already over the 
tops of the lockers. 

Back in the classroom, Conan let out another terrified wail. 

“Let’s go!” Evan boomed. His voice thundered deeply in his new, larger 
body. He could feel himself growing taller. Taller. 

He had to lower his head to get through the classroom door. 

Kids and teachers moved out of his way, crying out their surprise and 



alarm. 

He crossed the room, passed Mr. Murphy, and stepped up to the giant 
hamster. “I’m as big as Cuddles!” Evan called down to Andy. 

He reached out and lifted Conan from Cuddles’ paws. Cuddles reached out 
to take Conan back. But Evan lowered him gently to the floor. 

“Hellllp me! Helllp me! ” Conan ran bawling from the room. 

Evan turned to face the hamster. They stared at each other eye to eye. 

Cuddles’ huge pink nose twitched. He sniffed Evan, inhaling so hard that 
Evan was nearly sucked forward. 

Evan took a step back. 

Keep growing! he urged himself. I’ve got to keep growing! 

Cuddles eyed him warily, still sniffing. His watery black eyes stared hard as 
if trying to figure out if Evan was friend or foe. 

“Don’t you remember me, Cuddles?” Evan said softly. “Remember, I’m the 
one who fed you after school every day?” 

Keep growing! he silently urged himself. 

Why aren’t I growing any taller? 

Down below, he could see Andy, Mr. Murphy, and the others huddled 
against the far wall, staring up at the two giants in hushed terror. 

Keep growing! Keep growing! 

There was no way he could pick Cuddles up now, Evan realized. They were 
exactly the same height. And Cuddles outweighed him by at least a ton! 

Keep growing! 

“What’s wrong, Andy?” Evan called down to her in a trembling voice. “I 
ate tons of the stuff. Why did I stop growing?” 

“I don’t know!” she called up to him. Her voice sounded as tiny as a 
mouse’s squeak. 

He saw that she had the blue can in her hand. She was turning it over, 
reading the label. “I don’t know, Evan!” she shouted. “I don’t know why you’re 
not growing!” 

Then, as Evan turned back to face Cuddles, the hamster reached out and 
grabbed his waist with both front paws. 

“Ow!” Evan cried as the hamster tried to lift him off the floor. 

Gazing up, he saw the gaping hamster mouth open, the sharp white teeth 
emerge. 

Evan squirmed desperately, pulling himself loose. Then he wrapped both 



arms around the hamster’s middle. 

They started to wrestle. Evan fought hard, but the hamster overpowered 
him. Cuddles rolled Evan onto his back on the floor. 

Evan spun quickly away, climbed to his feet, and pulled the hamster down. 

The two giants wrestled over the floor, surrounded by the shrill screams of 
teachers and kids. 

Grow bigger! Grow bigger — now! Evan pleaded. 

But it was too late, he saw. 

The hamster lowered its hot, furry body over him. Evan could feel the 
creature’s booming heartbeat as it pressed him to the floor. 

Then its teeth rose up over Evan’s head. 

The hamster’s mouth opened wide. 

The teeth swung down. 

A wave of hot, sour hamster breath blew down over Evan. 

He shut his eyes. 

“Sorry,” he murmured to Andy. 

He held his breath and waited for the teeth to clamp down. 



26 


Evan heard a pop, like the sound of a cork flying off a bottle. 

Still sprawled on his back on the floor, Evan opened his eyes. 

“Huh?” Cuddles had disappeared. Vanished. 

Evan stared up at the startled faces of kids and teachers against the wall. 
“Wh-where’s Cuddles?” he stammered. 

Andy stood frozen like a statue, her mouth open. 

Evan slowly realized that she was nearly as big as he was. In fact, everyone 
was about his size. 

He pulled himself up to a sitting position. “Hey—I’m back to my normal 
size! ” he cried. He shook his head hard as if trying to shake away his close call 
with the giant hamster. 

“There’s Cuddles!” Andy cried, pointing. 

Evan turned to see Cuddles huddled against the wall. “He’s a little hamster 
again!” Evan exclaimed happily. He took three quick steps, bent down, and 
grabbed Cuddles between his hands. “Gotcha!” 

Holding the hamster in front of him, he turned back to Andy and the others. 
“What happened? Why did we shrink back?” 

Andy was studying the blue Monster Blood can. Suddenly she tossed back 
her dark hair, her brown eyes lit up, and she started to laugh. “It’s the expiration 
date!” she cried happily. “The expiration date on the can—it’s today! The 
Monster Blood stops working today! The magic has worn out!” 

Evan let out a whoop of joy. 

Mr. Murphy, a wide grin on his round face, hurried over and put his arm 
around Evan’s shoulders. “Fine job, Evan! Fine job!” he exclaimed. “You saved 
the school. I’m proud of you!” 

“Thanks, Mr. Murphy,” Evan replied awkwardly. 

“You’ll never make a basketball player now that you’re short again,” Mr. 
Murphy said, smiling. “But that was quite a good match with Cuddles. Have you 
ever thought of trying out for the wrestling team?” 

Andy came to Evan’s house for dinner that night. He greeted her at the door, 
eager to tell her how all the kids had apologized for not believing him about the 



Monster Blood. 

But before he could say anything, she held up a large brown envelope and 
grinned at him. 

“What’s that?” he asked, following her into the living room. 

“It’s a present my parents sent me from Europe,” she replied, her grin 
growing wider. “You won’t believe what it is.” 

She started to pull open the envelope. But the front doorbell rang. 

Evan hurried to see who it was. 

“Mr. Murphy!” he cried in surprise. 

“Hi, Evan,” the teacher said, his round body nearly filling the entire front 
stoop. “Hope I’m not interrupting your dinner.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Want to come in?” 

“No thanks,” Mr. Murphy replied. His expression turned solemn. “I came 
by because I thought you should have some sort of reward, Evan. You were a 
real hero at school today.” 

“Aw, not really,” Evan said awkwardly. He could feel his face growing hot 
and knew he was blushing. 

What kind of reward? Evan wondered, staring back at the teacher. A cash 
reward? 

Mr. Murphy raised the hamster cage into Evan’s view. “I’ve decided to 
reward you with Cuddles,” the teacher said. “I know how fond of him you are.” 

“No, please!” Evan started to plead. 

“It’s a small token,” Mr. Murphy said. “To show how grateful I am. How 
grateful we all are.” 

“Please—no—!” 

But before Evan realized it, the hamster cage was in his hand, and Mr. 
Murphy was waddling back down the driveway to his car. 

“He gave you Cuddles?” Andy asked as Evan returned to the living room 
carrying the cage. He set it down on the coffee table. 

“It’s my reward,” Evan told her, rolling his eyes. “Do you believe it?” 

“Well, you won’t believe this!” Andy declared. “Look what my parents 
found in Europe!” 

She reached into the envelope and pulled out a blue plastic can. “It’s 
Monster Blood!” 

“Oh, no!” Evan wailed. 

“They wrote that they remembered how much fun I had with the old can,” 



Andy said, holding up the blue container. “So when they saw this can in a toy 
store in Germany, they decided to send me a new one.” 

Evan’s eyes went wide with fear. “You—you’re not going to open it?” he 
demanded warily. 

“Already did,” Andy replied. “Just to take a look. But I’m not going to use 
it. Really. I promise.” 

Evan started to say something—but he was interrupted by his mother’s call 
from the kitchen. “Dinnertime, you two! Wash your hands and come to the 
table!” 

Andy set the can of Monster Blood down on the desk in the corner. They 
obediently hurried to wash their hands. 

They had a lively dinner. There was lots to talk about. They laughed and 
joked about all that had happened at school. It was easy to laugh about it now 
that it was all over. 

After dinner, Evan and Andy returned to the living room. 

Andy was the first to see that the door to the hamster cage was wide open. 
The cage was empty. 

Evan was the one who spotted Cuddles on the desk. 

“Cuddles—what are you eating?” he cried. “What are you eating?” 




DEEP TROUBLE 
Goosebumps -19 
R.L. Stine 


1 


There I was, two hundred feet under the sea. 

I was on the hunt of my life. The hunt for the Great White Stingray. 

That’s what they called him at Coast Guard Headquarters. But, me, I called 
him Joe. 

The giant stingray had already stung ten swimmers. People were afraid to 
step into the water. Panic spread all up and down the coast. 

That’s why they sent for me. 

William Deep, Jr., of Baltimore, Maryland. 

Yes, William Deep, Jr., world-famous twelve-year-old undersea explorer. 
Solver of scary ocean problems. 

I captured the Great White Shark that terrorized Myrtle Beach. I proved he 
wasn’t so great! 

I fought the giant octopus that ate the entire California Championship 
Surfing Team. 

I unplugged the electric eel that sent shock waves all over Miami. 

But now I faced the fight of my life. Joe, the Great White Stingray. 

Somewhere down deep under the sea, he lurked. 

I had everything I needed: scuba suit, flippers, mask, oxygen tank, and 
poison-dart gun. 

Wait—did something move? Just behind that giant clam? 

I raised my dart gun and waited for an attack. 

Then, suddenly, my mask clouded. I couldn’t breathe. 

I strained for breath. No air came. 

My oxygen tank! Someone must have tampered with it! 

There was no time to lose. Two hundred feet down—and no air! I had to 
surface—fast! 

I kicked my legs, desperately trying to pull myself to the surface. 

Holding my breath. My lungs about to burst. I was losing strength, getting 
dizzy. 

Would I make it? Or would I die right here, deep under the ocean, Joe the 
Stingray’s dinner? 



Panic swept over me like an ocean tide. I searched through the fogged mask 
for my diving partner. Where was she when I needed her? 

Finally, I spotted her swimming up at the surface, near the boat. 

Help me! Save me! No air! I tried to tell her, waving my arms like a 
maniac. 

Finally she noticed me. She swam toward me and dragged my dazed and 
limp body to the surface. 

I ripped off my mask and sucked in mouthfuls of air. 

“What’s your problem, Aqua Man?” she cried. “Did a jellyfish sting you?” 

My diving partner is very brave. She laughs in the face of danger. 

I struggled to catch my breath. “No air. Someone—cut off—tank—” 

Then everything went black. 



2 


My diving partner shoved my head back under the water. I opened my eyes and 
came up sputtering. 

“Get real, Billy,” she said. “Can’t you snorkel without acting like a total 
jerk?” 

I sighed. She was no fun. 

My “diving partner” was really just my bratty sister, Sheena. I was only 
pretending to be William Deep, Jr., undersea explorer. 

But would it kill Sheena to go along with it just once? 

My name actually is William Deep, Jr., but everybody calls me Billy. I’m 
twelve—I think I mentioned that already. 

Sheena is ten. She looks like me. We both have straight black hair, but mine 
is short and hers goes down to her shoulders. We’re both skinny, with knobby 
knees and elbows, and long, narrow feet. We both have dark blue eyes and thick, 
dark eyebrows. 

Other than that, we’re not alike at all. 

Sheena has no imagination. She was never afraid of monsters in her closet 
when she was little. She didn’t believe in Santa Claus or the tooth fairy, either. 
She loves to say, “There’s no such thing.” 

I dove underwater and pinched Sheena’s leg. Attack of the Giant Lobster 
Man! 

“Stop it!” she screamed. She kicked me in the shoulder. I came up for air. 

“Hey, you two,” my uncle said. “Be careful down there.” 

My uncle stood on the deck of his sea lab boat, the Cassandra. He peered 
down at Sheena and me snorkeling nearby. 

My uncle’s name is George Deep, but everybody calls him Dr. D. Even my 
dad, who is his brother, calls him Dr. D. Maybe that’s because he looks just the 
way a scientist should. 

Dr. D. is short, thin, wears glasses and a very serious, thoughtful 
expression. He has curly brown hair and a bald spot at the back of his head. 
Anyone who saw him would say, “I bet you’re a scientist.” 

Sheena and I were visiting Dr. D. on the Cassandra. Every year our parents 
let us spend our summer vacation with Dr. D. It sure beats hanging out at home. 



This summer, we were anchored just off a tiny island called Ilandra, in the 
Caribbean Sea. 

Dr. D. is a marine biologist. He specializes in tropical marine life. He 
studies the habits of tropical fish and looks for new kinds of ocean plants and 
fish that haven’t been discovered yet. 

The Cassandra is a big and sturdy boat. It is about fifty feet long. Dr. D. 
uses most of the space for labs and research rooms. Up on deck is a cockpit, 
where he steers the boat. He keeps a dinghy tied to the starboard, or right side of 
the deck, and a huge glass tank on the port, or left side. 

Sometimes Dr. D. catches very big fish and keeps them temporarily in the 
glass tank—usually just long enough to tag the fish for research, or care for them 
if they are sick or injured. 

The rest of the deck is open space, good for playing catch or sunbathing. 

Dr. D.’s research takes him all over the world. He isn’t married and doesn’t 
have any kids. He says he’s too busy staring at fish. 

But he likes kids. That’s why he invites me and Sheena to visit him every 
summer. 

“Stick close together, kids,” Dr. D. said. “And don’t swim off too far. 
Especially you, Billy.” 

He narrowed his eyes at me. That’s his “I mean it” look. He never narrows 
his eyes at Sheena. 

“There’ve been reports of some shark sightings in the area,” he said. 

“Sharks! Wow!” I cried. 

Dr. D. frowned at me. “Billy,” he said. “This is serious. Don’t leave the 
boat. And don’t go near the reef.” 

I knew he was going to say that. 

Clamshell Reef is a long, red coral reef just a few hundred yards away from 
where we were anchored. I’d been dying to explore it ever since we got there. 

“Don’t worry about me, Dr. D.,” I called up to him. “I won’t get into 
trouble.” 

Sheena muttered under her breath, “Yeah, right.” 

I reached out to give her another lobster pinch, but she dove under water. 

“Good,” said Dr. D. “Now don’t forget—if you see a shark fin, try not to 
splash around a lot. Movement will attract it. Just slowly, steadily return to the 
boat.” 

“We won’t forget,” said Sheena, who had come up behind me, splashing 



like crazy. 

I couldn’t help feeling just a little bit excited. I’d always wanted to see a 
real, live shark. 

I’d seen sharks at the aquarium, of course. But they were trapped in a glass 
tank, where they just swam around restlessly, perfectly harmless. 

Not very exciting. 

I wanted to spot a shark’s fin on the horizon, floating over the water, closer, 
closer, heading right for us.... 

In other words, I wanted adventure. 

The Cassandra was anchored out in the ocean, a few hundred yards away 
from Clamshell Reef. The reef surrounded the island. Between the reef and the 
island stretched a beautiful lagoon. 

Nothing was going to stop me from exploring that lagoon—no matter what 
Dr. D. said. 

“Come on, Billy,” Sheena called, adjusting her mask. “Let’s check out that 
school of fish.” 

She pointed to a patch of tiny ripples in the water near the bow of the boat. 
She slid the mouthpiece into her mouth and lowered her head into the water. I 
followed her to the ripples. 

Soon Sheena and I were surrounded by hundreds of tiny, neon-blue fish. 

Underwater, I always felt as if I were in a faraway world. Breathing through 
the snorkel, I could live down here with the fish and the dolphins, I thought. 
After a while, maybe I would grow flippers and a fin. 

The tiny blue fish began to swim away, and I swam with them. They were 
so great-looking! I didn’t want them to leave me behind. 

Suddenly, the fish all darted from view. I tried to follow, but they were too 

fast. 

They had vanished! 

Had something scared them away? 

I glanced around. Clumps of seaweed floated near the surface. Then I saw a 
flash of red. 

I floated closer, peering through the mask. A few yards ahead of me I saw 
bumpy red formations. Red coral. 

Oh, no, I thought. Clamshell Reef. Dr. D. told me not to swim this far. 

I began to turn around. I knew I should swim back to the boat. 

But I was tempted to stay and explore a little. After all, I was already there. 



The reef looked like a red sand castle, filled with underwater caves and 
tunnels. Small fish darted in and out of them. The fish were bright yellow and 
blue. 

Maybe I could swim over and explore one of those tunnels, I thought. How 
dangerous could it be? 

Suddenly, I felt something brush against my leg. It tickled and sent a tingle 
up my leg. 

A fish? 

I glanced around, but I didn’t see anything. 

Then I felt it again. 

A tingling against my leg. 

And then it clutched me. 

Again I turned to see what it was. Again I saw nothing. 

My heart began to race. I knew it was probably nothing dangerous. But I 
wished I could see it. 

I turned and started back for the boat, kicking hard. 

But something grabbed my right leg—and held on! 

I froze in fear. Then I frantically kicked my leg as hard as I could. 

Let go! Let go of me! 

I couldn’t see it—and I couldn’t pull free! 

The water churned and tossed as I kicked with all my strength. 

Overcome with terror, I lifted my head out of the water and choked out a 
weak cry: “Help!” 

But it was no use. 

Whatever it was, it kept pulling me down. Down. 

Down to the bottom of the sea. 



3 


“Help!” I cried out again. “Sheena! Dr. D.!” 

I was dragged below the surface again. I felt the slimy tentacle tighten 
around my ankle. 

As I sank underwater, I turned—and saw it. 

It loomed huge and dark. 

A sea monster! 

Through the churning waters, it glared at me with one giant brown eye. The 
terrifying creature floated underwater like an enormous, dark green balloon. Its 
mouth opened in a silent cry, revealing two rows of jagged, sharp teeth. 

An enormous octopus! But it had at least twelve tentacles! 

Twelve long, slimy tentacles. One was wrapped around my ankle. Another 
one slid toward me. 

NO! 

My arms thrashed the water. 

I gulped in mouthfuls of air. 

I struggled to the surface—but the huge creature dragged me down again. 

I couldn’t believe it. As I sank, scenes from my life actually flashed before 
my eyes. 

I saw my parents, waving to me as I boarded the yellow school bus for my 
first day of school. 

Mom and Dad! I’ll never see them again! 

What a way to go, I thought. Killed by a sea monster! 

No one will believe it. 

Everything started to turn red. I felt dizzy, weak. 

But something was pulling me, pulling me up. 

Up to the surface. Away from the tentacled monster. 

I opened my eyes, choking and sputtering. 

I stared up at Dr. D! 

“Billy! Are you all right?” Dr. D. studied me with concern. 

I coughed and nodded. I kicked my right leg. The slimy tentacle was gone. 

The dark creature had vanished. 



“I heard you screaming and saw you thrashing about,” said Dr. D. “I swam 
over from the boat as fast as I could. What happened?” 

Dr. D. had a yellow life jacket over his shoulders. He slipped a rubber 
lifesaver ring over my head. I floated easily now, the life ring under my arms. 

I had lost my flippers in the struggle. My mask and snorkel dangled around 
my neck. 

Sheena swam over and floated beside me, treading water. 

“It grabbed my leg!” I cried breathlessly. “It tried to pull me under!” 

“What grabbed your leg, Billy?” asked Dr. D. “I don’t see anything around 
here—” 

“It was a sea monster,” I told him. “A huge one! I felt its slimy tentacle 
grabbing my leg.... Ouch!” 

Something pinched my toe. 

“It’s back!” I shrieked in horror. 

Sheena popped out of the water and shook her wet hair, laughing. 

“That was me, you dork!” she cried. 

“Billy, Billy,” Dr. D. murmured. “You and your wild imagination.” He 
shook his head. “You nearly scared me to death. Please—don’t ever do that 
again. Your leg probably got tangled in a piece of seaweed, that’s all.” 

“But—but—!” I sputtered. 

He dipped his hand in the water and pulled up a handful of slimy green 
strings. “There’s seaweed everywhere.” 

“But I saw it!” I shouted. “I saw its tentacles, its big, pointy teeth!” 

“There’s no such thing as sea monsters,” said Sheena. Miss Know-It-All. 

“Let’s discuss it on the boat,” my uncle said, dropping the clump of 
seaweed back in the water. 

“Come on. Swim back with me. And stay away from the reef. Swim around 
it.” 

He turned around and started swimming toward the Cassandra. I saw that 
the sea monster had pulled me into the lagoon. The reef lay between us and the 
boat. But there was a break in the reef we could swim through. 

I followed them, thinking angry thoughts. 

Why didn’t they believe me? 

I had seen the creature grab my leg. It wasn’t a stupid clump of seaweed. It 
wasn’t my imagination. 

I was determined to prove them wrong. I’d find that creature and show it to 



them myself—someday. But not today. 

Now I was ready to get back to the safety of the boat. 

I swam up to Sheena and called, “Race you to the boat.” 

“Last one there is a chocolate-covered jellyfish!” she cried. 

Sheena can’t refuse a race. She started speeding toward the boat, but I 
caught her by the arm. 

“Wait,” I said. “No fair. You’re wearing flippers. Take them off.” 

“Too bad!” she cried, and pulled away. “See you at the boat!” I watched her 
splash away, building a good lead. 

She’s not going to win, I decided. 

I stared at the reef up ahead. 

It would be faster just to swim over the reef. A shortcut. 

I turned and started to swim straight toward the red coral. 

“Billy! Get back here!” Dr. D. shouted. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him. 

The reef loomed ahead. I was almost there. 

I saw Sheena splashing ahead of me. I kicked extra-hard. I knew she’d 
never have the guts to swim over the reef. She’d swim around the end of it. I 
would cut through and beat her. 

But my arms suddenly began to ache. I wasn’t used to swimming so far. 

Maybe I can stop at the reef and rest my arms for a second, I thought. 

I reached the reef. I turned around. Sheena was swimming to the left, 
around the reef. I figured I had a few seconds to rest. 

I stepped onto the red coral reef— 

—and screamed in horror! 



4 


My foot burned as if it were on fire. The throbbing pain shot up my leg. 

I screamed and dove into the water. 

When I surfaced, I heard Sheena yelling, “Dr. D.! Come quick!” 

My foot burned, even in the cold ocean water. 

Dr. D. came up beside me. “Billy, what’s the problem now?” he demanded. 
“I saw him do something really stupid,” Sheena said, smirking. 

If my foot hadn’t been burning up, I definitely would have punched out her 
lights. 

“My foot!” I moaned. “I stepped on the reef—and—and—” 

Dr. D. held on to the lifesaver ring around my waist. “Ow. That’s painful,” 
he said, reaching up to pat my shoulder. “But you’ll be all right. The burning will 
stop in a little while.” 

He pointed to the reef. “All that bright red coral is fire coral.” 

“Huh? Fire coral?” I stared back at it. 

“Even I knew that!” Sheena said. 

“It’s covered with a mild poison,” my uncle continued. “When it touches 
your skin, it burns like fire.” 

Now he tells me, I thought. 

“Don’t you know anything ?” Sheena asked sarcastically. 

She was asking for it. She really was. 

“You’re lucky you only burned your foot,” Dr. D. said. “Coral can be very 
sharp. You could have cut your foot and gotten poison into your bloodstream. 
Then you’d really be in trouble.” 

“Wow! What kind of trouble?” Sheena asked. She seemed awfully eager to 
hear about all the terrible things that could have happened to me. 

Dr. D.’s expression turned serious. “The poison could paralyze you,” he 

said. 

“Oh great,” I said. 

“So keep away from the red coral from now on,” Dr. D. warned. “And stay 
away from the lagoon, too.” 

“But that’s where the sea monster lives!” I protested. “We have to go back 



there. I have to show it to you!” 

Sheena bobbed in the blue-green water. “No such thing, no such thing,” she 
chanted. Her favorite phrase. “No such thing—right, Dr. D.?” 

“Well, you never know,” Dr. D. replied thoughtfully. “We don’t know all of 
the creatures that live in the oceans, Sheena. It’s better to say that scientists have 
never seen one.” 

“So there, She-Ra,” I said. 

Sheena spit a stream of water at me. She hates it when I call her She-Ra. 
“Listen, kids—I’m serious about staying away from this area,” said Dr. D. 
“There may not be a sea monster in that lagoon, but there could be sharks, 
poisonous fish, electric eels. Any number of dangerous creatures. Don’t swim 
over there.” 

He paused and frowned at me, as if to make sure I’d been paying attention. 
“How’s your foot feeling, Billy?” he asked. 

“It’s a little better now,” I told him. 

“Good. Enough adventure for one morning. Let’s get back to the boat. It’s 
almost lunchtime.” 

We all started swimming back to the Cassandra. 

As I kicked, I felt something tickle my leg again. 

Seaweed? 

No. 

It brushed against my thigh like— fingers. 

“Cut it out, Sheena,” I shouted angrily. I spun around to splash water in her 

face. 

But she wasn’t there. She wasn’t anywhere near me. 

She was up ahead, swimming beside Dr. D. 

Sheena couldn’t possibly have tickled me. 

But something definitely did. 

I stared down at the water, suddenly gripped with terror. 

What was down there? 

Why was it teasing me like that? 

Was it preparing to grab me again and pull me down forever? 



5 


Alexander DuBrow, Dr. D.’s assistant, helped us aboard the boat. 

“Hey, I heard shouting,” Alexander said. “Is everything okay?” 

“Everything is fine, Alexander,” said Dr. D. “Billy stepped on some fire 
coral, but he’s all right.” 

As I climbed up the ladder, Alexander grabbed my hands and pulled me 
aboard. 

“Wow, Billy,” he said. “Fire coral. I accidentally bumped into the fire coral 
my first day here. I saw stars. I really did, man. You sure you’re okay?” 

I nodded and showed him my foot. “It feels better now. But that wasn’t the 
worst thing that happened. I was almost eaten by a sea monster!” 

“No such thing, no such thing,” Sheena chanted. 

“I really saw it,” I insisted. “They don’t believe me. But it was there. In the 
lagoon. It was big and green and—” 

Alexander smiled. “If you say so, Billy,” he said. He winked at Sheena. 

I wanted to punch out his lights, too. 

Big deal science student. What did he know? 

Alexander was in his early twenties. But, unlike Dr. D., he didn’t look like a 
scientist. 

He looked more like a football player. He was very tall, about six feet four 
inches, and muscular. He had thick, wavy blond hair and blue eyes that crinkled 
in the corners. He had broad shoulders, and big, powerful-looking hands. He 
spent a lot of time in the sun and had a smooth, dark tan. 

“I hope you’re all hungry,” Alexander said. “I made chicken salad 
sandwiches for lunch.” 

“Oh. Great,” Sheena said, rolling her eyes. 

Alexander did most of the cooking. He thought he was good at it. But he 
wasn’t. 

I went below deck to my cabin to change out of my wet bathing suit. My 
cabin was really just a tiny sleeping cubby with a cupboard for my things. 
Sheena had one just like it. Dr. D. and Alexander had bigger cabins that they 
could actually walk around in. 

We ate in the galley, which was what Dr. D. called the boat’s kitchen. It had 



a built-in table and built-in seats, and a small area for cooking. 

When I entered the galley, Sheena was already sitting at the table. There 
was a big sandwich on a plate in front of her, and one waiting for me. 

Neither of us was too eager to try Alexander’s chicken salad. The night 
before, we had had Brussels sprouts casserole. For breakfast this morning, he 
served us whole wheat pancakes that sank to the bottom of my stomach like the 
Titanic going down! 

“You first,” I whispered to my sister. 

“Uh-uh,” Sheena said, shaking her head. “You try it. You’re older.” 

My stomach growled. I sighed. There was nothing to do but taste it. 

I sank my teeth into the sandwich and started chewing. 

Not bad, I thought at first. A little chicken, a little mayonnaise. It actually 
tasted like a regular chicken salad sandwich. 

Then, suddenly, my tongue started to burn. My whole mouth was on fire! 

I let out a cry and grabbed for the glass of iced tea in front of me. I downed 
the entire glass. 

“Fire coral!” I screamed. “You put fire coral in the chicken salad!” 

Alexander laughed. “Just a little chili pepper. For taste. You like it?” 

“I think I’d rather have cereal for lunch,” Sheena said, setting down her 
sandwich. “If you don’t mind.” 

“You can’t have cereal for every meal,” Alexander replied, frowning. “No 
wonder you’re so skinny, Sheena. You never eat anything but cereal. Where’s 
your spirit of adventure?” 

“I think I’ll have cereal, too,” I said sheepishly. “Just for a change of pace.” 

Dr. D. came into the galley. “What’s for lunch?” he asked. 

“Chicken salad sandwiches,” said Alexander. “I made them spicy.” 

“Very spicy,” I warned him. 

Dr. D. glanced at me and raised an eyebrow. “Oh, really?” he said. “You 
know, I’m not very hungry. I think I’ll just have cereal for lunch.” 

“Maybe Billy and I could make dinner tonight,” Sheena offered. She poured 
cereal into a bowl and added milk. “It’s not fair for Alexander to cook all the 
time.” 

“That’s a nice idea, Sheena,” said Dr. D. “What do you two know how to 
make?” 

“I know how to make brownies from a mix,” I offered. 

“And I know how to make fudge,” said Sheena. 



“Hmm,” said Dr. D. “Maybe I’ll cook tonight. How does grilled fish 
sound?” 

“Great!” I said. 

After lunch, Dr. D. went into his office to go over some notes. Alexander led 
Sheena and me into the main lab to show us around. 

The work lab was really cool. It had three big glass tanks along the wall 
filled with weird, amazing fish. 

The smallest tank held two bright yellow sea horses and an underwater 
trumpet. The underwater trumpet was a long, red-and-white fish shaped like a 
tube. There were also a lot of guppies swimming around in this tank. 

Another tank held some flame angelfish, which were orange-red like fire, 
and a harlequin tusk-fish, with orange-and-aqua tiger stripes for camouflage. 

The biggest tank held a long, black-and-yellow snakelike thing with a 
mouth full of teeth. 

“Ugh!” Sheena made a disgusted face as she stared at the long fish. “That 
one is really gross!” 

“That’s a black ribbon eel,” said Alexander. “He bites, but he’s not deadly. 
We call him Biff.” 

I snarled through the glass at Biff, but he ignored me. 

I wondered what it would be like to come face to face with Biff in the 
ocean. His teeth looked nasty, but he wasn’t nearly as big as the sea monster. I 
figured William Deep, Jr., world-famous undersea explorer, could handle it. 

I turned away from the fish tanks and stood by the control panel, staring at 
all the knobs and dials. 

“What does this do?” I asked. I pushed a button. A loud horn blared. We all 
jumped, startled. 

“It honks the horn,” Alexander said, laughing. 

“Dr. D. told Billy not to touch things without asking first,” said Sheena. 
“He’s told him a million times. He never listens.” 

“Shut up, She-Ra!” I said sharply. 

“You shut up.” 

“Hey—no problem,” said Alexander, raising both hands, motioning for us 
to chill out. “No harm done.” 

I turned back to the panel. Most of the dials were lit up, with little red 
indicators moving across their faces. I noticed one dial that was dark, its red 



indicator still. 

“What’s this for?” I asked, pointing to the dark dial. “It looks like you 
forgot to turn it on.” 

“Oh, that controls the Nansen bottle,” Alexander said. “It’s broken.” 

“What’s a Nansen bottle?” asked Sheena. 

“It collects samples of seawater from way down deep,” said Alexander. 

“Why don’t you fix it?” I asked. 

“We can’t afford to,” said Alexander. 

“Why not?” asked Sheena. “Doesn’t the university give you money?” 

We both knew that Dr. D.’s research was paid for by a university in Ohio. 

“They gave us money for our research,” Alexander explained. “But it’s 
almost gone. We’re waiting to see if they’ll give us more. In the meantime, we 
don’t have the money to fix things.” 

“What if the Cassandra breaks down or something?” I asked. 

“Then I guess we’ll have to put her in dry dock for a while,” said 
Alexander. “Or else find a new way to get more money.” 

“Wow,” said Sheena. “That would mean no more summer visits.” 

I hated to think of the Cassandra just sitting on a dock. Even worse was the 
thought of Dr. D. being stuck on land with no fish to study. 

Our uncle was miserable whenever he had to go ashore. He didn’t feel 
comfortable unless he was on a boat. I know, because one Christmas he came to 
our house to visit. 

Usually Dr. D. is fun to be with. But that Christmas visit was a nightmare. 

Dr. D. spent the whole time pacing through the house. He barked orders at 
us like a sea captain. 

“Billy, sit up straight!” he yelled at me. “Sheena, swab the decks!” 

He just wasn’t himself. 

Finally, on Christmas Eve, my dad couldn’t take it anymore. He told Dr. D. 
to shape up or ship out. 

Dr. D. ended up spending a good part of Christmas Day in the bathtub 
playing with my old toy boats. As long as he stayed in the water, he was back to 
normal. 

I never wanted to see Dr. D. stranded on land again. 

“Don’t worry, kids,” Alexander said. “Dr. D. has always found a way to get 
by.” 


I hoped Alexander was right. 



I studied another strange dial, marked Sonar Probes. 

“Hey, Alexander,” I said. “Will you show me how the sonar probes work?” 

“Sure,” said Alexander. “Just let me finish a few chores.” 

He walked over to the first fish tank. He scooped out a few guppies with a 
small net. 

“Who wants to feed Biff today?” 

“Not me,” said Sheena. “Yuck!” 

“No way!” I said as I stepped to a porthole and peered out. 

I thought I heard a motor outside. So far we had seen very few other boats. 
Not many people passed by Ilandra. 

A white boat chugged up to the side of the Cassandra. It was smaller but 
newer than our boat. A logo on the side said Marina Zoo. 

A man and a woman stood on the deck of the zoo boat. They were both 
neatly dressed in khaki pants and button-down shirts. The man had a short, neat 
haircut, and the woman’s brown hair was pulled back in a ponytail. She carried a 
black briefcase. 

The man waved to someone on the deck of the Cassandra. I figured he had 
to be waving at Dr. D. 

Now Sheena and Alexander stood beside me at the porthole, watching. 

“Who’s that?” Sheena asked. 

Alexander cleared his throat. “I’d better go see what this is about,” he said. 

He handed Sheena the net with the guppies in it. “Here,” he said. “Feed 
Biff. I’ll be back later.” 

He left the lab in a hurry. 

Sheena looked at the squirming guppies in the net and made a face. 

“I’m not going to stay here and watch Biff eat these poor guppies.” She 
stuck the net in my hand and ran out of the cabin. 

I didn’t want to watch Biff eat the poor fish, either. But I didn’t know what 
else to do with them. 

I quickly dumped the guppies into Biff’s tank. The eel’s head shot forward. 
His teeth clamped down on a fish. The guppy disappeared. Biff grabbed for 
another one. 

He was a fast eater. 

I dropped the net on a table and walked out of the lab. 

I made my way down the narrow passageway, planning to go up on deck 
for some air. 



I wondered if Dr. D. would let me do some more snorkeling this afternoon. 

If he said yes, maybe I would swim toward the lagoon, see if I could find 
any sign of the sea monster. 

Was I scared? 

Yes. 

But I was also determined to prove to my sister and uncle that I wasn’t 
crazy. That I wasn’t making it up. 

I was passing Dr. D.’s office when I heard voices. I figured Dr. D. and 
Alexander must be in there with the two people from the zoo. 

I paused for just a second. I didn’t mean to eavesdrop, I swear. But the man 
from the zoo had a loud voice, and I couldn’t help but hear him. 

And what he said was the most amazing thing I had ever heard in my 
whole, entire life. 

“I don’t care how you do it, Dr. Deep,” the man bellowed. “But I want you 
to find that mermaid!” 



6 


A mermaid! 

Was he serious? 

I couldn’t believe it. Did he really want my uncle to find a real, live 
mermaid? 

I knew Sheena would start chanting, “No such thing, no such thing.” But 
here was a grown man, a man who worked for a zoo, talking about a mermaid. It 
had to be real! 

My heart started to pound with excitement. I might be one of the first 
people on Earth ever to see a mermaid! I thought. 

And then I had an even better thought: What if I was the one to find her? 

I’d be famous! I’d be on TV and everything! 

William Deep, Jr., the famous sea explorer! 

Well, after I heard that, I couldn’t just walk away. I had to hear more. 

Holding my breath, I pressed my ear to the door and listened. 

“Mr. Showalter, Ms. Wickman, please understand,” I heard Dr. D. saying. 
“I’m a scientist, not a circus trainer. My work is serious. I can’t waste my time 
looking for fairy tale creatures.” 

“We’re quite serious, Dr. Deep,” said Ms. Wickman. “There is a mermaid in 
these waters. And if anyone can find her, you can.” 

I heard Alexander ask, “What makes you think there’s really a mermaid out 
there?” 

“A fisherman from a nearby island spotted her,” replied the man from the 
zoo. “He said he got pretty close to her—and he’s sure she’s real. He saw her 
near the reef —this reef, just off Ilandra.” 

The reef! Maybe she lives in the lagoon! 

I leaned closer to the door. I didn’t want to miss a word of this. 

“Some of these fishermen are very superstitious, Mr. Showalter,” my uncle 
scoffed. “For years there have been stories... but no real reason to believe them.” 

“We didn’t believe the man ourselves,” said the woman. “Not at first. But 
we asked some other fishermen in the area, and they claim to have seen the 
mermaid, too. And I think they’re telling the truth. Their descriptions of her 
match, down to the smallest detail.” 



I could hear my uncle’s desk chair creak. I imagined him leaning forward as 
he asked, “And, how, exactly, did they describe her?” 

“They said she looked like a young girl,” Mr. Showalter told him. “Except 
for the”—he cleared his throat—“the fish tail. She’s small, delicate, with long, 
blond hair.” 

“They described her tail as shiny and bright green,” said the woman. “I 
know it sounds incredible, Dr. Deep. But when we spoke to the fishermen, we 
were convinced that they really saw a mermaid!” 

There was a pause. 

Was I missing something? I pressed my ear to the door. I heard my uncle 
ask, “And, why, exactly, do you want to capture this mermaid?” 

“Obviously, a real, live mermaid would be a spectacular attraction at a zoo 
like ours,” said the woman. “People from all over the world would flock to see 
her. The Marina Zoo would make millions of dollars.” 

“We are prepared to pay you very well for your trouble, Dr. Deep,” said Mr. 
Showalter. “I understand you are running out of money. What if the university 
refuses to give you more? It would be terrible if you had to stop your important 
work just because of that.” 

“The Marina Zoo can promise you one million dollars,” said the woman. “If 
you find the mermaid. I’m sure your lab could run for a long time on that much 
money.” 

A million dollars! I thought. How could Dr. D. turn down that kind of 
money? 

My heart pounded with excitement. I pushed against the door, straining to 

hear. 


What would my uncle’s answer be? 



7 


Leaning hard against the door, I heard Dr. D. let out a long, low whistle. “That’s 
quite a lot of money, Ms. Wickman,” I heard him say. 

There was a long pause. Then he continued. “But even if mermaids existed, 
I wouldn’t feel right about capturing one for a zoo to put on display.” 

“I promise you we would take excellent care of her,” replied Mr. Showalter. 
“Our dolphins and whales are very well cared for. The mermaid, of course, 
would get extra-special treatment.” 

“And, remember, Dr. Deep,” said Ms. Wickman. “If you don’t find her, 
someone else will. And there’s no guarantee that they will treat the mermaid as 
well as we will.” 

“I suppose you’re right,” I heard my uncle reply. “It would certainly be a 
big boost to my research if I found her.” 

“Then you’ll do it?” asked Mr. Showalter eagerly. 

Say yes, Dr. D.! I thought. Say yes! 

I pressed my whole body against the door. “Yes,” my uncle answered. “If 
there really is a mermaid, I’ll find her.” 

Excellent! I thought. 

“Very good,” said Ms. Wickman. 

“Excellent decision,” Mr. Showalter added enthusiastically. “I knew we had 
come to the right man for the job.” 

“We’ll be back in a couple of days to see how the search is going. I hope 
you’ll have some good news by then,” Ms. Wickman said. 

“That’s not much time,” I heard Alexander remark. 

“We know,” Ms. Wickman replied. “But, obviously, the sooner you find 
her, the better.” 

“And, please,” Mr. Showalter said, “please keep this a secret. No one must 
know about the mermaid. I’m sure you can imagine what would happen if—” 

CRASSSSSSSH! 

I lost my balance. I fell against the door. 

To my shock, it swung open—and I tumbled into the room. 



8 


I landed in a heap in the center of the cabin floor. 

Dr. D., Mr. Showalter, Ms. Wickman, and Alexander all gaped at me with 
their mouths open. I guess they hadn’t expected me to drop in. 

“Uh... hi, everyone,” I murmured. I felt my face burning, and knew that I 
was blushing. “Nice day for a mermaid hunt.” 

Mr. Showalter jumped to his feet angrily. He glared at my uncle. “This was 
supposed to be a secret!” 

Alexander strode across the room and helped me to my feet. “Don’t worry 
about Billy,” he said. He put a protective arm around me. “You can trust him.” 

“I’m very embarrassed,” Dr. D. told his visitors. “This is my nephew, Billy 
Deep. He and his sister are visiting me for a few weeks.” 

“Can they keep our secret?” asked Ms. Wickman. 

Dr. D. turned his gaze on Alexander. Alexander nodded. 

“Yes, I’m sure they can,” said Dr. D. “Billy won’t say anything to anyone. 
Right, Billy?” 

He narrowed his eyes at me. I really do hate it when he does that. But this 
time I couldn’t blame him. 

I shook my head. “No. I won’t tell anyone. I swear.” 

“Just to be on the safe side, Billy,” said Dr. D., “don’t mention the mermaid 
to Sheena. She’s too young to have to keep a big secret like this.” 

“I promise,” I replied solemnly. I raised my right hand as if swearing an 
oath. “I won’t breathe a word to Sheena.” 

This was so cool! 

I knew the biggest secret in the world—and Sheena wouldn’t have a clue! 

The man and woman from the zoo exchanged glances. I could see they 
were still worried. 

Alexander said, “You really can trust Billy. He’s very serious for someone 
his age.” 

You bet I’m serious, I thought. 

I’m William Deep, Jr., world-famous mermaid catcher. 

Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman seemed to relax a little. 



“Good,” said Ms. Wickman. She shook hands with Dr. D., Alexander, and 
me. 

Mr. Showalter gathered up some papers and put them into the briefcase. 
“We’ll see you in a few days, then,” said Ms. Wickman. “Good luck.” 

I won’t need luck, I thought, watching them roar away on their boat a few 
minutes later. 

I won’t need luck because I have skill. And daring. 

My head spun with all kinds of exciting thoughts. 

Would I let Sheena be on TV with me after I single-handedly captured the 
mermaid? 

Probably not. 

That night I sneaked off the boat and slipped into the dark water. I swam 
noiselessly toward the lagoon. 

I glanced back at the Cassandra. It floated quietly. All the portholes were 

dark. 

Good, I thought. No one is awake to notice that I’m gone. No one knows 
I’m out here. No one knows I’m swimming in the sea at night, all alone. 

Swimming steadily, easily, under the silvery moonlight, I made my way 
around the reef and into the dark lagoon. 

I slowed my stroke just past the reef. 

My eyes darted eagerly around the lagoon. The waves lapped gently under 
me. The water sparkled as if a million tiny diamonds floated on the surface. 
Where was the mermaid? 

I knew she was there. I knew I would find her here. 

From deep below me, I heard a low rumble. 

I listened hard. The sound, faint at first, grew louder. 

The waves tossed as the sound became a steady roar. 

It rumbled like an earthquake. An earthquake on the ocean floor. 

The waves tumbled and tossed. I struggled to stay on top of them. 

What was happening? 

Suddenly, from the middle of the lagoon, a huge wave swelled. It rose 
higher, like a gigantic geyser. 

Higher. Over my head. As tall as a building! 

A tidal wave? 

No. 



The wave broke. 

The dark creature pushed up underneath it. 

Water slid off its grotesque body. Its single eye stared out darkly at me. Its 
tentacles writhed and stretched. 

I screamed. 

The monster blinked its muddy brown eye at me. 

I tried to turn and swim away. 

But it was too fast. 

The tentacles whipped out—and grabbed me, tightening, tightening around 
my waist. 

Then a slimy, cold tentacle wrapped around my neck and started to squeeze. 



9 


“I—I can’t breathe!” I managed to choke out. 

I tugged at the tentacle twining around my throat. 

“Help me—somebody!” 

I opened my eyes—and stared up at the ceiling. 

I was lying in bed. 

In my cabin. 

The sheet was wrapped tightly around me. 

I took a deep breath and waited for my heart to stop thudding. A dream. 

Only a dream. 

I rubbed my eyes, lifted myself, and peered out the porthole. The sun was 
just rising over the horizon. The sky was morning red. The water a hazy purple. 

Squinting past the reef, I saw the lagoon. Perfectly still. Not a sea monster 
in sight. 

I wiped the sweat from my forehead with my pajama sleeve. 

No need to be afraid, I told myself. It was just a dream. A bad dream. 

I shook my head, trying to forget about the sea monster. 

I couldn’t let it scare me. I couldn’t let it stop me from finding that 
mermaid. 

Was anyone up? Had I yelled out loud in my sleep? 

I listened carefully. I could hear only the creaking of the boat, the splash of 
waves against its side. 

The pink morning sunlight cheered me. The dark water looked inviting. 

I slipped into my bathing suit and crept out of my cabin as quietly as I 
could. I didn’t want anyone to hear me. 

In the galley I saw a half-empty pot of coffee sitting on the warmer. That 
meant Dr. D. was already up. 

I tiptoed down the passageway and listened. I could hear him puttering 
around in the main lab. 

I grabbed my snorkel, flippers, and mask and went up on deck. Nobody up 
there. 

The coast was clear. 



Silently, I climbed down the ladder, slipped into the water, and snorkeled 
toward the lagoon. 

I know it was crazy to sneak away like that. But you can’t imagine how 
excited I was. Even in my wildest daydreams as William Deep, Jr., undersea 
explorer, I never thought I would see a real, live mermaid! 

As I snorkeled toward the lagoon, I tried to imagine what she would look 

like. 

Mr. Showalter had said she looked like a young girl with long, blond hair 
and a green fish tail. 

Weird, I thought. 

Half-human, half-fish. 

I tried to imagine my own legs replaced by a fish tail. 

I’d be the greatest swimmer on Earth if I had a fish tail, I thought. I could 
win the Olympics without even practicing. 

I wonder if she’s pretty? I thought. And I wonder if she can talk! I hope she 
can. She can tell me all kinds of secrets of the oceans. 

I wonder how she breathes underwater? 

I wonder if she thinks like a human or like a fish? 

So many questions. 

This is going to be the greatest adventure of my life, I thought. After I’m 
famous, I’ll write a book about my undersea adventures. I’ll call it Courage of 
the Deep, by William Deep, Jr. Maybe someone will even turn it into a movie. 

I raised my head and saw that I was nearing the reef. I concentrated on 
keeping away from it. I didn’t want to touch that fire coral again. 

I couldn’t wait to explore the lagoon. I was so excited, I forgot all about the 
terrifying dream I had had the night before. 

I kicked my legs carefully, watching out for red coral. 

I was nearly past the reef when I felt something brush my leg. 

“Oh!” I cried out and swallowed a mouthful of salty water. 

Sputtering and choking, I felt something wrap around my ankle. 

As it grabbed at me, it scratched my ankle. 

This time I knew for sure it wasn’t seaweed. 

Seaweed doesn’t have claws! 



10 


Ignoring the panic that nearly froze me, I kicked and thrashed with all my 
strength. 

“Stop it! Stop kicking me!” a voice screamed. 

The mermaid? 

“Hey—!” I cried out angrily as Sheena’s head appeared beside me. 

She pulled up her snorkeling mask. “I didn’t scratch you that hard!” she 
snapped. “You don’t have to go crazy!” 

“What are you doing here?” I cried. 

“What are you doing here?” she demanded nastily. “You know Dr. D. told 
us not to swim here.” 

“Then you shouldn’t be here —should you?” I shouted. 

“I knew you were up to something, so I followed you,” Sheena replied, 
adjusting her mask. 

“I’m not up to anything,” I lied. “I’m just snorkeling.” 

“Sure, Billy. You’re just snorkeling at six-thirty in the morning exactly 
where you’re not supposed to —and where you burned your foot on that fire 
coral yesterday. You’re either up to something, or you’re totally crazy!” She 
squinted at me, waiting for a response. 

What a choice! I was either up to something, or crazy. Which should I 
admit to? 

If I admitted I was up to something, I’d have to tell her about the mermaid 
—and I couldn’t do that. 

“Okay,” I said with a casual shrug. “I guess I’m crazy.” 

“Well, big news,” she muttered sarcastically. “Come on back to the boat, 
Billy,” said Sheena. “Dr. D. will be looking for us.” 

“You go back. I’ll be there in a little while.” 

“Billy,” said Sheena. “Dr. D. is going to be very mad. He’s probably ready 
to hop in the dinghy and search for us right now.” 

I was about to give up and go with her. Then, out of the corner of my eye, I 
saw a big splash on the other side of the reef. 

The mermaid! I thought. That’s got to be her! If I don’t go look for her now, 
I might miss her! 



I turned away from Sheena and started swimming very fast, straight for the 

reef. 

I could hear Sheena screaming, “Billy! Come back! Billy!” 

I thought I heard an extra note of panic in her voice, but I ignored it. Just 
Sheena trying to scare me again, I thought. 

“Billy!” she screamed again. “Billy!” I kept on swimming. No way I was 
going to stop now. But as it turned out, I should have listened to her. 



11 


Swimming fast, I raised my head, searching for a good place to swim safely over 
the fire coral. 

I saw another splash. Across the lagoon. Near the shore. 

That’s got to be the mermaid! I thought excitedly. 

I stared hard, trying to catch a glimpse of her. 

I thought I saw some kind of fin. 

I made my way past the reef into the deep, still waters of the lagoon. I 
strained to see the mermaid, but my mask had fogged. 

Rats! I thought. What a time for my mask to start leaking! 

I came up for air and pulled off the mask. I hoped I wouldn’t lose sight of 
the mermaid because of this. 

I wiped the water from my eyes and, leaving the mask wrapped around my 
wrist, stared toward the lagoon. 

That’s when I saw it. A few hundred yards away. 

Not the green fish tail of a mermaid. 

The fin I saw was a gray-white triangle sticking straight up in the water. 

The fin of a hammerhead shark. 

As I stared in horror, the fin turned in the water, and then ripped toward me, 
moving steady and straight as a torpedo. 



12 


Where was Sheena? 

Was she still behind me? 

I glanced back. I could see her in the distance, splashing back to the boat. 

I was forced to forget about Sheena as the gray fin swiftly moved closer. 

I thrashed my arms in the water, trying to swim away. 

When the shark swam right past me, I stopped thrashing. 

Would it go away? Would it leave me alone? 

My heart in my throat, I started swimming in the other direction, toward the 
reef. Away from the shark. 

I kept my eyes on that fin. 

It began to turn. The shark’s fin streamed toward me in a wide arc. 

“Ohhh.” I let out a terrified groan as I realized it was circling me. 

Now I didn’t know which way to go. The shark swam between me and the 
boat. If I could turn around and climb on to the reef, maybe I would be safe. 

The huge fin slid closer. 

I plunged toward the reef. I knew I had to keep distance between me and 
the shark. 

Suddenly, the fin shot up in front of me—between me and the reef. 

The shark kept circling, closing in, swimming faster and faster, making the 
circle smaller as he swam. 

I was trapped. But I couldn’t stay still. I couldn’t just float there, waiting for 
the shark to eat me. 

I had to fight. I kicked my legs in a panic as I swam toward the reef. 

I was nearer to the reef now. But the shark’s circles grew smaller, smaller. 

I breathed in quick, shallow gasps. I couldn’t think clearly. I was too 
terrified. The same two words echoed in my brain: The shark. The shark. 

Over and over again. The shark. The shark. 

The shark swam around me in a tight circle. His tail swished, sending up 
waves of water over me. 

The shark. The shark. 

I stared at the monster in wide-eyed horror. He swam so close, I could see 



him clearly. He was big—at least ten feet long. His head was wide and hideous, 
long like the head of a hammer, with an eye on each end. 

I heard my voice quivering, “No... no...” 

Something cold brushed my leg. 

The shark. The shark. 

My stomach lurched. I threw my head back and let out a howl of sheer 
terror. 

“Aaaaaiiii!” 

Pain jolted down my spine. 

The shark had bumped me with its snout. My body rose out of the water, 
then hit the surface with a smack. 

I froze. 

The shark was hungry. 

It wanted to fight. 

It circled me again, then zoomed straight for me. 

Its jaws opened. I saw rows and rows of sharp teeth. 

I screamed out a hoarse, “NO!” I thrashed, panicked. I kicked with all my 
strength. 

The razor teeth brushed by, just missing my leg. 

The reef. I had to get to the reef. It was my only chance. 

I dove for the coral. The shark plunged toward me. I dodged it once more. 

I grabbed the red coral. Pain shot through my hand. The fire coral. 

I didn’t care. 

The top of the reef sat just above the surface of the water. I tried to pull 
myself up. My whole body stung. 

I had almost made it. Soon I’d be safe. 

With a mighty kick, I hoisted myself onto the reef—and was yanked back 
into the water. 

My stomach slammed against the side of the reef. I felt a sharp stab of pain 
in my leg. 

I tried to pull my leg away. I couldn’t. 

It was caught in the jaws of the shark. 

My mind screamed with terror. 

The shark. The shark. 

It’s got me! 



13 


My entire body burned with pain. I slipped heavily into the water. 

The shark knew he had me. I had no strength left to fight. 

Then something splashed nearby. 

The shark released my leg and jerked toward the splash. 

I had no time to catch my breath. The shark circled back. It charged at me. 

The gaping jaws moved in for the kill. 

I shut my eyes and let out a shrill scream of terror. 

A second passed. Then another. 

Nothing happened. 

I heard a loud thump. 

I opened my eyes. 

Something had come between me and the shark, a few feet in front of me. 

I stared. The water churned white. A long, shiny green fish tail rose out of 
the water and splashed back down. 

Another fish was fighting the shark! 

The shark rolled over, then attacked. The green fish tail smacked the shark 
hard. The shark went under. 

I couldn’t see what was happening. The water rocked higher, tossing up 
frothy, white waves. 

All around me the water bubbled and churned, white with foam. Over the 
crash of the water, I heard shrill animal squeals. 

Sharks don’t squeal, do they? I thought. What is making that sound? 

The shark surfaced, its toothy jaws gaping. It snapped them at something, 
once, twice. Snapping at air. 

The long, green fish tail rose out of the water and smacked the shark hard. 
A direct hit on its broad hammerhead. 

The shark shut its jaws and sank below the surface. 

Then I heard a loud bump! The water stopped churning. 

A second later, the huge gray fin surfaced a few yards away, speeding off in 
the other direction. 

The shark was swimming away! 



I stared at the green fish tail as it arced over the dark, swelling water. 

As the waters calmed, I heard a low, musical sound. It was beautiful and 
slightly sad. Whistling and humming at the same time. 

It sounded something like a whale. But this creature was much smaller than 
a whale. 

The green tail swung around. Then the creature lifted its head. 

A head with long, blond hair. 

The mermaid! 



14 


Bobbing in the water, I forgot my burning pain as I gaped at her. 

To my amazement, the mermaid looked just as the zoo people had said she 
would. 

Her head and shoulders were smaller than mine, but her flashing green tail 
stretched out, long and powerful. Her wide, sea-green eyes sparkled. Her skin 
gave off a pale pink glow. 

I stared at her, unable to speak. 

She’s real! I thought. And she’s so beautiful! 

At last I found my voice. “You—you saved me,” I stammered. “You saved 
my life. Thank you!” 

She shyly lowered her eyes and cooed at me through shell-pink lips. What 
was she trying to say? 

“What can I do in return?” I asked her. “I’ll do anything I can.” 

She smiled, and uttered that haunting low hum. 

She was trying to talk to me. I wished I could understand her. 

She reached for my hand and examined it, frowning over the red burns from 
the fire coral. Her hand felt cool. She passed it over the palm of my hand, and 
the pain from the burns began to fade away. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed. I must have sounded pretty stupid, but I didn’t know 
what else to say. Her touch was like magic. When she held my hand, I could 
float without treading water. Just as she did. 

Was this another dream? 

I closed my eyes and opened them again. 

I was still floating in the sea, staring at a blond-haired mermaid. 

No. Not a dream. 

She smiled again and shook her head, making those low singing sounds. 

I could hardly believe that only a few minutes before I’d been frantically 
fighting off a hungry shark. 

I raised my head and searched the waters. The shark had vanished. The 
water had calmed, shimmering like gold now under the morning sunlight. And 
there I was, floating in the sea off a deserted island with a real mermaid. 

Sheena will never believe this, I thought. Not in a million years. 



Suddenly, the mermaid flipped her tail and disappeared under the water. 

Startled, I searched around for her. She had left without a trace—not a 
ripple, not a bubble. 

Where did she go? I wondered. Is she gone, just like that? Will I never see 
her again? 

I rubbed my eyes and looked for her again. No sign of her. A few fish 
darted past me. 

She had disappeared so instantly, I began to think I had dreamed her up 
after all. 

Just then, I felt a tiny pinch on my foot. 

“Ouch!” I yelled, quickly pulling away. I began to panic. The shark was 
back! 

Then, behind me, I heard a small splash and a whistlelike giggle. I turned 
around. 

The mermaid smiled mischievously at me. She snapped her fingers in a 
pinching motion. 

“It was you!” I cried, laughing with relief. “You’re worse than my little 
sister!” 

She whistled again and slapped her tail against the surface of the water. 

Suddenly, a dark shadow fell across her face. I raised my eyes to see what it 

was. 

Too late. 

A heavy net dropped over us. Startled, I thrashed my arms and legs. But 
that only tangled them more in the rope. 

The net tightened over both of us. We were thrown together. 

We struggled helplessly as the net jerked us up. 

The mermaid’s eyes widened and she squealed in terror. 

“EEEEEE!” she cried. 

We were being pulled up out of the water. 

“EEEEEEE!” The mermaid’s frightened wail rose like a siren, drowning 
out my feeble cries for help. 



15 


“Billy—I don’t believe it!” 

I gazed up through the holes in the net and recognized Dr. D. and Sheena. 
They struggled to pull us aboard the dinghy. 

Sheena stared down at me and the mermaid in amazement. Dr. D.’s eyes 
were wide, and his mouth hung open. 

“You’ve found her, Billy!” he said. “You’ve actually found the mermaid!” 

“Just get me out of this net!” I cried. Somehow, I didn’t feel so great about 
capturing the mermaid anymore. 

“The zoo people were right,” Dr. D. muttered to himself. “It’s unbelievable. 
It’s astounding. It’s historic....” 

We landed in a heap on the floor of the dinghy. The mermaid squirmed 
beside me in the net, making sharp, angry clicking noises. 

Dr. D. watched her closely. He touched her tail. 

The mermaid flapped it hard against the bottom of the boat. 

“Is there any way this could be a hoax?” he wondered aloud. 

“Billy—is this one of your dumb tricks?” Sheena demanded suspiciously. 

“It’s not a trick,” I said. “Now will you get me out of this net? The ropes are 
digging into my skin.” 

They ignored me. 

Sheena gently reached one finger through the net and touched the scales on 
the mermaid’s tail. “I can’t believe it,” she murmured. “She’s really real!” 

“Of course she’s real!” I cried. “We’re both real, and we’re both very 
uncomfortable!” 

“Well, it’s hard to believe anything you say,” Sheena snapped. “After all, 
you’ve been talking about sea monsters ever since we got here.” 

“I did see a sea monster!” I cried. 

“Quiet, kids,” said Dr. D. “Let’s get our discovery back to the sea lab.” 

He started the dinghy’s motor and we roared back to the big boat. 

Alexander stood on deck, waiting for us. “It’s really true!” he cried 
excitedly. “It’s really a mermaid!” 

Sheena tied the dinghy to the side of the Cassandra while Dr. D. and 



Alexander hoisted me and the mermaid aboard. 

Dr. D. opened the net and helped me out. The mermaid flopped her tail and 
got herself even more tangled in the net. 

Alexander shook my hand. “I’m proud of you, Billy. How did you do it? 
This is amazing.” He gave me a vigorous pat on the back. “Do you realize this is 
the greatest ocean find of the century? Maybe of all time?” 

“Thanks,” I said. “But I didn’t do anything. I didn’t find her —she found 

me. ” 

The mermaid flopped violently on deck. Her squeals became higher- 
pitched, more frantic. 

Alexander’s face fell. “We’ve got to do something for her,” he said 
urgently. 

“Dr. D., you’ve got to let her go,” I said. “She needs to be in the water.” 

“I’ll fill the big tank with seawater, Dr. D.,” said Alexander. He hurried off 
to fill the tank. 

“We can’t let her go just yet, Billy,” said Dr. D. “Not without examining her 
first.” His eyes were shining with excitement. But he saw how upset I was. “We 
won’t hurt her, Billy. She’ll be all right.” 

His eyes dropped to my leg, and he frowned. He kneeled down to look at it. 

“You’re bleeding, Billy,” he said. “Are you okay?” 

“I’m fine,” I said. “But the mermaid isn’t.” 

He ignored me. 

“How did this happen?” asked Dr. D. 

“A shark grabbed my leg,” I told him. “Just as he was about to clamp down, 
the mermaid came. She saved my life. You should have seen her fighting that 
shark.” 

Dr. D. turned to the mermaid as if seeing her for the first time. 

“Wow,” said Sheena. “She fought off a shark? All by herself?” 

The mermaid’s long green tail pounded angrily on the deck of the boat. 

“EEEEE! EEEEEE!” she cried shrilly. She almost sounded as if she were 
screaming. 

“Forget about my leg,” I shouted. “You’ve got to let the mermaid go!” 

Dr. D. stood up, shaking his head. “Billy, I’m a scientist. This mermaid is 
an extremely important discovery. If I let her go, I’d be letting down the entire 
scientific community. I’d be letting down the entire world!” 

“You just want the million dollars,” I muttered. 



I knew it was cruel, but I couldn’t stop myself. I hated seeing the mermaid 
so unhappy. 

Dr. D. looked hurt. 

“That’s not fair, Billy,” he said. “I think you know me better than that.” 

I avoided his gaze. Lowering my head, I pretended to examine the cut on 
my leg. It wasn’t very deep. Alexander had given me some gauze. I pressed it 
against the cut. 

“I only want the money to continue my research,” Dr. D. went on. “I would 
never use this mermaid to get rich.” 

That was true. I knew Dr. D. didn’t care about the money for himself. All he 
wanted was to keep on studying fish. 

“Just think about it, Billy. You’ve found a mermaid! A creature we all 
thought didn’t exist! We can’t just let her go. We’ve got to find out a little bit 
about her,” he said excitedly. 

I said nothing. 

“We won’t hurt her, Billy. I promise.” 

Alexander returned. “The tank is ready, Dr. D.” 

“Thanks.” Dr. D. followed him to the other side of the boat. 

I glanced at Sheena to see whose side she was on. Did she want to keep the 
mermaid? Or let her go? 

But Sheena just stood there, watching. Her face was tense. I could tell she 
wasn’t sure which of us was right. 

But when I looked at the mermaid, I knew I was right. 

She had finally stopped squirming and flipping her tail. Now she lay still on 
the deck, the net draped over her. She was breathing hard and staring out at the 
ocean with watery, sad eyes. 

I wished I’d never tried to find her in the first place. Now all I wanted was 
to find some way to help her get back to her home. 

Dr. D. and Alexander came back. They lifted the mermaid inside the net. 
Alexander lifted her tail, and Dr. D. held her head. 

“Don’t squirm, little mermaid,” Dr. D. said in a soothing voice. “Keep 
still.” 

The mermaid seemed to understand. She didn’t flop around. But her eyes 
rolled wildly, and she uttered low moans. 

Dr. D. and Alexander carried her to the giant glass tank. It stood on the deck 
now, full of fresh seawater. They gently dropped her into the tank, pulling the net 



away as she slid into the water. Then they put a screen top over the tank and 
clamped it shut. 

The mermaid churned the water with her tail. Then, gradually, her tail 
stopped moving. She grew still. 

Her body slumped lifelessly to the bottom of the tank. 

She didn’t move or breathe. 

“Noooo!” An angry cry escaped my lips. “She’s dead! She’s dead! We 
killed her!” 



16 


Sheena had moved to the other side of the tank. “Billy, look—!” she called to 
me. 

I hurried around to her. 

“The mermaid isn’t dead,” Sheena reported, pointing. “Look. She—she’s 
crying or something.” 

My sister was right. The mermaid had slumped to the bottom of the tank 
and had buried her face in her hands. “Now what do we do?” I asked. 

No one answered. 

“We have to find a method of feeding her,” my uncle said, rubbing his chin, 
his eyes on the tank. 

“Do you think she eats like a person or a fish?” I asked. 

“If only she could tell us,” said Alexander. “She can’t talk, can she, Billy?” 

“I don’t think so,” I said. “She just makes sounds. Whistles and clicks and 
hums.” 

“I’ll go down to the lab and get some equipment ready,” said Alexander. 
“Maybe we can find out something about her with the sonar monitor.” 

“Good idea,” said Dr. D. thoughtfully. 

Alexander hurried below. 

“I think I’d better go to Santa Anita for some supplies,” said Dr. D. Santa 
Anita was the nearest inhabited island. “I’ll buy lots of different kinds of foods. 
We can try them out on her until we find something she likes. Would you two 
like anything while I’m there?” 

“How about some peanut butter?” Sheena asked quickly. “There’s no way 
Alexander can ruin a peanut butter sandwich!” 

Dr. D. nodded as he climbed into the dinghy. “Peanut butter it is. Anything 
else? Billy?” 

I shook my head. 

“All right,” Dr. D. said. “I’ll be back in a few hours.” 

He started the motor, and the dinghy sped off toward Santa Anita. 

“It’s so hot,” Sheena complained. “I’m going down to my cabin for a 
while.” 

“Okay,” I said, my eyes on the mermaid. 



It was hot up on deck. There was no breeze, and the white-hot noon sun 
beat down on my face. 

But I couldn’t go below deck. I couldn’t leave the mermaid. 

She floated behind the glass, her long tail drooping. When she saw me, she 
pressed her hands and face to the glass and cooed sadly. 

I waved to her through the glass. 

She cooed and hummed in her low voice, trying to communicate with me. I 
listened, trying to understand. 

“Are you hungry?” I asked her. 

She stared at me blankly. 

“Are you hungry?” I repeated, rubbing my stomach. “Go like this”—I 
nodded my head up and down—“for yes. Do this for no.” I shook my head back 
and forth. 

I stopped and waited to see what she’d do. 

She nodded her head yes. 

“Yes?” I said. “You are hungry?” 

She shook her head no. 

“No? You’re not hungry?” 

She nodded her head yes. Then she shook her head no again. 

She’s just copying me, I thought. She doesn’t really understand. 

I took a step back and studied her in the tank. 

She’s young, I thought. She’s a lot like me. That means she must be hungry. 
And she probably likes to eat what I like. Right? 

Maybe. It was worth a try. 

I hurried down to the galley. I pulled open a cupboard and took out a 
package of chocolate chip cookies. 

Okay, so it’s not exactly seafood, I thought. But who wouldn’t like 
chocolate chip cookies? 

I grabbed a few cookies and stuffed the package back in the cupboard. 
Alexander came through on his way up to the deck. He was carrying some 
equipment in his arms. 

“Getting a snack?” he asked me. 

“For the mermaid,” I told him. “Do you think she’ll like them?” 

He shrugged his broad shoulders and said, “Who knows?” 

He followed me out on deck, carrying the equipment. 

“What’s all that stuff?” I asked him. 



“I thought we could run a few tests on the mermaid, to see what we can find 
out about her,” said Alexander. “But go ahead and feed her first.” 

“Okay,” I said. “Here goes.” 

I held a cookie up to the glass. The mermaid stared at it. I could see that she 
didn’t know what it was. 

“Mmmmm,” I said, patting my stomach. “Yummy.” 

The mermaid patted her tummy, imitating me. She stared out at me blankly 
with those sea-green eyes. 

Alexander reached up and unlatched the screen top. I handed him the 
cookie, and he dropped it into the tank. 

The mermaid watched it falling toward her through the water. She made no 
attempt to grab it. 

By the time it reached her, it was soggy. It fell apart in the tank. 

“Yuck,” I said. “Even I wouldn’t eat it now.” 

The mermaid pushed the soggy cookie pieces away. 

“Maybe Dr. D. will have something she likes when he gets back,” said 
Alexander. 

“I hope so,” I said. 

Alexander began to set up his equipment. He put a thermometer inside the 
tank, and some long white plastic tubes. 

“Oh, man,” Alexander mumbled, shaking his head. “I forgot my notebook.” 

He hurried back down to the lab. 

I watched the mermaid float sadly in her tank, with all the tubes coming out 
of it. She reminded me of the fish down in the lab. 

No, I thought. She’s not a fish. She shouldn’t be treated this way. 

I remembered how she had fought the shark. 

She could have been killed, I thought. Easily. But she fought the shark, 
anyway, just to help me. 

The mermaid cooed. Then I saw her wipe away the tears that had begun to 
mn down her face. 

She’s crying again, I thought, feeling guilty and miserable. She’s pleading 
with me. I put my face against the glass, as close to hers as I could get it. 

I’ve got to help her, I thought. 

I put a finger to my lips. “Ssshhh,” I whispered. “Stay quiet. I have to work 
quickly!” 

I knew I was about to do something that would make Dr. D. very angry. 



My uncle would probably never forgive me. 
But I didn’t care. 

I was going to do what I thought was right. 

I was going to set the mermaid free. 



17 


My hand trembled as I reached up to unlatch the screen at the top of the tank. 
The tank was taller than I was. I wasn’t quite sure how I’d get the mermaid out 
of there. But I had to find a way. 

As I struggled to pull the screen off, the mermaid began to squeal, “Eeee! 
EEEEEE!” 

“Sshh! Don’t make any noise!” I warned her. 

Then I felt a hand grab me by the arm. I gasped, startled. 

A deep voice asked, “What are you doing?” 

I turned around to see Alexander standing behind me. 

I stepped away from the tank, and he let go of my arm. 

“Billy, what were you doing?” he asked again. 

“I was going to let her go!” I cried. “Alexander, you can’t keep her in there! 
Look how unhappy she is!” 

We both stared at the mermaid, who had slumped to the bottom of the tank 
again. I think she knew that I had tried to help her—and that I had been stopped. 

I caught the sadness on Alexander’s face. I could tell he felt sorry for her. 
But he had a job to do. 

He turned to me and put an arm around my shoulders. “Billy, you’ve got to 
understand how important this mermaid is to your uncle,” he said. “He’s worked 
his whole life for a discovery like this. It would break his heart if you let her go.” 

He slowly led me away from the tank. I turned back to look at the mermaid 
again. 

“But what about her heart?” I asked. “I think it’s breaking her heart to be 
stuck in that fish tank.” 

Alexander sighed. “It’s not ideal, I know that. But it’s only temporary. Soon 
she’ll have plenty of room to swim and play in.” 

Sure, I thought bitterly. As an exhibit at the zoo, with millions of people 
gawking at her every day. 

Alexander removed his arm from my shoulders and rubbed his chin. 

“Your uncle is a very caring man, Billy,” he said. “He’ll do his best to make 
sure the mermaid has everything she needs. But it’s his duty to study her. The 
things he can learn from her could help people understand the oceans better— 



and take better care of them. That’s important, right?” 

“I guess so,” I said. 

I knew Alexander had a good point. I loved Dr. D., and I didn’t want to 
spoil his big discovery. 

But, still, the mermaid shouldn’t have to suffer for science, I thought. 

“Come on, Billy,” Alexander said, leading me below deck. “I promised you 
I’d show you how the sonar probes work, didn’t I? Let’s go down to the lab, and 
I’ll give you a demonstration.” 

As we started to climb below, I took one last glance back at the mermaid. 
She was still slumped forlornly at the bottom of the tank. Her head was lowered, 
her blond hair floating limply above it like seaweed. 

The sonar probes weren’t as interesting as I thought they’d be. All they did was 
beep whenever the Cassandra was in danger of running ashore. 

I guess Alexander could tell my mind was not on the sonar probes. “Want 
some lunch?” he asked me. 

Uh-oh. Lunch. I was hungry. But not for spicy chicken salad. 

I hesitated. “Well, I had a big breakfast....” 

“I’ll whip up something special,” Alexander offered. “We can have a picnic 
up on deck with the mermaid. Come on.” 

What could I do? I followed him to the kitchen. 

He opened the small refrigerator and pulled out a bowl. 

“This has been marinating all morning,” he said. 

I looked into the bowl. It was full of thin strips of something white and 
mbbery-looking. They floated in an oily, dark gray liquid. 

Whatever it was, I knew I couldn’t eat it. 

“It’s marinated squid,” said Alexander. “I added some squid ink for extra 
flavor. That’s what makes it gray.” 

“Yum,” I said, rolling my eyes. “I haven’t had squid ink in days!” 

“Don’t be so sarcastic. You might be surprised,” Alexander replied. He 
handed me the bowl. “Take this up on deck. I’ll bring some bread and iced tea.” 

I carried the bowl of squid up and set it down near the mermaid’s tank. 

“How are you doing, Mermaid?” I asked her. 

She flipped her tail a little. Then she opened and closed her mouth, as if she 
were chewing. 

“Hey,” I said. “You are hungry, aren’t you?” 



She kept making that chewing motion. I glanced down at the bowl of squid. 
Who knows? I thought. This might be just what she’d like. 

I stood on a rail and unlatched the top of the tank. Then I dropped in a piece 
of the rubbery squid. 

The mermaid leaped toward it and caught it in her mouth. 

She chewed, then smiled. 

She liked it! 

I gave her some more. She ate it. 

I rubbed my stomach. “Do you like it?” I asked her. I nodded yes. 

She smiled again. Then she nodded yes. 

She understood me! 

“What are you doing, Billy?” Alexander asked. He had come up on deck 
carrying two plates and a loaf of bread. 

“Alexander, look!” I cried. “We communicated!” 

I dropped another piece of squid into the tank. She ate it. Then she nodded 

yes. 

“That means she likes it!” I said. 

“Wow,” murmured Alexander. He put down the plates and picked up his 
notebook. He scribbled some notes. 

“Isn’t that way cool?” I demanded. “I’m a scientist, too—aren’t I, 
Alexander?” 

He nodded, but kept writing. 

“I mean, I’m the first person on Earth to communicate with a mermaid— 
right?” I insisted. 

“If she stays with us long enough, you might be able to talk to her in sign 
language,” he said. “Just think of the things we could learn!” 

He spoke aloud as he wrote, “Likes to eat squid.” Then he put down his 
pencil and said, “Hey, wait! That’s our lunch!” 

Uh-oh, I thought. I hope his feelings aren’t hurt. 

He looked at me. He looked at the bowl. He looked at the mermaid. 

Then he started laughing. 

“At least somebody around here likes my cooking!” he exclaimed. 

About an hour later, Dr. D. returned with the groceries and supplies. Luckily he 
had bought plenty of seafood in Santa Anita. We fed some of it to the mermaid 
for supper. While she ate, Dr. D. checked the readings on the meters Alexander 



had set up in the tank. 

“Interesting,” Dr. D. commented. “She sends out sonar signals through the 
water. Just as whales do.” 

“What does that mean?” asked Sheena. 

“It means there are probably other mermaids like her,” said Dr. D. “She 
must be trying to contact them with underwater sounds.” 

Poor mermaid, I thought. She’s calling to her friends. She wants to be 
rescued. 

I went to my cabin after supper and stared out of the little porthole. 

An orange sun sank slowly into the purple horizon. A wide carpet of gold 
light shimmered in the rolling ocean waters. A cool breeze blew in through the 
porthole. 

I watched the sun drop into the ocean. The sky immediately darkened, as if 
someone had turned off a lamp. 

The mermaid is up there all alone, I thought. She must be so frightened. A 
prisoner. Trapped in a fish tank in the dark. 

The door to my cabin suddenly burst open. Sheena bounded in, panting, her 
eyes wide. 

“Sheena!” I scolded angrily. “How many times do I have to tell you to 
knock first?” 

She ignored me. “But, Billy!” she gasped. “She’s escaped! The mermaid 
escaped!” 



18 


I leaped off my bed, my heart pounding. 

“She’s not there!” Sheena cried. “She’s not in her tank!” 

I darted out of the cabin, up the hatch, and out on deck. 

Part of me hoped she really had escaped to freedom. But part of me wished 
she could stay forever—and make my uncle the most famous scientist in the 
world and me the most famous nephew of a scientist! 

Please let her be okay, I thought. 

Up on deck, my eyes adjusted to the evening darkness. Tiny lights glowed 
all around the edge of the boat. 

I squinted across the deck at the giant fish tank. 

I ran so fast, I nearly toppled overboard. Sheena was right behind me. 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I saw the mermaid floating listlessly in the 
water, her green tail shimmering faintly in the fading light. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that Sheena was laughing. “Gotcha!” 
she shouted gleefully. “Gotcha again, Billy!” 

I groaned long and loud. Another one of Sheena’s stupid tricks. 

“Good one, Sheena,” I said bitterly. “Very clever.” 

“You’re just mad because I fooled you again. You’re so easy to trick.” 

The mermaid raised her eyes to me, and a faint smile formed on her pale 
lips. “Looorrrooo, looorrrooo,” she cooed at me. 

“She really is pretty,” Sheena said. 

The mermaid is hoping I’ll let her go now, I thought. Maybe I should.... 

Sheena could help me, I decided. It would be easier with two of us. 

But would my sister cooperate? “Sheena—”1 began. 

I heard footsteps behind us. “Hey, kids.” It was Dr. D. “It’s almost 
bedtime,” he called. “Ready to go below?” 

“We never go to bed this early at home,” Sheena whined. 

“Maybe not. But I bet you don’t get up so early at home, either. Do you?” 

Sheena shook her head. We all stood at the tank and watched the mermaid 
in silence. She gave her tail a little flick and settled back down at the bottom of 
the tank. 



“Don’t worry about her,” Dr. D. said. “I’ll check on her during the night to 
make sure she’s all right.” 

The mermaid pressed her tiny hands against the glass wall of the tank. Her 
eyes pleaded with us, pleaded with us to set her free. 

“She’ll feel better once she gets to Marina Zoo,” Dr. D. said. “They’re 
building a special lagoon just for her, with a reef and everything. It’ll be exactly 
like the lagoon off Ilandra. She’ll be free to swim and play. She’ll feel at home.” 

I hope so, I thought. But I didn’t feel so sure. 

The Cassandra rocked gently on the waves that night, but I couldn’t fall asleep. 

I lay on my bunk, staring at the ceiling. A pale beam of moonlight fell 
through the porthole and across my face. I couldn’t stop thinking about the 
mermaid. 

I tried to imagine what it would feel like to be trapped in a glass tank for a 
whole day. It probably wouldn’t be that different from being trapped in this tiny 
cabin, I thought, glancing around. My cabin was about as big as a closet. 

It would be terrible, I thought, fiddling with the collar of my pajama top. I 
pushed open the porthole to let in more air. 

The fish tank might not even be the worst of it, I figured. I know Dr. D. 
cares about the mermaid. I know he’d never hurt her. 

But what will happen to her when the zoo people take her away? Who will 
look out for her? 

Sure, they’re building a fancy fake lagoon. But it won’t be the same as the 
real lagoon. And there will be people around, staring at her all the time. They’ll 
probably expect her to perform tricks or something; maybe jump through hoops 
like a trained seal. 

They’ll probably put her in TV commercials, too. And TV shows and 
movies. 

She’ll be a prisoner. A lonely prisoner for the rest of her life. 

This is all my fault. How could I let this happen? 

I have to do something, I decided. I can’t let them take her. 

Just then I thought I heard something—a low hum. I lay very still and 
listened. At first I thought it was the mermaid. But I quickly realized it was a 
motor. 

I heard it chugging softly, from a distance. But slowly the sound moved 
closer. 



A boat. 

I sat up and peered out of the porthole. A large boat pulled quietly up beside 
the Cassandra. 

Who was it? The zoo people? 

In the middle of the night? 

No. It wasn’t the same boat. This boat was much bigger. 

As I peered out the small porthole, I saw two dark figures quietly slip on 
board the Cassandra. Then two more. 

My heart began to race. Who are these people? I wondered. What are they 
doing? 

What should I do? 

Should I sneak up and spy on them? What if they see me? 

Then I heard more strange noises. 

A thud. A muffled cry of pain. 

It came from the deck. 

The deck. Where the mermaid was trapped helplessly in her tank. 

Oh, no! I thought, feeling a chill of panic. They’re hurting the mermaid! 



19 


I charged up to the deck. Sheena ran right behind me. 

Stumbling over a tow rope, I grabbed the rail to steady myself. Then I 
darted blindly to the fish tank. 

The mermaid huddled at the bottom of the tank, her arms wrapped 
protectively around herself. 

I saw four men standing tensely near the tank. All four were dressed in 
black. They had black masks pulled over their faces. 

One of the men held a small club in his hand. 

And a body lay sprawled on the deck, face down. 

Dr. D.! 

Sheena screamed and ran to our uncle. She knelt beside him. “They hit him 
on the head!” she cried. “They knocked him out!” 

I gasped. “Who are you?” I demanded. “What are you doing on our boat?” 

The four men ignored me. 

Two of them unfolded a heavy rope net and spread it over the fish tank. 
Then they let it fall into the tank, draping it over the mermaid. 

“Stop it!” I yelled. “What are you doing?” 

“Be quiet, kid,” the man with the club muttered. He raised the club 
menacingly. 

I watched helplessly as they tightened the net around the mermaid. 

They were kidnapping her! 

“Eeeee! EEEEEeeee!” she squealed in terror and started to thrash her arms, 
struggling to free herself from the heavy net. 

“Stop it! Leave her alone!” I cried. 

One of the men gave a low laugh. The other three still ignored me. 

Sheena was bent over Dr. D., frantically trying to wake him up. I ran to the 
hatch and shouted down into the cabin, “Alexander! Alexander! Help!” 

Alexander was big and strong—maybe strong enough to stop these men. 

I ran back to the tank. The mermaid was trapped in the net. All four men 
worked to lift her out of the tank. She squirmed and fought with all her strength. 

“EEEEEE!” she screamed. The high-pitched squeal hurt my ears. 



“Can’t you get her to shut up?” one of the men cried angrily. 

“Just load her on board,” the one with the club replied sharply. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You can’t do that!” 

Then I totally lost it. 

Without thinking, I dove toward the four of them. I don’t know what I 
planned to do. I just knew I had to stop them. 

One of them pushed me away easily with one hand. “Stay away—or you’ll 
get hurt,” he muttered. 

“Let her go! Let the mermaid go!” I cried frantically. 

“Forget about the mermaid,” said the man. “You’ll never see her again.” 

I grabbed the rail. My heart was pounding in my chest. I gasped for breath. 

I couldn’t stand the mermaid’s terrified screams. 

I couldn’t let them take her—not without a fight. 

She had saved my life once. Now it was my turn to save hers. 

But what could I do? 

They had lifted the mermaid out of the tank. Three men held her in the net. 
She squirmed and thrashed like crazy, splashing water all over the deck. 

I’ll tackle them, I thought. I’ll knock them over. Then I’ll push the mermaid 
into the ocean and she can swim away to safety. 

Lowering my head like a football player, I took a deep breath and ran right 
at them. 



20 


“Billy—stop!” Sheena screamed. 

I crashed into one of the men holding the net, butting him hard in the 
stomach with my head. 

To my dismay, the man hardly moved. 

He grabbed me with his free hand, lifted me up off the deck, and heaved me 
into the fish tank. 

I splashed into the warm water and came up, choking and sputtering. 

Through the glass, I watched the men toss the mermaid aboard their boat. 
They were getting away! 

I tried to scramble out of the tank, but it was too tall. I kept slipping down 
the wet glass, unable to reach the top. 

I knew there was only one person who could stop the masked men now. 
Alexander. 

Where was he? Hadn’t he heard all the noise? 

“ALEXANDER!” I shouted as loud as I could. But my voice was muffled 
by the glass walls of the tank. 

Then, finally, he appeared on the deck. I saw his big blond head and 
muscular body moving toward me. At last! 

“Alexander!” I cried, scrambling to stay afloat in the tank. “Stop them!” 

I could hear the motor of the other boat begin to rumble. One by one, the 
masked men lowered themselves off our boat. 

Three of them had left the Cassandra. Only one remained on deck. 

Through the glass I watched Alexander run up to him and grab his shoulder. 

Yes! I thought. Get him, Alexander! Get him! 

I’d never seen Alexander hit anyone before. But I knew he could do it if he 
had to. 

But Alexander didn’t hit the masked man. Instead, he asked, “Is the 
mermaid safely on board?” 

The masked man nodded. 

“Good,” Alexander replied. “And have you got the money for me?” 

“Got it.” 



“All right,” Alexander murmured. “Let’s get out of here!” 



21 


I nearly choked on a mouthful of water. 

I just couldn’t believe that Alexander was working with the masked men. 
He had seemed like such a good guy. 

But I knew now that he had arranged the whole thing. He had to be the one 
who had told them the mermaid was on board our boat. 

“Alexander,” I cried, “how could you?” 

He stared at me through the glass. “Hey, Billy, it’s just business,” he said 
with a shrug. “The zoo was going to pay a million dollars for the mermaid. But 
my new bosses will pay twenty million!” A thin smile crossed his face. “You 
know arithmetic, Billy. Which would you choose?” 

“You rat!” I shouted. I wanted to punch him. I stmggled to get out of the 
tank. All I managed to do was splash a lot and get water up my nose. 

Alexander followed the masked man to his boat. I pounded helplessly on 
the glass tank. 

Then I saw Sheena stand up. Lowering my gaze to the deck, I saw that Dr. 
D. was moving. 

Alexander didn’t seem to notice. He stepped over Dr. D.’s body. He didn’t 
even care that Dr. D. could have been hurt badly. 

I watched my uncle reach up and grab Alexander by the ankle. 

“Whoa!” Alexander tripped and fell hard onto his elbows and his knees. 

Sheena screamed and backed up to the rail. 

Maybe there’s still hope, I thought, my heart beating faster. Maybe they 
won’t get away after all. 

Alexander sat up, dazed, rubbing one elbow. “Get them!” he shouted down 
to the masked men. 

Two of the men climbed back aboard the Cassandra and grabbed Dr. D. 
Sheena ran at them, flailing at them with her puny little fists. 

Of course that didn’t do any good. The third masked man grabbed her arms 
and pinned them behind her back. 

“Kick him, Sheena!” I yelled through the glass. 

She tried to kick the man who held her, but he just tightened his grip. She 
couldn’t move. 



“Let them go!” I screamed desperately. 

“What should we do with them?” asked one of the men. 

“Whatever you do, do it quickly,” said Alexander. “We’ve got to get out of 
here.” 

The man who held Sheena glanced in at me. I was frantically treading 
water, trying to stay above the surface. 

“They might call the island police or the Coast Guard,” he said, frowning. 
“We’d better kill them.” 

“Throw them all in the tank!” suggested one of his partners. 



22 


“Alexander!” Dr. D. shouted. “I know you’re not a cruel man. Don’t let them do 
this.” 

Alexander avoided my uncle’s hard stare. “Sorry, Dr. D.,” he muttered. “I 
can’t stop them. If I try to, they’ll kill me, too.” 

Without another word, he lowered himself onto the other boat. 

What a creep, I thought angrily. 

Two of the masked men lifted Dr. D. up high and dropped him into the tank. 
He landed beside me with a splash. 

“Are you okay?” I asked him. 

He rubbed the back of his head and nodded. 

Sheena was next. They tossed her in easily. She flew through the air, 
flailing her arms and legs. Then she plopped into the water. 

The men replaced the screen lid. They clamped it shut. 

I stared out at them, realizing in horror that we had no way to escape. 

The water in the tank was about six feet deep. We all kicked and paddled, 
trying to stay above the surface. There was barely enough room for the three of 
us. 

“All right,” said one of the men. “Let’s go.” 

“Wait!” Dr. D. shouted. “You can’t just leave us here!” 

The three men exchanged glances. “You’re right. We can’t,” said one. 

They stepped toward us. 

So they aren’t heartless monsters after all, I thought. They weren’t going to 
leave us. 

But what were they going to do? 

The first man signaled the other two. They raised their hands to one side of 
the tank. 

“One, two, three—” the first man called out. 

On three, they pushed the tank over the side of the deck. 

We were thrown together. Then our bodies slammed against the side of the 
tank as it dropped into the ocean. 

Ocean water seeped into the tank. 



“The tank—it’s sinking!” cried Dr. D. 

We watched the kidnappers’ boat as it roared away. Our tank rocked in its 
wake. Then it started to sink. 

“We’re going under!” Sheena screamed. “We’re going to drown!” 



23 


All three of us desperately pushed against the screen. I beat my fists against it. 
Dr. D. tried to get his shoulder against it. 

But the tank tilted in the water, and we were all tossed back. 

The screen was made of heavy steel mesh, and clamped onto the top of the 
tank. We couldn’t reach the clamps from inside, so we had to try to break 
through it. 

We pushed with all our strength. It wouldn’t budge. 

The tank slowly sank deeper below the surface of the dark, rolling water. 
The moon disappeared behind a blanket of clouds, leaving us in total darkness. 

We had only a minute or two before the tank dropped completely below the 
surface. 

Sheena started to cry. “I’m so afraid!” she shrieked. “I’m so afraid!” 

Dr. D. pounded his fists against the glass tank wall, trying to break through. 

I ran my hands all along the top of the tank, looking for a weak spot in the 
screen. 

Then I hit something. 

A tiny latch. 

“Look!” I cried, pointing to the latch. 

I fumbled with it, trying to open it. “It’s stuck!” 

“Let me try.” Dr. D. tore at the latch with his fingers. “It’s jammed shut,” he 

said. 

Sheena took a red barrette from her hair. “Maybe we can loosen it with 
this,” she said. 

Dr. D. took the barrette and scraped hard around the latch. 

“It’s working!” he said. 

Maybe there’s hope, I thought. Maybe we’ll get out of here! 

Dr. D. stopped scraping and tugged at the latch. 

It moved! 

It opened! 

“We’re free!” cried Sheena. 

We all pushed at the screen. We pushed again. 



“Come on, kids, push harder,” urged Dr. D. 

We pushed again. The screen didn’t move. The latch hadn’t opened it after 
all. Two other latches held the screen in place. 

Two latches we couldn’t reach. 

We all grew silent. The only sounds now were Sheena’s soft, frightened 
sobs and the steady wash of the waves. 

The water had risen nearly to the top of the tank. Soon it would come 
mshing in on us. 

Suddenly, the ocean darkened. The waters grew choppy, and the tank 
rocked a little faster. 

“What’s that noise?” Sheena asked. 

I listened. 

Through the churning of the water, I heard a strange sound. It was very 
faint, as if coming from far away. 

A shrill, high-pitched whistle. 

“It sounds like a siren,” Dr. D. murmured. “Lots of sirens.” 

The eerie wails rose and fell over the water. 

Louder. Closer. 

The sound—as shrill as the screech of metal—surrounded us. 

Suddenly, dark, shadowy forms swirled around the tank. 

We pressed our faces to the glass. 

“That sound. I’ve never heard anything like it. What can it be?” asked Dr. 
D. 

“It—it’s coming from all around!” I stammered. 

The dark water tossed, churned by the shadowy forms. I peered through the 
foam, straining to see. 

Suddenly, out of the murky water, a face appeared. It pressed itself against 
the glass, right in front of my face! 

I gasped and pulled back. 

Then I saw more faces. We were surrounded by small, girlish faces. Their 
wide eyes peered in at us menacingly. 

“Mermaids!” I shrieked. 

“Dozens of them!” Dr. D. murmured in hushed amazement. 

They churned the water with their long tails. 

Their hair, dark tangles in the black water, floated around their faces. The 
tank rocked harder and harder. 



“What do they want?” cried Sheena, her voice shrill and trembling. 

“They look angry,” Dr. D. whispered. 

I stared out at the mermaids, swirling around us like ghosts. They reached 
out their hands and began clutching at the tank. They smacked their tails on the 
water. The dark waters tossed and churned. 

Suddenly I knew. I knew what they wanted. 

“Revenge,” I murmured. “They’ve come for revenge. We took their friend. 
And now they’re going to pay us back.” 



24 


Shadowy hands pressed against the glass. 

“They’re pulling us under!” Dr. D. cried. 

I gasped in terror, staring out at the hands, black outlines against the glass. 
Then, suddenly, the tank began to rise. Up out of the water, higher and 
higher. 

“Huh? What’s happening?” asked Sheena. 

“They—they’re pushing us back up!” I cried happily. 

“The mermaids aren’t taking revenge—they’re saving us!” Dr. D. 
exclaimed. 

The tank brushed up against the Cassandra. I could see the mermaids’ tiny 
hands working above us. 

The clamps popped open. The screen was pulled off. 

With a happy groan, Dr. D. boosted Sheena up. She scrambled on board the 

boat. 

Then I climbed aboard, and we both helped pull Dr. D. out of the tank. 

We were drenched, shivering from the cold. But we were safe. 

The mermaids swarmed around the boat, their pale eyes peering up at us. 
“Thank you,” Dr. D. called down to them. “Thank you for saving our lives.” 
I realized this was the second time a mermaid had saved my life. I owed 
them more than ever now. 

“We’ve got to get the kidnapped mermaid back,” I said. “Who knows what 
Alexander and those creeps will do to her!” 

“Yeah,” cried Sheena. “Look what they tried to do to us!” 

“I wish we could rescue her,” Dr. D. murmured, shaking his head. “But I 
don’t see how we can. How will we find the kidnappers’ boat in the dark? 
They’re long gone by now.” 

But I knew there had to be a way. I leaned over the rail, peering down at the 
mermaids floating beside us, chattering and cooing in the moonlight. 

“Help us!” I pleaded with them. “We want to find your friend. Please—can 
you take us to her?” 

I held my breath and waited. Would the mermaids understand me? Would 



they be able to help us—somehow? 

The mermaids chattered and whistled to one another. Then one of them—a 
dark-haired mermaid with an extra-long tail—moved to the head of the group. 

She began whistling and clicking to the other mermaids. She seemed to be 
giving orders. 

The three of us stared in amazement as the mermaids began to form a long 
line, one mermaid after the other, stretching far out to sea. 

“Do you think they’re going to lead us to the kidnappers?” I asked. 

“Maybe,” Dr. D. replied thoughtfully. “But how will the mermaids find the 
boat?” He rubbed his chin. “I know. I’ll bet they’ll use their sonar. I wish I had 
time to really listen to those sounds they’re making—” 

“Look, Dr. D!” Sheena interrupted. “The mermaids are swimming away!” 

We watched the dark figures slide away through the rolling black waters. 

“Quick!” I cried. “We’ve got to follow them.” 

“Too dangerous,” Dr. D. replied, sighing. “We can’t fight Alexander and 
four big masked men by ourselves!” 

He paced back and forth on the narrow deck. “We should call the island 
police,” he said finally. “But what would we say? That we’re chasing after a 
kidnapped mermaid? No one would believe us.” 

“Dr. D., we have to follow them. Please!” I pleaded. “The mermaids are 
swimming out of sight!” 

He stared at me for a long moment. “Okay. Let’s get going,” he said finally. 

I hurried to the stern to untie the dinghy. Dr. D. dropped it into the water 
and jumped in. Sheena and I followed. Dr. D. started the motor—and we raced 
after the shimmering line of mermaids. 

The mermaids glided so quickly through the rolling waters, it was hard for 
the small boat to keep up with them. 

About fifteen or twenty minutes later, we found ourselves in a small, 
deserted cove. The moon drifted out of the clouds. It cast pale light on a dark 
boat anchored near the shore. 

Dr. D. cut the motor so the kidnappers wouldn’t hear us approaching. 

“They must be asleep,” he whispered. 

“How can Alexander sleep after what he did to us?” said Sheena. “He left 
us to drown!” 

“Money can make people do terrible things,” Dr. D. replied sadly. “But it’s 
good they think we’re dead. They won’t be expecting us.” 



“But where’s the mermaid?” I whispered, staring at the dark boat, bobbing 
gently under the misty moonlight. 

We drifted silently toward the darkened boat. 

Well, we’ve found the kidnappers, I thought, holding on to the side of the 
dinghy as we drew near. 

There’s just one problem. 

What do we do next? 



25 


The air became very still. The kidnappers’ boat sat gently on the calm, glassy 
waters of the cove. 

“What happened to all the mermaids?” Sheena whispered. 

I shrugged. There was no sign of them. I imagined them swimming way 
down below the surface, hiding. 

Suddenly, at the side of the kidnappers’ boat, I saw ripples in the water. 

Slowly, silently, our dinghy glided toward the boat. I stared at the ripples, 
trying to see what was making them. Then I saw a flash of blond hair in the 
moonlight. 

“The mermaid!” I whispered. “There she is!” 

She was floating in the water, tied to the back of the kidnappers’ boat. 

“They must not have a tank to keep her in,” Dr. D. whispered excitedly. 
“Lucky for us.” 

Suddenly, we saw other figures rippling the water. Mermaids arched up, 
circling the captured mermaid. I saw tail fins raised like giant fans. I saw hands 
reach around the mermaid, hands tugging at the rope that held her. 

The waters tossed quietly as the figures worked. 

“The mermaids are setting her free,” I whispered. 

“What are we going to do?” Sheena asked. 

“We’ll just make sure she gets away safely,” Dr. D. replied. “Then we’ll slip 
away. The kidnappers will never know we were here.” 

We watched the mermaids struggle with the rope as our dinghy washed up 
against the kidnappers’ boat. 

“Come on, mermaids!” Sheena urged under her breath. “Hurry!” 

“Maybe they need some help,” I said. 

Dr. D. began to steer toward the mermaids. 

I gasped as a light flared on the kidnappers’ boat. A match set flame to a 
torch. 

An angry voice boomed, “What do you think you’re doing?” 



26 


I ducked away as the flaming torch was thrust in my face. 

Behind the torch, I could see the kidnapper glaring down at me. He had 
quickly pulled on his black mask. It covered only the top of his face. 

I heard a clambering sound, cries of surprise. Alexander and the other three 
kidnappers appeared on the deck. 

“How did you get here?” demanded the man with the torch. “Why aren’t 
you dead?” 

“We’ve come for the mermaid,” Dr. D. called up to him. “You can’t keep 
her here!” 

The torch swung past my head. I stood up in the dinghy and took a swipe at 
it, trying to knock it into the water. 

“Billy, no!” cried Dr. D. 

The kidnapper pulled the torch away. I fell forward in the dinghy, toppling 
over on Sheena. 

“Give us back the mermaid!” Dr. D. demanded. 

“Finders, keepers,” the kidnapper muttered. “You’ve made a long trip for 
nothing. And now look—your boat is on fire.” 

He lowered the torch to the dinghy and set it aflame. 



27 


The flames flared up, bright orange and yellow against the blue-black sky. They 
spread quickly across the front of the dinghy. 

Sheena uttered a terrified scream and tried to back away from the flames. 

In a panic, she started to leap into the water—but Dr. D. pulled her back. 
“Don’t leave the boat! You’ll drown!” 

The fire crackled. The bright flames shot higher. 

Dr. D. grabbed a yellow life jacket from the bottom of the dinghy and 
started frantically beating out the fire. 

“Billy—get a life jacket!” he yelled. “Sheena—find the bucket. Throw 
water on the flames—hurry!” 

I found a life jacket and beat at the flames. Sheena dumped seawater on 
them as fast as she could. 

Over the crackling flames, I heard Alexander shout, “Get the mermaid 
aboard. Let’s get out of here!” 

“Dr. D.!” I cried. “They’re getting away!” 

Then I heard the kidnappers yelling. “The mermaid! Where’s the 
mermaid?” 

I turned to the side of the boat. The mermaid was gone. Her friends had 
freed her. 

One of the kidnappers reached down from his boat and grabbed me. “What 
did you do with the mermaid?” he demanded. 

“Let him go!” shouted Dr. D. 

I tried to squirm away from the kidnapper. He held me tight. Then I saw 
another kidnapper swing a club at Dr. D.’s head. 

Dr. D. dodged the club. The kidnapper tried to hit him in the stomach. Dr. 
D. dodged again. 

I kicked and squirmed. Sheena tugged at the kidnapper’s hands, trying to 
help me escape. 

The third kidnapper picked her up by the wrists and threw her to the floor 
of the dinghy. 

“Let go of the kids!” pleaded Dr. D. “Alexander! Help us!” 

Alexander didn’t move from his spot on the deck. He stood with his brawny 



arms crossed in front of him, calmly watching the fight. 

The flames had nearly been quenched, but they suddenly flared up again. 

“Sheena—the fire!” I cried. “Put out the fire!” 

She grabbed the bucket and poured seawater everywhere. 

One of the kidnappers kicked the bucket from her hands. It landed in the 
water with a splash. 

Sheena picked up a life jacket and beat the last of the flames out. 

“Drop down into their boat and toss them in the water!” I heard a kidnapper 
shout up above. 

A man started to lower himself to our dinghy. But suddenly he lurched 
forward, his arms flailing. He let out a cry of surprise as his boat began to rock 
violently to the left. It looked as if it had been slammed by a huge wave. 

The kidnappers cried out as their boat began to rock back and forth. Slowly 
at first. Then violently. Gripping the sides of the dinghy, I watched them clinging 
to the rail, screaming in confusion and surprise. 

Dr. D. slowly stood up, trying to see what was happening. 

The boat tossed violently, as if bucking tall waves. 

The mermaids. I could see them now. 

They had surrounded the kidnappers’ ship and were rocking it hard. 

Hard. Harder. The kidnappers hung on helplessly. 

“Mission accomplished!” Dr. D. cried happily. He started up the motor and 
we roared off. 

Turning back, I could see the boat tilting and rocking in the water. And I 
could see our mermaid swimming free, behind the other mermaids in the 
shimmering waves. 

“She got away!” I cried. “She’s free!” 

“I hope she’ll be all right,” said Sheena. 

“We’ll look for her tomorrow,” said Dr. D. as he steered us back to the sea 
lab. “We know where to find her now.” 

Sheena glanced at me. I glanced back. 

Oh, no, I thought. After all this, it can’t be true. 

Is Dr. D. going to catch the mermaid again—and give her to the zoo? 

Sheena and I met in the galley the next morning. Since Alexander was gone, we 
had to fix our own breakfasts. 

“Do you think the mermaid went back to the lagoon?” asked Sheena. 



“Probably,” I replied. “That’s where she lives.” 

She spooned some cereal into her mouth and chewed with a thoughtful look 
on her face. 

“Sheena,” I said, “if someone gave you a million dollars, would you show 
them where the mermaid lives?” 

“No,” Sheena replied. “Not if they wanted to capture her.” 

“Me, neither,” I said. “That’s what I don’t get. Dr. D. is a great guy. I just 
can’t believe he’d—” 

I stopped. I heard a noise. The sound of a motor. 

Sheena listened. She heard it, too. 

We dropped our spoons and ran up on deck. 

Dr. D. was standing on the deck, staring out to sea. 

A boat was approaching. A white boat with Marina Zoo stenciled on the 
side in large letters. 

“The zoo people!” I said to Sheena. “They’re here!” 

What would our uncle do? I wondered with growing dread. Would he tell 
them where the mermaid was? Would he accept the million dollars? 

Sheena and I ducked behind the cockpit. We watched the Marina Zoo boat 
tie up beside the Cassandra. I recognized Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman. 

Mr. Showalter tossed a rope to Dr. D. Ms. Wickman jumped aboard. 

The zoo people smiled and shook Dr. D.’s hand. He nodded at them 
solemnly. 

“We had word from the fishermen on Santa Anita that you found the 
mermaid,” Mr. Showalter said. “We’re ready to take her with us now.” 

Ms. Wickman opened her briefcase and pulled out a slender envelope. 
“Here is a check for one million dollars, Dr. Deep,” she said, smiling. “We’ve 
made it out to you and the Cassandra Research Lab.” 

She held out the check to my uncle. 

I peered out from behind the cockpit. Please don’t take it, Dr. D., I pleaded 
silently. Please don’t take the check. 

“Thank you very much,” my uncle said. He reached out a hand and took the 
check from her. 



28 


“A million dollars means a great deal to me and my work,” Dr. D. said. “Your 
zoo has been very generous. That’s why I’m sorry I have to do this.” 

He raised the envelope and tore it in half. 

The two zoo people gasped in surprise. 

“I can’t take the money,” Dr. D. said. 

“Just what are you saying, Dr. Deep?” Mr. Showalter demanded. 

“You sent me on a wild goose chase,” my uncle replied. “I have searched 
these waters thoroughly ever since you left. With my equipment, I searched 
every inch of the lagoon and all the surrounding waters. I am now more 
convinced than ever before that mermaids do not exist.” 

“Yaaaay!” I screamed to myself. I wanted to jump up and down and cheer 
my head off—but I stayed hidden with Sheena behind the cockpit. 

“But what about the fishermen’s stories?” Ms. Wickman protested. 

“The local fishermen have told mermaid stories for years,” Dr. D. told her. 
“I think they believe they’ve really seen mermaids rising through the mist on 
foggy days. But what they have seen are only fish, or dolphins, or manatees, or 
even swimmers. Because mermaids don’t exist. They’re fantasy creatures.” 

Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman both sighed in disappointment. 

“Are you sure about this?” Mr. Showalter asked. 

“Completely sure,” my uncle replied firmly. “My equipment is very 
sensitive. It can pick up the tiniest minnow.” 

“We respect your opinion, Dr. Deep,” Mr. Showalter said with some 
sadness. “You’re the leading expert on exotic sea creatures. That’s why we came 
to you in the first place.” 

“Thank you,” said Dr. D. “Then I hope you’ll take my advice and drop your 
hunt for a mermaid.” 

“I guess we’ll have to,” said Ms. Wickman. “Thank you for trying, Dr. 
Deep.” 

They all shook hands. Then the zoo people got back on their boat and 
motored away. 

The coast was clear. Sheena and I came bursting out of our hiding place. 

“Dr. D.!” cried Sheena, throwing her arms around him. “You’re the 



greatest!” 

A wide grin spread over Dr. D.’s face. “Thanks, guys,” he said. “From now 
on, none of us will say anything to anyone about mermaids. Is it a deal?” 

“It’s a deal,” Sheena instantly agreed. 

“Deal,” I said. We all shook hands. The mermaid was our secret. 

I swore I’d never mention the mermaid to anyone. But I wanted to see her one 
last time. I wanted to say good-bye. 

After lunch, Sheena and Dr. D. went to their cabins to nap. We had been up 
for most of the night, after all. I pretended to take a nap, too. 

But once they were asleep, I sneaked out of my cabin and slipped into the 
bright blue water. 

I swam over to the lagoon to search for the mermaid. 

The sun was high in a pale blue sky. It glowed down on the still lagoon 
waters, making them glitter as if covered in gold. 

Mermaid? Where are you? I wondered. 

I was just past the reef when I felt a playful tug on my leg. 

Sheena? I thought. Had she followed me again ? 

I spun around to catch her. 

No one there. 

Seaweed, probably, I thought. I kept swimming. 

A few seconds later, I felt the tug again. Harder this time. 

Hey—it must be the mermaid! I told myself. 

I turned once again to search for her. 

The water rippled. “Mermaid?” I called. A head popped out of the water. A 
gigantic, slimy, dark green head. With one enormous eye. And a mouthful of 
jagged teeth. “The sea monster!” I shrieked. “The sea monster!” Would they 
believe me this time? 




THE SCARECROW 
WALKS AT MIDNIGHT 
Goosebumps - 20 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“Hey, Jodie—wait up!” 

I turned and squinted into the bright sunlight. My brother, Mark, was still 
on the concrete train platform. The train had clattered off. I could see it snaking 
its way through the low, green meadows in the distance. 

I turned to Stanley. Stanley is the hired man on my grandparents’ farm. He 
stood beside me, carrying both suitcases. “Look in the dictionary for the word 
‘slowpoke’,” I said, “and you’ll see Mark’s picture.” 

Stanley smiled at me. “I like the dictionary, Jodie,” he said. “Sometimes I 
read it for hours.” 

“Hey, Mark—get a move on!” I cried. But he was taking his good time, 
walking slowly, in a daze as usual. 

I tossed my blond hair behind my shoulders and turned back to Stanley. 
Mark and I hadn’t visited the farm for a year. But Stanley still looked the same. 

He’s so skinny. “Like a noodle”, my grandma always says. His denim 
overalls always look five sizes too big on him. 

Stanley is about forty or forty-five, I think. He wears his dark hair in a 
crewcut, shaved close to his head. His ears are huge. They stick way out and are 
always bright red. And he has big, round, brown eyes that remind me of puppy 
eyes. 

Stanley isn’t very smart. Grandpa Kurt always says that Stanley isn’t 
working with a full one hundred watts. 

But Mark and I really like him. He has a quiet sense of humor. And he is 
kind and gentle and friendly, and always has lots of amazing things to show us 
whenever we visit the farm. 

“You look nice, Jodie,” Stanley said, his cheeks turning as red as his ears. 
“How old are you now?” 

“Twelve,” I told him. “And Mark is eleven.” 

He thought about it. “That makes twenty-three,” he joked. 

We both laughed. You never know what Stanley is going to say! 

“I think I stepped in something gross,” Mark complained, catching up to us. 

I always know what Mark is going to say. My brother only knows three 
words— cool, weird, and gross. Really. That’s his whole vocabulary. 



As a joke, I gave him a dictionary for his last birthday. “You’re weird,” 
Mark said when I handed it to him. “What a gross gift.” 

He scraped his white high-tops on the ground as we followed Stanley to the 
beat-up, red pickup truck. “Carry my backpack for me,” Mark said, trying to 
shove the bulging backpack at me. 

“No way,” I told him. “Carry it yourself.” 

The backpack contained his Walkman, about thirty tapes, comic books, his 
Game Boy, and at least fifty game cartridges. I knew he planned to spend the 
whole month lying on the hammock on the screened-in back porch of the 
farmhouse, listening to music and playing video games. 

Well... no way! 

Mom and Dad said it was my job to make sure Mark got outside and 
enjoyed the farm. We were so cooped up in the city all year. That’s why they 
sent us to visit Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam for a month each summer— 
to enjoy the great outdoors. 

We stopped beside the truck while Stanley searched his overall pockets for 
the key. “It’s going to get pretty hot today,” Stanley said, “unless it cools down.” 

A typical Stanley weather report. 

I gazed out at the wide, grassy field beyond the small train station parking 
lot. Thousands of tiny white puffballs floated up against the clear blue sky. 

It was so beautiful! 

Naturally, I sneezed. 

I love visiting my grandparents’ farm. My only problem is, I’m allergic to 
just about everything on it. 

So Mom packs several bottles of my allergy medicine for me—and lots of 
tissues. 

“Gesundheit, ” Stanley said. He tossed our two suitcases in the back of the 
pickup. Mark slid his backpack in, too. “Can I ride in back?” he asked. 

He loves to lie flat in the back, staring up at the sky, and bumping up and 
down really hard. 

Stanley is a terrible driver. He can’t seem to concentrate on steering and 
driving at the right speed at the same time. So there are always lots of quick 
turns and heavy bumps. 

Mark lifted himself into the back of the pickup and stretched out next to the 
suitcases. I climbed beside Stanley in the front. 

A short while later, we were bouncing along the narrow, twisting road that 



led to the farm. I stared out the dusty window at the passing meadows and 
farmhouses. Everything looked so green and alive. 

Stanley drove with both hands wrapped tightly around the top of the 
steering wheel. He sat forward stiffly, leaning over the wheel, staring straight 
ahead through the windshield without blinking. 

“Mr. Mortimer doesn’t farm his place anymore,” he said, lifting one hand 
from the wheel to point to a big, white farmhouse on top of a sloping, green hill. 

“Why not?” I asked. 

“Because he died,” Stanley replied solemnly. 

See what I mean? You never know what Stanley is going to say. 

We bounced over a deep rut in the road. I was sure Mark was having a great 
time in back. 

The road leads through the small town, so small that it doesn’t even have a 
name. The farmers have always called it Town. 

It has a feed store, a combination gas station and grocery store, a white- 
steepled church, a hardware store, and a mailbox. 

There were two trucks parked in front of the feed store. I didn’t see anyone 
as we barreled past. 

My grandparents’ farm is about two miles from town. I recognized the 
cornfields as we approached. 

“The corn is so high already!” I exclaimed, staring through the bouncing 
window. “Have you eaten any yet?” 

“Just at dinner,” Stanley replied. 

Suddenly, he slowed the truck and turned his eyes to me. “The scarecrow 
walks at midnight,” he uttered in a low voice. 

“Huh?” I wasn’t sure I’d heard correctly. 

“The scarecrow walks at midnight,” he repeated, training his big puppy 
eyes on me. “I read it in the book.” 

I didn’t know what to say, so I laughed. I thought maybe he was making a 

joke. 


Days later, I realized it was no joke. 



2 


Watching the farm spread out in front of us filled me with happiness. It’s not a 
big farm or a fancy farm, but I like everything about it. 

I like the barn with its sweet smells. I like the low mooing sounds of the 
cows way off in the far pasture. I like to watch the tall stalks of corn, all swaying 
together in the wind. 

Corny, huh? 

I also like the scary ghost stories Grandpa Kurt tells us at night in front of 
the fireplace. 

And I have to include Grandma Miriam’s chocolate chip pancakes. They’re 
so good, I sometimes dream about them back home in the city. 

I also like the happy expressions on my grandparents’ faces when we come 
mshing up to greet them. 

Of course I was the first one out of the truck. Mark was as slow as usual. I 
went running up to the screen porch in back of their big, old farmhouse. I 
couldn’t wait to see my grandparents. 

Grandma Miriam came waddling out, her arms outstretched. The screen 
door slammed behind her. But then I saw Grandpa Kurt push it open and he 
hurried out, too. 

His limp was worse, I noticed right away. He leaned heavily on a white 
cane. He’d never needed one before. 

I didn’t have time to think about it as Mark and I were smothered in hugs. 
“So good to see you! It’s been so long, so long!” Grandma Miriam cried happily. 

There were the usual comments about how much taller we were and how 
grown up we looked. 

“Jodie, where’d you get that blond hair? There aren’t any blonds in my 
family,” Grandpa Kurt would say, shaking his mane of white hair. “You must get 
that from your father’s side. 

“No, I know. I bet you got it from a store,” he said, grinning. It was his little 
joke. He greeted me with it every summer. And his blue eyes would sparkle 
excitedly. 

“You’re right. It’s a wig,” I told him, laughing. 

He gave my long blond hair a playful tug. 



“Did you get cable yet?” Mark asked, dragging his backpack along the 
ground. 

“Cable TV?” Grandpa Kurt stared hard at Mark. “Not yet. But we still get 
three channels. How many more do we need?” 

Mark rolled his eyes. “No MTV,” he groaned. 

Stanley made his way past us, carrying our suitcases into the house. 

“Let’s go in. I’ll bet you’re starving,” Grandma Miriam said. “I made soup 
and sandwiches. We’ll have chicken and corn tonight. The corn is very sweet 
this year. I know how you two love it.” 

I watched my grandparents as they led the way to the house. They both 
looked older to me. They moved more slowly than I remembered. Grandpa 
Kurt’s limp was definitely worse. They both seemed tired. 

Grandma Miriam is short and chubby. She has a round face surrounded by 
curly red hair. Bright red. There’s no way to describe the color. I don’t know 
what she uses to dye it that color. I’ve never seen it on anyone else! 

She wears square-shaped eyeglasses that give her a really old-fashioned 
look. She likes big, roomy housedresses. I don’t think I’ve ever seen her in jeans 
or pants. 

Grandpa Kurt is tall and broad-shouldered. Mom says he was really 
handsome when he was young. “Like a movie star,” she always tells me. 

Now he has wavy, white hair, still very thick, that he wets and slicks down 
flat on his head. He has sparkling blue eyes that always make me smile. And a 
white stubble over his slender face. Grandpa Kurt doesn’t like to shave. 

Today he was wearing a long-sleeved, red-and-green-plaid shirt, buttoned to 
the collar despite the hot day, and baggy jeans, stained at one knee, held up by 
white suspenders. 

Lunch was fun. We sat around the long kitchen table. Sunlight poured in 
through the big window. I could see the barn in back and the cornfields 
stretching behind it. 

Mark and I told all our news—about school, about my basketball team 
going to the championships, about our new car, about Dad growing a mustache. 

For some reason, Stanley thought that was very funny. He was laughing so 
hard, he choked on his split-pea soup. And Grandpa Kurt had to reach over and 
slap him on the back. 

It’s hard to know what will crack Stanley up. As Mark would say, Stanley is 
definitely weird. 



All through lunch, I kept staring at my grandparents. I couldn’t get over 
how much they had changed in one year. They seemed so much quieter, so much 
slower. 

That’s what it means to get older, I told myself. 

“Stanley will have to show you his scarecrows,” Grandma Miriam said, 
passing the bowl of potato chips. “Won’t you, Stanley?” 

Grandpa Kurt cleared his throat loudly. I had the feeling he was telling 
Grandma Miriam to change the subject or something. 

“I made them,” Stanley said, grinning proudly. He turned his big eyes on 
me. “The book—it told me how.” 

“Are you still taking guitar lessons?” Grandpa Kurt asked Mark. 

I could see that, for some reason, Grandpa Kurt didn’t want to talk about 
Stanley’s scarecrows. 

“Yeah,” Mark answered with a mouthful of potato chips. “But I sold my 
acoustic. I switched to electric.” 

“You mean you have to plug it in?” Stanley asked. He started to giggle, as if 
he had just cracked a funny joke. 

“What a shame you didn’t bring your guitar,” Grandma Miriam said to 
Mark. 

“No, it isn’t,” I teased. “The cows would start giving sour milk!” 

“Shut up, Jodie!” Mark snapped. He has no sense of humor. 

“They already do give sour milk,” Grandpa Kurt muttered, lowering his 

eyes. 

“Bad luck. When cows give sour milk, it means bad luck,” Stanley 
declared, his eyes widening, his expression suddenly fearful. 

“It’s okay, Stanley,” Grandma Miriam assured him quickly, placing a hand 
gently on his shoulder. “Grandpa Kurt was only teasing.” 

“If you kids are finished, why not go with Stanley,” Grandpa Kurt said. 
“He’ll give you a tour of the farm. You always enjoy that.” He sighed. “I’d go 
along, but my leg—it’s been acting up again.” 

Grandma Miriam started to clear the dishes. Mark and I followed Stanley 
out the back door. The grass in the back yard had recently been mowed. The air 
was heavy with its sweet smell. 

I saw a hummingbird fluttering over the flower garden beside the house. I 
pointed it out to Mark, but by the time he turned, it had hummed away. 

At the back of the long, green yard stood the old barn. Its white walls were 



badly stained and peeling. It really needed a paint job. The doors were open, and 
I could see square bales of straw inside. 

Far to the right of the barn, almost to the cornfields, stood the small guest 
house where Stanley lived with his teenage son, Sticks. 

“Stanley—where’s Sticks?” I asked. “Why wasn’t he at lunch?” 

“Went to town,” Stanley answered quietly. “Went to town, riding on a 
pony.” 

Mark and I exchanged glances. We never can figure Stanley out. 

Poking up from the cornfield stood several dark figures, the scarecrows 
Grandma Miriam had started to talk about. I stared out at them, shielding my 
eyes from the sun with one hand. 

“So many scarecrows!” I exclaimed. “Stanley, last summer there was only 
one. Why are there so many now?” 

He didn’t reply. He didn’t seem to hear me. He had a black baseball cap 
pulled down low over his forehead. He was taking long strides, leaning forward 
with that storklike walk of his, his hands shoved into the pockets of his baggy 
denim overalls. 

“We’ve seen the farm a hundred times,” Mark complained, whispering to 
me. “Why do we have to take the grand tour again?” 

“Mark—cool your jets,” I told him. “We always take a tour of the farm. It’s 
a tradition.” 

Mark grumbled to himself. He really is lazy. He never wants to do anything. 

Stanley led the way past the barn into the cornfields. The stalks were way 
over my head. Their golden tassels gleamed in the bright sunlight. 

Stanley reached up and pulled an ear off the stalk. “Let’s see if it’s ready,” 
he said, grinning at Mark and me. 

He held the ear in his left hand and started to shuck it with his right. 

After a few seconds, he pulled the husk away, revealing the ear of corn 
inside. 

I stared at it—and let out a horrified cry. 



3 


“Ohhhh—it’s disgusting !” I shrieked. 

“Gross!” I heard Mark groan. 

The corn was a disgusting brown color. And it was moving on the cob. 
Wriggling. Squirming. 

Stanley raised the corn to his face to examine it. And I realized it was 
covered with worms. Hundreds of wriggling, brown worms. 

“No!” Stanley cried in horror. He let the ear of corn drop to the ground at 
his feet. “That’s bad luck! The book says so. That’s very bad luck!” 

I stared down at the ear of corn. The worms were wriggling off the cob, 
onto the dirt. 

“It’s okay, Stanley,” I told him. “I only screamed because I was surprised. 
This happens sometimes. Sometimes worms get into the corn. Grandpa told me.” 

“No. It’s bad,” Stanley insisted in a trembling voice. His red ears were 
aflame. His big eyes revealed his fear. “The book—it says so.” 

“What book?” Mark demanded. He kicked the wormy ear of corn away 
with the toe of his high-top. 

“My book,” Stanley replied mysteriously. “My superstition book.” 

Uh-oh, I thought. Stanley shouldn’t have a book about superstitions. He 
was already the most superstitious person in the world—even without a book! 

“You’ve been reading a book about superstitions?” Mark asked him, 
watching the brown worms crawl over the soft dirt. 

“Yes.” Stanley nodded his head enthusiastically. “It’s a good book. It tells 
me everything. And it’s all true. All of it!” 

He pulled off his cap and scratched his stubby hair. “I’ve got to check the 
book. I’ve got to see what to do about the corn. The bad corn.” 

He was getting pretty worked up. It was making me feel a little scared. I’ve 
known Stanley my whole life. I think he’s worked for Grandpa Kurt for more 
than twenty years. 

He’s always been strange. But I’ve never seen him get so upset about 
something as unimportant as a bad ear of corn. 

“Show us the scarecrows,” I said, trying to get his mind off the corn. 

“Yeah. Let’s see them,” Mark joined in. 



“Okay. The scarecrows.” Stanley nodded. Then he turned, still thinking 
hard, and began leading the way through the tall rows of cornstalks. 

The stalks creaked and groaned as we passed by them. It was kind of an 
eerie sound. 

Suddenly, a shadow fell over me. One of the dark scarecrows rose up in 
front of us. It wore a tattered black coat, stuffed with straw. Its arms stretched 
stiffly out at its sides. 

The scarecrow was tall, towering over my head. Tall enough to stand over 
the high cornstalks. 

Its head was a faded burlap bag, filled with straw. Evil black eyes and a 
menacing frown had been painted on thickly in black paint. A battered old- 
fashioned hat rested on its head. 

“You made these?” I asked Stanley. I could see several other scarecrows 
poking up from the corn. They all stood in the same stiff position. They all had 
the same menacing frown. 

He stared up the scarecrow’s face. “I made them,” he said in a low voice. 
“The book showed me how.” 

“They’re pretty scary looking,” Mark said, standing close beside me. He 
grabbed the scarecrow’s straw hand and shook it. “What’s up?” Mark asked it. 

“The scarecrow walks at midnight,” Stanley said, repeating the phrase he 
had used at the train station. 

Mark was trying to slap the scarecrow a high-five. 

“What does that mean?” I asked Stanley. 

“The book told me how,” Stanley replied, keeping his eyes on the dark- 
painted face on the burlap bag. “The book told me how to make them walk.” 

“Huh? You mean you make the scarecrows walk?” I asked, very confused. 

Stanley’s dark eyes locked on mine. Once again, he got that very solemn 
expression on his face. “I know how to do it. The book has all the words.” 

I stared back at him, totally confused. I didn’t know what to say. 

“I made them walk, Jodie,” Stanley continued in a voice just above a 
whisper. “I made them walk last week. And now I’m the boss.” 

“Huh? The boss of the s-scarecrows?” I stammered. “Do you mean—” 

I stopped when, out of the corner of my eye, I saw the scarecrow’s arm 
move. 

The straw crinkled as the arm slid up. 

Then I felt rough straw brush against my face—as the dry scarecrow arm 



moved to my throat. 



4 


The prickly straw, poking out of the sleeve of the black coat, scraped against my 
neck. 

I let out a shrill scream. 

“It’s alivel” I cried in panic, diving to the ground, scrambling away on all 
fours. 

I turned back to see Mark and Stanley calmly watching me. 

Hadn’t they seen the scarecrow try to choke me? 

Then Stanley’s son, Sticks, stepped out from behind the scarecrow, a gleeful 
grin on his face. 

“Sticks—! You creep!” I cried angrily. I knew at once that he had moved 
the scarecrow’s arm. 

“You city kids sure scare easy,” Sticks said, his grin growing wider. He 
reached down to help me to my feet. “You really thought the scarecrow moved, 
didn’t you, Jodie?” he said accusingly. 

“I can make the scarecrows move,” Stanley said, pulling the cap down 
lower on his forehead. 

“I can make them walk. I did it. It’s all in the book.” 

Sticks’ smile faded. The light seemed to dim from his dark eyes. “Yeah, 
sure, Dad,” he murmured. 

Sticks is sixteen. He is tall and lanky. He has long, skinny arms and legs. 
That’s how he got the nickname Sticks. 

He tries to look tough. He has long black hair down past his collar, which 
he seldom washes. He wears tight muscle shirts and dirty jeans, ripped at the 
knees. He sneers a lot, and his dark eyes always seem to be laughing at you. 

He calls Mark and me “the city kids”. He always says it with a sneer. And 
he’s always playing stupid jokes on us. I think he’s kind of jealous of Mark and 
me. I don’t think it’s been easy for Sticks to grow up on the farm, living in the 
little guest house with his dad. 

I mean, Stanley is more like a kid than a father. 

“I saw you back there,” Mark told Sticks. 

“Well, thanks for warning me!” I snapped at Mark. I turned back angrily to 
Sticks. “I see you haven’t changed at all.” 



“Great to see you, too, Jodie,” he replied sarcastically. “The city kids are 
back for another month with the hicks!” 

“Sticks—what’s your problem?” I shot back. 

“Be nice,” Stanley muttered. “The corn has ears, you know.” 

We all stared at Stanley. Had he just made a joke? It was hard to tell with 

him. 

Stanley’s face remained serious. His big eyes stared out at me through the 
shade of his cap. “The corn has ears,” he repeated. “There are spirits in the 
field.” 

Sticks shook his head unhappily. “Dad, you spend too much time with that 
superstition book,” he muttered. 

“The book is all true,” Stanley replied. “It’s all true.” 

Sticks kicked at the dirt. He raised his eyes to me. His expression seemed 
very sad. “Things are different here,” he murmured. 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand. “What do you mean?” 

Sticks turned to his father. Stanley was staring back at him, his eyes 
narrowed. 

Sticks shrugged and didn’t reply. He grabbed Mark’s arm and squeezed it. 
“You’re as flabby as ever,” he told Mark. “Want to throw a football around this 
afternoon?” 

“It’s kind of hot,” Mark replied. He wiped the sweat off his forehead with 
the back of his hand. 

Sticks sneered at him. “Still a wimp, huh?” 

“No way!” Mark protested. “I just said it was hot, that’s all.” 

“Hey—you’ve got something on your back,” Sticks told Mark. “Turn 
around.” 

Mark obediently turned around. 

Sticks quickly bent down, picked up the wormy corncob, and stuffed it 
down the back of Mark’s T-shirt. 

I had to laugh as I watched my brother run screaming all the way back to 
the farmhouse. 

Dinner was quiet. Grandma Miriam’s fried chicken was as tasty as ever. And she 
was right about the corn. It was very sweet. Mark and I each ate two ears, 
dripping with butter. 

I enjoyed the dinner. But it upset me that both of my grandparents seemed 



so changed. Grandpa Kurt used to talk nonstop. He always had dozens of funny 
stories about the farmers in the area. And he always had new jokes to tell. 

Tonight he barely said a word. 

Grandma Miriam kept urging Mark and me to eat more. And she kept 
asking us how we liked everything. But she, too, seemed quieter. 

They both seemed tense. Uncomfortable. 

They both kept glancing down the table at Stanley, who was eating with 
both hands, butter dripping down his chin. 

Sticks sat glumly across from his father. He seemed even more unfriendly 
than usual. 

Stanley was the only cheerful person at the table. He chewed his chicken 
enthusiastically and asked for a third helping of mashed potatoes. 

“Is everything okay, Stanley?” Grandma Miriam kept asking, biting her 
bottom lip. “Everything okay?” 

Stanley burped and smiled. “Not bad,” was his reply. 

Why do things seem so different? I wondered. Is it just because Grandma 
and Grandpa are getting old? 

After dinner, we sat around the big, comfortable living room. Grandpa Kurt 
rocked gently back and forth in the antique wooden rocking chair by the 
fireplace. 

It was too hot to build a fire. But as he rocked, he stared into the dark 
fireplace, a thoughtful expression on his white-stubbled face. 

Grandma Miriam sat in her favorite chair, a big, green overstuffed armchair 
across from Grandpa Kurt. She had an unopened gardening magazine in her lap. 

Sticks, who had barely said two words the whole evening, disappeared. 
Stanley leaned against the wall, poking his teeth with a toothpick. 

Mark sank down into the long, green couch. I sat down at the other end of it 
and stared across the room. 

“Yuck. That stuffed bear still gives me the creeps!” I exclaimed. 

At the far end of the room, an enormous stuffed brown bear—about eight 
feet tall—stood straight up on its hind legs. Grandpa Kurt had shot it many years 
ago on a hunting trip. The bear’s huge paws were extended, as if ready to 
pounce. 

“That was a killer bear,” Grandpa Kurt remembered, rocking slowly, his 
eyes on the angry-looking beast. “He mauled two hunters before I shot him. I 
saved their lives.” 



I shuddered and turned away from the bear. I really hated it. I don’t know 
why Grandma Miriam let Grandpa Kurt keep it in the living room! 

“How about a scary story?” I asked Grandpa Kurt. 

He stared back at me, his blue eyes suddenly lifeless and dull. 

“Yeah. We’ve been looking forward to your stories,” Mark chimed in. “Tell 
us the one about the headless boy in the closet.” 

“No. Tell a new one,” I insisted eagerly. 

Grandpa Kurt rubbed his chin slowly. His eyes went to Stanley across the 
room. Then he cleared his throat nervously. 

“I’m kind of tired, kids,” he said softly. “Think I’ll just go to bed.” 

“But—no story?” I protested. 

He stared back at me with those dull eyes. “I don’t really know any stories,” 
he murmured. He slowly climbed to his feet and headed toward his room. 

What is going on here? I asked myself. What is wrong? 



5 


Upstairs in my bedroom later that night, I changed into a long nightshirt. The 
bedroom window was open, and a soft breeze invaded the room. 

I stared out the open window. A broad apple tree cast its shadow over the 
lawn. 

Where the grass ended, the cornfields stretched out under the glow of the 
full moon. The pale moonlight made the tall stalks shimmer like gold. The stalks 
cast long blue shadows over the field. 

Across the wide field, the scarecrows poked up stiffly like dark-uniformed 
soldiers. Their coat sleeves ruffled in the light breeze. Their pale burlap faces 
seemed to stare back at me. 

I felt a cold chill run down my back. 

So many scarecrows. At least a dozen of them, standing in straight rows. 
Like an army ready to march. 

“The scarecrow walks at midnight.” 

That’s what Stanley had said in that low, frightening tone I had never heard 
him use before. 

I glanced at the clock on the bed table. Just past ten o’clock. 

I’ll be asleep by the time they walk, I thought. 

A crazy thought. 

I sneezed. It seems I’m allergic to the farm air both day and night! 

I stared at the long shadows cast by the scarecrows. A gust of wind bent the 
stalks, making the shadows roll forward like a dark ocean wave. 

And then I saw the scarecrows start to twitch. 

“Mark!” I screamed. “Mark—come here! Hurry!” 



6 


Under the light of the full moon, I stared in horror as the dark scarecrows started 
to move. 

Their arms jerked. Their burlap heads lurched forward. 

All of them. In unison. 

All of the scarecrows were jerking, twitching, straining—as if struggling to 
pull free of their stakes. 

“Mark—hurry!” I screamed. 

I heard footsteps clomping rapidly down the hall. Mark burst breathlessly 
into my room. “Jodie—what is it?” he cried. 

I motioned frantically for him to come to the window. As he stepped beside 
me, I pointed to the cornfields. “Look—the scarecrows.” 

He gripped the windowsill and leaned out the window. 

Over his shoulder, I could see the scarecrows twitch in unison. A cold 
shudder made me wrap my arms around myself. 

“It’s the wind,” Mark said, stepping back from the window. “What’s your 
problem, Jodie? It’s just the wind blowing them around.” 

“You—you’re wrong, Mark,” I stammered, still hugging myself. “Look 
again.” 

He rolled his eyes and sighed. But he turned back and leaned out the 
window. He gazed out at the field for a long time. 

“Don’t you see?” I demanded shrilly. “They’re all moving together. Their 
arms, their heads—all moving together.” 

When Mark pulled back from the window, his blue eyes were wide and 
fearful. He stared at me thoughtfully and didn’t say a word. 

Finally, he swallowed hard and his voice came out low and frightened. 
“We’ve got to tell Grandpa Kurt,” he said. 

We rushed downstairs, but our grandparents had gone to bed. The bedroom door 
was closed. It was silent on the other side. 

“Maybe we’d better wait till tomorrow morning,” I whispered as Mark and 
I tiptoed back upstairs to our rooms. “I think we’ll be safe till then.” 

We crept back to our rooms. I pushed the window shut and locked it. Out in 



the fields, the scarecrows were still twitching, still pulling at their stakes. 

With a shudder, I turned away from the window and plunged into the bed, 
pulling the old quilt up over my head. 

I slept restlessly, tossing under the heavy quilt. In the morning, I jumped 
eagerly from bed. I ran a brush through my hair and hurried down to breakfast. 

Mark was right behind me on the stairs. He was wearing the same jeans as 
yesterday and a red-and-black Nirvana T-shirt. He hadn’t bothered to brush his 
hair. It stood straight up in back. 

“Pancakes!” he managed to choke out. Mark is only good for one word at a 
time this early in the morning. 

But the word instantly cheered me up and made me forget for a moment 
about the creepy scarecrows. 

How could I have forgotten about Grandma Miriam’s amazing chocolate 
chip pancakes? 

They are so soft, they really do melt in your mouth. And the warm 
chocolate mixed with the sweet maple syrup makes the most delicious breakfast 
I’ve ever eaten. 

As we hurried across the living room toward the kitchen, I sniffed the air, 
hoping to smell that wonderful aroma of pancake batter on the stove. 

But my nose was too stuffed up to smell anything. 

Mark and I burst into the kitchen at the same time. Grandpa Kurt and 
Stanley were already at the table. A big blue pot of coffee stood steaming in 
front of them. 

Stanley sipped his coffee. Grandpa Kurt had his face buried behind the 
morning newspaper. He glanced up and smiled as Mark and I entered. 

Everyone said good morning to everyone. 

Mark and I took our places at the table. We were so eager for the famous 
pancakes, we were practically rubbing our hands together the way cartoon 
characters do. 

Imagine our shock when Grandma Miriam set down big bowls of 
cornflakes in front of us. 

I practically burst into tears. 

I glanced across the table at Mark. He was staring back at me, his face 
revealing his surprise—and disappointment. “Cornflakes?” he asked in a high- 
pitched voice. 

Grandma Miriam had gone back to the sink. I turned to her. “Grandma 



Miriam—no pancakes?” I asked meekly. 

I saw her glance at Stanley. “I’ve stopped making them, Jodie,” she replied, 
her eyes still on Stanley. “Pancakes are too fattening.” 

“Nothing like a good bowl of cornflakes in the morning,” Stanley said with 
a big smile. He reached for the cornflakes box in the center of the table and filled 
his bowl up with a second helping. 

Grandpa Kurt grunted behind his newspaper. 

“Go ahead—eat them before they get soggy,” Grandma Miriam urged from 
the sink. 

Mark and I just stared at each other. Last summer, Grandma Miriam had 
made us a big stack of chocolate chip pancakes almost every morning! 

What is going on here? I wondered once again. 

I suddenly remembered Sticks out in the cornfields the day before, 
whispering to me, “Things are different here.” 

They sure were different. And not for the better, I decided. 

My stomach grumbled. I picked up the spoon and started to eat my 
cornflakes. I saw Mark glumly spooning his. And then I suddenly remembered 
the twitching scarecrows. 

“Grandpa Kurt—” I started. “Last night, Mark and I—we were looking out 
at the cornfields and we saw the scarecrows. They were moving. We—” 

I heard Grandma Miriam utter a low gasp from behind me. 

Grandpa Kurt lowered his newspaper. He narrowed his eyes at me, but 
didn’t say a word. 

“The scarecrows were moving!” Mark chimed in. 

Stanley chuckled. “It was the wind,” he said, his eyes on Grandpa Kurt. “It 
had to be the wind blowing them around.” 

Grandpa Kurt glared at Stanley. “You sure?” he demanded. 

“Yeah. It was the wind,” Stanley replied tensely. 

“But they were trying to get off their poles!” I cried. “We saw them!” 

Grandpa Kurt stared hard at Stanley. 

Stanley’s ears turned bright red. He lowered his eyes. “It was a breezy 
night,” he said. “They move in the wind.” 

“It’s going to be a sunny day,” Grandma Miriam said brightly from the sink. 

“But the scarecrows—” Mark insisted. 

“Yep. Looks like a real pretty day,” Grandpa Kurt mumbled, ignoring Mark. 

He doesn’t want to talk about the scarecrows, I realized. 



Is it because he doesn’t believe us? 

Grandpa Kurt turned to Stanley. “After you take the cows to pasture, maybe 
you and Jodie and Mark can do some fishing at the creek.” 

“Maybe,” Stanley replied, studying the cornflakes box. “Maybe we could 
just do that.” 

“Sounds like fun,” Mark said. Mark likes fishing. It’s one of his favorite 
sports because you don’t have to move too much. 

There’s a really pretty creek behind the cow pasture at the far end of 
Grandpa Kurt’s property. It’s very woodsy back there, and the narrow creek 
trickles softly beneath the old shade trees and is usually filled with fish. 

Finishing my cereal, I turned to Grandma Miriam at the sink. “And what 
are you doing today?” I asked her. “Maybe you and I could spend some time 
together and—” 

I stopped as she turned toward me and her hand came into view. 

“Ohhhh.” I let out a frightened moan when I saw her hand. It—it was made 
of straw! 



7 


“Jodie—what’s the matter?” Grandma Miriam asked. 

I started to point to her hand. 

Then it came into sharp focus, and I saw that her hand wasn’t straw—she 
was holding a broom. 

She had gripped it by the handle and was pulling lint off the ends of the 
straw. 

“Nothing’s wrong,” I told her, feeling like a total jerk. I rubbed my eyes. 
“I’ve got to take my allergy medicine,” I told her. “My eyes are so watery. I keep 
seeing things!” 

I was seeing scarecrows everywhere I looked! 

I scolded myself for acting so crazy. 

Stop thinking about scarecrows, I told myself. Stanley was right. The 
scarecrows had moved in the wind last night. 

It was just the wind. 


* * * 


Stanley took us fishing later that morning. As we started off for the creek, he 
seemed in a really cheerful mood. 

He smiled as he swung the big picnic basket Grandma Miriam had packed 
for our lunch. “She put in all my favorites,” Stanley said happily. 

He patted the basket with childish satisfaction. 

He had three bamboo fishing poles tucked under his left arm. He carried the 
big straw basket in his right hand. He refused to let Mark and me carry anything. 

The warm air smelled sweet. The sun beamed down in a cloudless, blue 
sky. Blades of recently cut grass stuck to my white sneakers as we headed across 
the back yard. 

The medicine had helped. My eyes were much better. 

Stanley turned just past the barn and began walking quickly along its back 
wall. His expression turned solemn. He appeared to be concentrating hard on 
something. 

“Hey—where are we going?” I called, hurrying to keep up with him. 



He didn’t seem to hear me. Taking long strides, swinging the straw picnic 
basket as he walked, he headed back in the direction we started from. 

“Hey—wait up!” Mark called breathlessly. My brother hates to hurry when 
he can take his time. 

“Stanley—wait!” I cried, tugging his shirtsleeve. “We’re going around in 
circles!” 

He nodded, his expression serious under the black baseball cap. “We have 
to circle the barn three times,” he said in a low voice. 

“Huh? Why?” I demanded. 

We started our second turn around the barn. 

“It will bring us good luck with our fishing,” Stanley replied. Then he 
added, “It’s in the book. Everything is in the book.” 

I opened my mouth to tell him this was really silly. But I decided not to. He 
seemed so serious about that superstition book of his. I didn’t want to spoil it for 
him. 

Besides, Mark and I could use the exercise. 

A short while later, we finished circling and started walking along the dirt 
path that led past the cornfields to the creek. Stanley’s smile returned 
immediately. 

He really believes the superstitions in the book, I realized. 

I wondered if Sticks believed them, too. 

“Where’s Sticks?” I asked, kicking a big clump of dirt across the path. 

“Doing chores,” Stanley replied. “Sticks is a good worker. A real good 
worker. But he’ll be along soon, I bet. Sticks never likes to miss out on a fishing 
trip.” 

The sun began to feel really strong on my face and on my shoulders. I 
wondered if I should run back and get some sunblock. 

The dark-suited scarecrows appeared to stare at me as we walked past the 
tall rows of cornstalks. I could swear their pale, painted faces turned to follow 
me as I went by. 

And did one of them lift its arm to wave a straw hand at me? 

I scolded myself for such stupid thoughts, and turned my eyes away. 

Stop thinking about scarecrows, Jodie! I told myself. 

Forget your bad dream. Forget about the dumb scarecrows. 

It’s a beautiful day, and you have nothing to worry about. Try to relax and 
have a good time. 



The path led into tall pine woods behind the cornfields. It got shady and 
much cooler as soon as we stepped into the woods. 

“Can’t we take a taxi the rest of the way?” Mark whined. A typical Mark 
joke. He really would take a taxi if there was one! 

Stanley shook his head. “City kids,” he muttered, grinning. 

The path ended, and we continued through the trees. It smelled so piney and 
fresh in the woods. I saw a tiny, brown-and-white chipmunk dart into a hollow 
log. 

In the near distance I could hear the musical trickle of the creek. 

Suddenly, Stanley stopped. He bent and picked up a pinecone. 

The three fishing poles fell to the ground. He didn’t seem to notice. He held 
the pinecone close to his face, studying it. 

“A pinecone on the shady side means a long winter,” he said, turning the 
dry cone in his hand. 

Mark and I bent to pick up the poles. “Is that what the book says?” Mark 
asked. 

Stanley nodded. He set the pinecone down carefully where he found it. 

“The cone is still sticky. That’s a good sign,” he said seriously. 

Mark let out a giggle. I knew he was trying not to laugh at Stanley. But the 
giggle escaped somehow. 

Stanley’s big brown eyes filled with hurt. “It’s all true, Mark,” he said 
quietly. “It’s all true.” 

“I—I’d like to read that book,” Mark said, glancing at me. 

“It’s a very hard book,” Stanley replied. “I have trouble with some of the 
words.” 

“I can hear the creek,” I broke in, changing the subject. “Let’s go. I want to 
catch some fish before lunchtime.” 

The clear water felt cold against my legs. The smooth rocks of the creek bed 
were slippery under my bare feet. 

All three of us had waded into the shallow creek. Mark had wanted to be 
down on the grassy shore to fish. But I convinced him it was much more fun— 
and much easier to catch something—if you stand in the water. 

“Yeah, I’ll catch something,” he grumbled as he rolled up the cuffs of his 
jeans. “I’ll catch pneumonia!” 

Stanley let out a loud laugh. It sounded like, “Har! Har! Har!” 



He set the big picnic basket down carefully on the dry grass. Then he rolled 
up the legs of his denim overalls. Carrying a pole high in one hand, he stepped 
into the water. 

“Ooooh! It’s cold!” he cried, waving his arms above his head, nearly losing 
his balance on the slippery rocks. 

“Stanley—didn’t you forget something?” I called to him. 

He turned, confused. His big ears became bright red. “What did I forget, 
Jodie?” 

I pointed to his fishing pole. “How about some bait?” I called. 

He glanced at the empty hook on the end of his line. Then he made his way 
back to shore to get a worm to bait his hook. 

A few minutes later, all three of us were in the water. Mark complained at 
first about how cold it was and about how the rocks on the bottom hurt his 
delicate little feet. 

But after a while, he got into it, too. 

The creek at this point was only about two feet deep. The water was very 
clear and trickled rapidly, making little swirls and dips over the rocky bottom. 

I lowered my line into the water and watched the red plastic float bob on 
the surface. If it started to sink, I’d know I had a bite. 

The sun felt warm on my face. The cool water flowed past pleasantly. 

I wish it were deep enough to swim here, I thought. 

“Hey—I’ve got something!” Mark cried excitedly. 

Stanley and I turned and watched him tug up his line. 

Mark pulled with all his might. “It—it’s a big one, I think,” he said. 

Finally, he gave one last really hard tug—and pulled up a thick clump of 
green weeds. 

“Good one, Mark,” I said, rolling my eyes. “It’s a big one, all right.” 

“You’re a big one,” Mark shot back. “Abig jerk.” 

“Don’t be such a baby,” I muttered. 

I brushed away a buzzing horsefly and tried to concentrate on my line. But 
my mind started to wander. It always does when I’m fishing. 

I found myself thinking about the tall scarecrows in the field. They stood so 
darkly, so menacingly, so alert. Their painted faces all had the same hard stare. 

I was still picturing them when I felt the hand slip around my ankle. 

The straw scarecrow hand. 

It reached up from the water, circled my ankle, and started to tighten its 



cold, wet grip around my leg. 



8 


I screamed and tried to kick the hand away. 

But my feet slipped on the smooth rocks. My hands shot up as I toppled 
backwards. 

“Ohh!” I cried out again as I hit the water. 

The scarecrow hung on. 

On my back, the water rushing over me, I kicked and thrashed my arms. 

And then I saw it. The clump of green weeds that had wrapped itself around 
my ankle. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned out loud. 

No scarecrow. Only weeds. 

I lowered my foot to the water. I didn’t move. I just lay there on my back, 
waiting for my heart to stop pounding, feeling once again like a total jerk. 

I glanced up at Mark and Stanley. They were staring down at me, too 
startled to laugh. 

“Don’t say a word,” I warned them, struggling to my feet. “I’m warning 
you—don’t say a word.” 

Mark snickered, but he obediently didn’t say anything. 

“I didn’t bring a towel,” Stanley said with concern. “I’m sorry, Jodie, I 
didn’t know you wanted to swim.” 

That made Mark burst out in loud guffaws. 

I shot Mark a warning stare. My T-shirt and shorts were soaked. I started to 
shore, carrying the pole awkwardly in front of me. 

“I don’t need a towel,” I told Stanley. “It feels good. Very refreshing.” 

“You scared away all the fish, Jodie,” Mark complained. 

“No. You scared them away. They saw your face!” I replied. I knew I was 
acting like a baby now. But I didn’t care. I was cold and wet and angry. 

I stomped onto the shore, shaking water from my hair. 

“I think they’re biting better down here,” I heard Stanley call to Mark. I 
turned to see him disappear around a curve of the creek. 

Stepping carefully over the rocks, Mark followed after him. They were both 
hidden from view behind the thick trees. 



I squeezed my hair, trying to get the creek water out. Finally, I gave up and 
tossed my hair behind my shoulder. 

I was debating what to do next when I heard a crackling sound in the 
woods. 

A footstep? 

I turned and stared into the trees. I didn’t see anyone. 

A chipmunk scurried away over the blanket of dead, brown leaves. Had 
someone—or something —frightened the chipmunk? 

I listened hard. Another crackling footstep. Rustling sounds. 

“Who—who’s there?” I called. 

The low bushes rustled in reply. 

“Sticks—is that you? Sticks?” My voice trembled. 

No reply. 

It has to be Sticks, I told myself. This is Grandpa Kurt’s property. No one 
else would be back here. 

“Sticks—stop trying to scare me!” I shouted angrily. 

No reply. 

Another footstep. The crack of a twig. 

More rustling sounds. Closer now. 

“Sticks—I know it’s you!” I called uncertainly. “I’m really tired of your 
dumb tricks. Sticks?” 

My eyes stared straight ahead into the trees. 

I listened. Silence now. 

Heavy silence. 

And then I raised my hand to my mouth as I saw the dark figure poke out 
from the shade of two tall pines. 

“Sticks—?” 

I squinted into the deep blue shadows. 

I saw the bulging, dark coat. The faded burlap head. The dark fedora hat 
tilted over the black, painted eyes. 

I saw the straw poking out under the jacket. The straw sticking out from the 
long jacket sleeves. 

A scarecrow. 

A scarecrow that had followed us? Followed us to the creek? 

Squinting hard into the shadows, staring at its evil, frozen grin, I opened my 
mouth to scream—but no sound came out. 



9 


And then a hand grabbed my shoulder. 

“Ohh!” I let out a cry and spun around. 

Stanley stared at me with concern. He and Mark had come up behind me. 

“Jodie, what’s the matter?” Stanley asked. “Mark and I—we thought we 
heard you calling.” 

“What’s up?” Mark asked casually. The line on his fishing pole had become 
tangled, and he was working to untangle it. “Did you see a squirrel or 
something?” 

“No—I—I—” My heart was pounding so hard, I could barely speak. 

“Cool your jets, Jodie,” Mark said, imitating me. 

“I saw a scarecrow!” I finally managed to scream. 

Stanley’s mouth dropped open. 

Mark narrowed his eyes suspiciously at me. “A scarecrow? Here in the 
woods?” 

“It—it was walking,” I stammered. “I heard it. I heard it walking.” 

A choking sound escaped Stanley’s open mouth. 

Mark continued to stare at me, his features tight with fear. 

“It’s over there!” I cried. “Right there! Look!” 

I pointed. 

But it was gone. 



10 


Stanley stared hard at me, his big brown eyes filled with confusion. 

“I saw it,” I insisted. “Between those two trees.” I pointed again. 

“You did? A scarecrow? Really?” Stanley asked. I could see he was really 
starting to get scared. 

“Well... maybe it was just the shadows,” I said. I didn’t want to frighten 
Stanley. 

I shivered. “I’m soaked. I’ve got to get back in the sunlight,” I told them. 

“But did you see it?” Stanley asked, his big eyes locked on mine. “Did you 
see a scarecrow here, Jodie?” 

“I—I don’t think so, Stanley,” I replied, trying to calm him down. “I’m 
sorry.” 

“This is very bad,” he murmured, talking to himself. “This is very bad. I 
have to read the book. This is very bad.” Then, muttering to himself, he turned 
and ran. 

“Stanley—stop!” I called. “Stanley—come back! Don’t leave us down 
here!” 

But he was gone. Vanished into the woods. 

“I’m going after him,” I told Mark. “And then I’m going to tell Grandpa 
Kurt about this. Can you carry back the fishing poles by yourself?” 

“Do I have to?” Mark whined. My brother is so lazy! 

I told him he had to. Then I went running along the path through the woods 
toward the farmhouse. 

My heart pounded as I reached the cornfields. The dark-coated scarecrows 
appeared to stare at me. As my sneakers thudded on the narrow dirt path, I 
imagined the straw arms reaching for me, reaching to grab me and pull me into 
the corn. 

But the scarecrows kept their silent, still watch over the cornstalks. They 
didn’t move or twitch as I hurtled past. 

Up ahead I saw Stanley running to his little house. I cupped my hands over 
my mouth and called to him, but he disappeared inside. 

I decided to find Grandpa Kurt and tell him about the scarecrow I saw 
moving through the woods. 



The barn door was open, and I thought I saw someone moving around 
inside. “Grandpa Kurt?” I called breathlessly. “Are you in there?” 

My wet hair bounced on my shoulders as I ran into the barn. I stood in the 
rectangle of light that stretched from the doorway and stared into the darkness. 
“Grandpa Kurt?” I called, struggling to catch my breath. 

My eyes slowly adjusted to the dim light. I stepped deeper into the barn. 
“Grandpa Kurt? Are you here?” 

Hearing a soft scraping sound against the far wall, I made my way toward 
it. “Grandpa Kurt—can I talk to you? I really need to talk to you!” My voice 
sounded tiny and frightened in the big, dark barn. My sneakers scraped over the 
dry straw floor as I walked toward the back. 

I spun around as I heard a rumbling sound. 

The light grew dimmer. 

“Hey—” I shouted. Too late. 

The barn door was sliding shut. 

“Hey! Who’s there?” I cried out in stunned anger. “Hey—stop!” 

I slipped over the straw as I started to lurch toward the sliding door. I fell 
down hard, but quickly scrambled to my feet. 

I darted toward the door. But I wasn’t fast enough. 

As the heavy door rumbled shut, the rectangle of light grew narrower, 
narrower. 

The door slammed with a deafening bang. 

The darkness slid around me, circled me, covered me. 

“Hey—let me out!” I screamed. “Let me out of here!” 

My scream ended in a choked sob. My breath escaped in noisy gasps. 

I pounded on the wooden barn door with both fists. Then I frantically swept 
my hands over the door, searching blindly for a latch, for something to pull— 
some way to open the door. 

When I couldn’t find anything, I pounded on the door until my fists hurt. 

Then I stopped and took a step back. 

Calm down, Jodie, I told myself. Calm down. You’ll get out of the barn. 
You’ll find a way out. It’s not like you’re trapped in here forever. 

I tried to force away my panic. I held my breath, waiting for my heart to 
stop racing. Then I let my breath out slowly. Slooooowly. 

I was just starting to feel a little better when I heard the scraping sound. 

A dry scraping. The sound of a shoe crunching over straw. 



“Oh.” I let out a sharp cry, then raised both hands to my face and listened. 
Scrape. Scrape. Scrape. 

The sound of footsteps. Slow, steady footsteps, so light on the barn floor. 
Footsteps coming toward me in the darkness. 



11 


“Who—who’s there?” I choked out, my voice a hushed whisper. 

No reply. 

Scrape. Scrape. Scrape. 

The soft, scratchy footsteps came closer. 

“Who is it?” I cried shrilly. 

No reply. 

I stared into the darkness. I couldn’t see a thing. 

Scrape. Scrape. 

Whoever—or whatever—was moving steadily toward me. 

I took a step back. Then another. 

I tried to cry out, but my throat was choked with fear. 

I let out a terrified gasp as I backed into something. In my panic, it took me 
a few seconds to realize that it was only a wooden ladder. The ladder that led up 
to the hayloft. 

The footsteps crunched closer. Closer. 

“Please—” I uttered in a tiny, choked voice. “Please—don’t—” 

Closer. Closer. Scraping toward me through the heavy darkness. 

I gripped the sides of the ladder. “Please—leave me alone!” 

Before I realized what I was doing, I was pulling myself up the ladder. My 
arms trembled, and my legs felt as if they each weighed a thousand pounds. 

But I scrambled rung by rung toward the hayloft, away from the 
frightening, scraping footsteps down below. 

When I reached the top, I lay flat on the hayloft floor. I struggled to listen, 
to hear the footsteps over the loud pounding of my heart. 

Was I being followed? Was the thing chasing me up the ladder? 

I held my breath. I listened. 

Scrabbling sounds. Scraping footsteps. 

“Go away!” I screamed frantically. “Whoever you are—go away!” 

But the sounds continued, dry and scratchy. Like straw brushing against 
straw. 

Scrambling to my knees, I turned to the small, square hayloft window. 



Sunlight filtered in through the window. The light made the hay strewn over the 
floor gleam like slender strands of gold. 

My heart still pounding, I crawled to the window. 

Yes! The heavy rope was still tied to the side. The rope that Mark and I 
always used to swing down to the ground. 

I can get out of here! I told myself happily. 

I can grab the rope and swing out of the hayloft. I can escape! 

Eagerly, I grabbed the rope with both hands. 

Then I poked my head out the window and gazed down to the ground. 

And let out a scream of surprise and horror. 



12 


Gazing down, I saw a black hat. Beneath it, a black coat. 

A scarecrow. Perched outside the barn door. As if standing guard. 

It jerked its arms and legs at the sound of my scream. 

And as I stared in disbelief, it hurried around the side of the barn, hobbling 
on its straw legs, its arms flapping at its sides. 

I blinked several times. 

Was I seeing things? 

My hands were cold and wet. I gripped the rope more tightly. Taking a deep 
breath, I plunged out of the small square window. 

The heavy rope swung out over the front of the barn. 

Down, down. I hit the ground hard, landing on my feet. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the rope cut my hands. 

I let go and ran around to the side of the barn. 

I wanted to catch up to that scarecrow. I wanted to see if it really was a 
scarecrow, a scarecrow that could run. 

Ignoring my fear, I ran as fast as I could. 

No sign of him on this side of the barn. 

My chest began to ache. My temples throbbed. 

I turned the corner and headed around the back of the barn, searching for 
the fleeing scarecrow. 

And ran right into Sticks! 

“Hey—” We both shouted in surprise as we collided. 

I frantically untangled myself from him. Staring past him, I saw that the 
scarecrow had vanished. 

“What’s the hurry?” Sticks demanded. “You practically ran me over!” 

He was wearing faded denim jeans, slashed at both knees, and a faded 
purple muscle shirt that only showed off how skinny he was. His black hair was 
tied back in a short ponytail. 

“A—a scarecrow!” I stammered. 

And, then—that instant—I knew. 

In that instant, I solved the whole mystery of the scarecrows. 



13 


It hadn’t been a scarecrow. 

It was Sticks. 

In the woods down by the creek. And, now, outside the barn. 

Sticks. Playing another one of his mean tricks. 

And I was suddenly certain that Sticks had somehow made the scarecrows 
twitch and pull on their stakes last night. 

Sticks just loved fooling the “city kids”. Ever since Mark and I had been 
little, he’d played the scariest, meanest practical jokes on us. 

Sometimes Sticks could be a nice guy. But he had a real cruel streak. 

“I thought you were fishing,” he said casually. 

“Well, I’m not,” I snapped. “Sticks, why do you keep trying to scare us?” 

“Huh?” He pretended he didn’t know what I was talking about. 

“Sticks, give me a break,” I muttered. “I know you were the scarecrow just 
now. I’m not stupid!” 

“Scarecrow? What scarecrow?” he asked, giving me a wide-eyed, innocent 
expression. 

“You were dressed as a scarecrow,” I accused him. “Or else you carried one 
here, and pulled it on a string or something.” 

“You’re totally crazy,” Sticks replied angrily. “Have you been out in the sun 
too long or something?” 

“Sticks—give up,” I said. “Why are you doing this? Why do you keep 
trying to scare Mark and me? You scared your Dad, too.” 

“Jodie, you’re nuts!” he exclaimed. “I really don’t have time to be dressing 
up in costumes just to amuse you and your brother.” 

“Sticks—you’re not fooling me,” I insisted. “You—” 

I stopped short when I saw Sticks’ expression change. “Dad!” he cried, 
suddenly frightened. “Dad! You say he was scared?” 

I nodded. 

“I’ve got to find him!” Sticks exclaimed frantically, “He—he could do 
something terrible !” 

“Sticks, your joke has gone far enough!” I cried. “Just stop it!” 



But he was already running toward the front of the barn, calling for his 
father, his voice shrill and frantic. 

Sticks didn’t find his dad until dinnertime. That’s the next time I saw him, too— 
just before dinner. He was carrying his big superstition book, holding it tightly 
under his arm. 

“Jodie,” he whispered, motioning for me to come close. His face was red. 
His dark eyes revealed his excitement. 

“Hi, Stanley,” I whispered back uncertainly. 

“Don’t tell Grandpa Kurt about the scarecrow,” Stanley whispered. 

“Huh?” Stanley’s request caught me off guard. 

“Don’t tell your grandpa,” Stanley repeated. “It will only upset him. We 
don’t want to frighten him, do we?” 

“But, Stanley—” I started to protest. 

Stanley raised a finger to his lips. “Don’t tell, Jodie. Your grandpa doesn’t 
like to be upset. I’ll take care of the scarecrow. I have the book.” He tapped the 
big book with his finger. 

I started to tell Stanley that the scarecrow was only Sticks, playing a mean 
joke. But Grandma Miriam called us to the table before I could get the words 
out. 

Stanley carried his superstition book to the table. Every few bites, he would 
pick up the big, black book and read a few paragraphs. 

He moved his lips as he read. But I was sitting down at the other end of the 
table and couldn’t make out any of the words. 

Sticks kept his eyes down on his plate and hardly said a word. I think he 
was really embarrassed that his father was reading the superstition book at the 
dinner table. 

But Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam didn’t act the least bit surprised. 
They talked cheerfully to Mark and me and kept passing us more food—as if 
they didn’t even notice Stanley’s behavior. 

I really wanted to tell Grandpa Kurt about how Sticks was trying to scare 
Mark and me. But I decided to listen to Stanley and not upset my grandfather. 

Besides, I could deal with Sticks if I had to. He thought he was so tough. 
But I wasn’t the least bit afraid of him. 

Stanley was still reading, jabbering away as he read, as Grandma Miriam 
cleared the dinner dishes. Mark and I helped. Then we took our seats as 



Grandma Miriam carried a big cherry pie to the table. 

“Weird,” Mark whispered to me, staring at the pie. 

He was right. “Doesn’t Grandpa Kurt like apple pie?” I blurted out. 

Grandma Miriam gave me a tense smile. “Too early in the year for apples,” 
she murmured. 

“But isn’t Grandpa Kurt allergic to cherries?” Mark asked. 

Grandma Miriam started cutting the pie with a silver pie cutter. “Everyone 
loves cherry pie,” she replied, concentrating on her work. Then she raised her 
eyes to Stanley. “Isn’t that right, Stanley?” 

Stanley grinned over his book. “It’s my favorite,” he said. “Grandma 
Miriam always serves my favorite.” 

After dinner, Grandpa Kurt once again refused to tell Mark and me a scary story. 

We were sitting around the fireplace, staring at the crackling yellow flames. 
Even though it had been so hot, the air had grown cool this evening, cool enough 
to build a nice, toasty fire. 

Grandpa Kurt was in his rocking chair at the side of the hearth. The old 
wooden chair creaked as he rocked slowly back and forth. 

He had always loved to gaze at the fire and tell us one of his frightening 
stories. You could see the leaping flames reflected in his blue eyes. And his 
voice would go lower and lower as the story got scarier. 

But tonight he shrugged when I asked him for a story. He stared dully at the 
huge stuffed bear on its pedestal against the wall. Then he glanced across the 
room at Stanley. 

“Wish I knew some good stories,” Grandpa Kurt replied with a sigh. “But 
I’ve clean run out.” 

A short while later, Mark and I trudged upstairs to our bedrooms. “What is 
his problem?” Mark whispered as we climbed. 

I shook my head. “Beats me.” 

“He seems so... different,” Mark said. 

“Everyone here does,” I agreed. “Except for Sticks. He’s still trying to scare 
us city kids.” 

“Let’s just ignore him,” Mark suggested. “Let’s just pretend we don’t see 
him running around in his stupid scarecrow costume.” 

I agreed. Then I said good-night and headed into my room. 

Ignore the scarecrows, I thought as I arranged the blankets on the bed. 



Just ignore them. 

I’m not going to think about scarecrows again, I told myself. 

Sticks can go jump in the creek. 

Climbing into bed, I pulled the quilt up to my chin. I lay on my back, 
staring up at the cracks in the ceiling, trying to figure out what kind of picture 
they formed. There were three jagged cracks. I decided they looked like bolts of 
lightning. 

If I squinted, I could make them look like an old man with a beard. 

I yawned. I felt really sleepy, but I couldn’t get to sleep. 

It was only my second night here at the farm. It always takes me awhile to 
adjust to being in a new place and sleeping in a different bed. 

I closed my eyes. Through the open window, I could hear the soft mooing 
of cows from the barn. 

And I could hear the whisper of the wind as it brushed through the tall 
cornstalks. 

My nose was totally stuffed up. Bet I snore tonight, I thought. 

That is, if I ever get to sleep! 

I tried counting sheep. It didn’t seem to be working, so I tried counting 
cows. Big, bulky, bouncing, sloooooow-moooooving cows. 

I counted to a hundred twelve before I decided that wasn’t working, either. 

I turned onto my side. Then, after a few minutes, I tried my other side. 

I found myself thinking about my best friend, Shawna. I wondered if 
Shawna was having a good time at camp. 

I thought about some of my other friends. Most of them were just hanging 
around this summer, not doing much of anything. 

When I glanced at the clock, I was surprised to see it was nearly twelve. 
I’ve got to get to sleep, I told myself. I’ll be wrecked tomorrow if I don’t get 
some sleep. 

I settled onto my back, pulling the soft quilt up to my chin again. I closed 
my eyes and tried to picture nothing. Just empty, black space. Endless, empty 
space. 

The next thing I knew, I was hearing scratching sounds. 

I ignored them at first. I thought the curtains were flapping against the open 
window. 

Got to get to sleep, I urged myself. Got to get to sleep. 

The scratching grew louder. Closer. 



I heard a scraping sound. 

From outside the window? 

I opened my eyes. Shadows danced on the ceiling. I realized I was holding 
my breath. 

Listening hard. 

Another scrape. More scratching. Dry scratching. 

I heard a low groan. 

“Huh?” A startled gasp escaped my lips. 

I pulled myself up against the headboard. I tugged the quilt up to my chin, 
gripping it tightly with both hands. 

I heard more dry scraping. Like sandpaper, I thought. 

Suddenly the room grew darker. 

I saw something pull itself up to the window. A dark figure. Blocking the 
moonlight. 

“Who—who’s there?” I tried to call. But my voice came out a choked 
whisper. 

I could see a shadowy head, black against the purple sky. 

It rose up in the window. Dark shoulders. Followed by a darker chest. Black 
against black. 

A silent shadow, slipping into my room. 

“H-help! ” Another stammered whisper. 

My heart had stopped beating. I couldn’t breathe. Couldn’t breathe. 

It slid over the windowsill. Brushed away the curtains as it lowered itself 
into my room. 

Its feet scraped over the bare floorboards. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

It moved slowly, steadily toward my bed. 

I struggled to get up. 

Too late. 

My feet tangled in the quilt. 

I fell to the floor, landing hard on my elbows. 

I raised my eyes to see it move closer. 

I opened my mouth to scream as it emerged from the shadows. 

And then I recognized him. Recognized his face. 

“Grandpa Kurt!” I cried. “Grandpa Kurt—what are you doing here? Why 



did you climb in the window?” 

He didn’t reply. His cold blue eyes glared down at me. His whole face 
twisted into an ugly frown. 

And then he raised both arms above me. 

And I saw that he had no hands. 

Clumps of straw poked out from his jacket sleeves. 

Only straw. 

“Grandpa—no!!” I shrieked. 



14 


“Grandpa— please — no!” I shrieked as he lowered his straw arms toward me. 

He bared his teeth like an angry dog and let out a sharp, frightening growl. 
The straw hands reached down for me. 

Grandpa Kurt’s face was the same. The face I had always known. Except 
that his eyes were so cold, so cold and dead. 

The straw hands brushed over my face as I climbed to my feet. I took a step 
back, raising my hands like a shield. 

“Grandpa—what’s wrong? What’s happening?” I whispered. 

My temples were pounding. My entire body shook. 

His cold eyes narrowed in fury as he reached for me again. 

“Noooo!” I let out a long wail of terror. Then I turned and stumbled to the 

door. 

His feet scraped over the bare floor as he lurched toward me. Glancing 
down, I saw the straw poking out from the cuffs of his pants. 

His feet—they were straw, too. 

“Grandpa Kurt! Grandpa Kurt! What is happening ?” Was that really my 
voice, so shrill and frightened? 

He swung an arm. The straw scratched my back as it swept over me. 

I grabbed for the doorknob. Twisted it. Pulled open the door. 

And cried out again as I collided with Grandma Miriam. 

“Oh, help! Please help! Grandma Miriam—he’s chasing me!” I cried. 

Her expression didn’t change. She stared back at me. 

In the dim light of the hallway, her face came into focus. 

And I saw that her glasses were painted on. 

And her eyes. And mouth. And big round nose. 

Her entire face was painted on. 

“You’re not real!” I cried. 

And then darkness swept over me as Grandpa Kurt’s straw hands wrapped 
around my face. 



15 


I woke up coughing and choking. 

Surrounded by darkness. Heavy darkness. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that I’d been sleeping with the pillow 
over my face. 

Tossing it to the foot of the bed, I pulled myself up, breathing hard. My face 
was hot. My nightshirt stuck wetly to my back. 

I glanced at the window, suddenly afraid that I’d see a dark figure climbing 
in. 

The curtains fluttered gently. The early morning sky was still gray. I heard 
the shrill cry of a rooster. 

A dream. It had all been a frightening nightmare. 

Taking a deep breath and letting it out slowly, I lowered my feet to the floor. 

I stared at the gray morning light through the window. Just a dream, I 
assured myself. Calm down, Jodie. It was just a dream. 

I could hear someone moving around downstairs. Staggering over to the 
dresser, I pulled out some fresh clothes—a pair of faded denim cutoffs, a 
sleeveless blue T-shirt. 

My eyes were watery. Everything was a blur. My allergies were really bad 
this morning. 

Rubbing my eyes, I made my way to the window and peered out. A red ball 
of a sun was just peeking over the broad apple tree. A heavy morning dew made 
the grass of the back yard sparkle like emeralds. 

The sea of cornstalks rose darkly behind the grass. The scarecrows stood 
stiffly over them, arms outstretched as if welcoming the morning. 

The rooster crowed again. 

What a stupid nightmare, I thought. I shook myself as if trying to shake it 
from my memory. Then I ran a brush through my hair and hurried down to 
breakfast. 

Mark was just entering the kitchen as I came in. We found Grandma 
Miriam by herself at the table. A mug of tea steamed in front of her as she gazed 
out the window at the morning sunlight. 

She turned and smiled at us as we entered. “Good morning. Sleep well?” 



I was tempted to tell her about my scary nightmare. But, instead, I asked, 
“Where’s Grandpa Kurt?” I stared at his empty chair. The newspaper lay 
unopened on the table. 

“They all went off early,” Grandma Miriam replied. 

She stood up, walked to the cabinets, and brought a big box of cornflakes to 
the table. She motioned for us to take our places. “Pretty day,” she said 
cheerfully. 

“No pancakes?” Mark blurted out. 

Grandma Miriam stopped halfway across the room. “I’ve completely 
forgotten how to make them,” she said without turning around. 

She set two bowls down and made her way to the refrigerator to get the 
milk. “You kids want orange juice this morning? It’s fresh squeezed.” 

Grandma Miriam set the milk carton down beside my bowl. She smiled at 
me. Her eyes remained dull behind her square-rimmed glasses. “I hope you two 
are enjoying your visit,” she said quietly. 

“We would be if it weren’t for Sticks,” I blurted out. 

Her expression turned to surprise. “Sticks?” 

“He’s trying to scare us again,” I said. 

Grandma Miriam tsk-tsked. “You know Sticks,” she replied softly. 

She pushed at her red hair with both hands. “What are you two planning for 
today?” she asked brightly. “It’s a beautiful morning to go riding. Before they 
left this morning, Grandpa Kurt had Stanley saddle up Betsy and Maggie, in case 
you wanted to ride.” 

“Sounds like fun,” I told her. “What do you say, Mark? Before it gets really 
hot out?” 

“I guess,” Mark replied. 

“You two always enjoyed riding along the creek,” Grandma Miriam said, 
putting the cornflakes box away. 

I stared across the room at her, stared at her red, curly hair, her pudgy arms, 
her flowered housedress. 

“Are you okay, Grandma Miriam?” I asked. The words just tumbled out of 
my mouth. “Is everything okay here?” 

She didn’t reply. Instead, she lowered her eyes, avoiding my gaze. “Go 
have your ride,” she said quietly. “Don’t worry about me.” 


Grandpa Kurt always called Betsy and Maggie the “old gray mares”. I guess 



because they were both old and they were both gray. And they were as grumpy 
as can be when Mark and I climbed onto their saddles and started to urge them 
from the barn. 

They were the perfect horses for us “city kids”. The only time we ever got 
to ride horses was during our summers at the farm. So we were not exactly the 
most skillful riders in the world. 

Bumping along on these two old nags was just our speed. And even as slow 
as we were moving, I dug my knees into Betsy’s sides and held onto the saddle 
horn for dear life. 

We followed the dirt path past the cornfields toward the woods. The sun 
was still climbing a hazy, yellow sky. But the air was already hot and sticky. 

Flies buzzed around me as I bounced on top of Betsy. I removed one hand 
from the saddle horn to brush a big one off Betsy’s back. 

Several scarecrows stared back at us as Mark and I rode past. Their black 
eyes glared at us from under their floppy hats. 

Mark and I didn’t say a word. We were keeping to our promise of not 
talking about scarecrows. 

I turned my eyes to the woods and tossed the reins, urging Betsy to move a 
little faster. She ignored me, of course, and kept clopping along over the path at 
her slow, steady pace. 

“I wonder if these horses can still get up to a trot,” Mark called. He was a 
few paces behind me on the narrow dirt path. 

“Let’s give it a try!” I called back, grabbing the reins tighter. 

I dug my sneaker heels into Betsy’s side. “Go, girl—go!” I cried, slapping 
her gently with the reins. 

“Whoooa!” I let out a startled cry as the old horse obediently began to trot. I 
really didn’t think she would cooperate! 

“All right! Cool!” I heard Mark shout behind me. 

Their hooves clopped loudly on the path as the two horses began to pick up 
speed. I was bouncing hard over the saddle, holding on tightly, off-balance, 
beginning to wonder if this was such a hot idea. 

I didn’t have a chance to cry out when the dark figure hurtled across the 

path. 

It all happened so fast. 

Betsy was trotting rapidly. I was bouncing on the saddle, bouncing so hard, 
my feet slipped out of the stirrups. 



The dark figure leaped out right in front of us. 

Betsy let out a shrill, startled whinny—and reared back. 

As I started to fall, I saw immediately what had jumped onto the path. 
It was a grinning scarecrow. 



16 


Betsy rose up with a high whinny. 

My hand grabbed for the reins, but they slipped from my grasp. 

The sky appeared to roll over me, then tilt away. 

I slid backwards, out of the saddle, off the horse, my feet thrashing wildly 
for the flapping stirrups. 

The sky tilted even more. 

I hit the ground hard on my back. 

I remember only the shock of stopping so abruptly, the surprise at how hard 
the ground felt, how so much pain shot through my body so quickly. 

The sky turned bright red. A glowing scarlet. Like an explosion. 

And then the scarlet faded to deep, deep, endlessly deep black. 


* * * 


I heard low moans before I opened my eyes. 

I recognized the voice. Mark’s voice. 

My eyes still shut, I opened my mouth to call to him. My lips moved, but 
no sound came out. 

“Ohhhh.” Another low groan from him, not far from me. 

“Mark—?” I managed to choke out. My back ached. My shoulders hurt. My 
head throbbed. 

Everything hurt. 

“My wrist—I think I broke it,” Mark said, his voice shrill and frightened. 
“You fell, too?” I asked. 

“Yeah. I fell, too,” he groaned. 

I opened my eyes. Finally. I opened my eyes. 

And saw the hazy sky. 

All a blur. Everything was a watery blur. 

I stared at the sky, trying to get it in focus. 

And then saw a hand in front of the sky. A hand lowering itself toward me. 
A bony hand stretching out from a heavy black coat. 



The hand of the scarecrow, I realized, staring up helplessly at it. 
The hand of the scarecrow, coming down to grab me. 



17 


The hand grabbed my shoulder. 

Too terrified to cry out, too dazed to think clearly, my eyes followed the 
dark coat sleeve—up to the shoulder—up to the face. 

A blur. All a frightening blur. 

And then the face became clear. 

“Stanley!” I cried. 

He leaned over me, his red ears glowing, his face tight with worry. He 
gently grabbed my shoulder. “Jodie—are you all right?” 

“Stanley—it’s you!” I exclaimed happily. I sat up. “I think I’m okay. I don’t 
know. Everything hurts.” 

“What a bad fall,” Stanley said softly. “I was in the field. And I saw it. I 
saw the scarecrow....” 

His voice trailed off. I followed his frightened gaze up ahead of me on the 
dirt path. 

The scarecrow lay facedown across the path. 

“I saw it jump out,” Stanley uttered with a shudder that shook his whole 
body. 

“My wrist...” Mark moaned from nearby. 

I turned as Stanley hurried over to him. Mark was sitting up in the grass at 
the side of the path, holding his wrist. “Look—it’s starting to swell up,” he 
groaned. 

“Oooh, that’s bad. That’s bad,” Stanley said, shaking his head. 

“Maybe it’s just a sprain,” I suggested. 

“Yeah,” Stanley quickly agreed. “We’d better get you to the house and put 
ice on it. Can you get back up on Maggie? I’ll ride behind you.” 

“Where’s my horse?” I asked, searching both ways along the path. I climbed 
unsteadily to my feet. 

“She galloped back to the barn,” Stanley replied, pointing. “Fastest I’ve 
seen her go in years!” 

He glanced down at the scarecrow and shuddered again. 

I took a few steps, stretching my arms and my back. “I’m okay,” I told him. 
“Take Mark on the horse. I’ll walk back.” 



Stanley eagerly started to help Mark to his feet. I could see that Stanley 
wanted to get away from here—away from the scarecrow—as fast as possible. 

I watched as they rode off down the path toward the house. Stanley sat 
behind Mark in the saddle, holding the reins, keeping Maggie at a slow, gentle 
pace. Mark held his wrist against his chest and leaned back against Stanley. 

I stretched my arms over my head again, trying to stretch the soreness from 
my back. My head ached. But other than that, I didn’t feel bad. 

“Guess I’m lucky,” I murmured out loud. 

I took a long glance at the scarecrow, sprawled facedown across the path. 
Cautiously, I walked over to it. 

I poked its side with the toe of my sneaker. 

The straw beneath the coat crinkled. 

I poked it harder, pushing my sneaker hard into the scarecrow’s middle. 

I don’t know what I expected to happen. Did I think the scarecrow would 
cry out? Try to squirm away? 

With an angry cry, I kicked the scarecrow. Hard. 

I kicked it again. 

The burlap bag head bounced on the path. The scarecrow’s ghastly painted 
grin didn’t move. 

It’s just a scarecrow, I told myself, giving it one last kick that sent straw 
falling out from the jacket front. 

Just a scarecrow that Sticks tossed onto the path. 

Mark and I could have been killed, I told myself. 

We’re lucky we weren’t. 

Sticks. It had to be Sticks. 

But why? 

This wasn’t a joke. 

Why was Sticks trying to hurt us? 



18 


Stanley and Sticks weren’t at lunch. Grandpa Kurt said they had to go into town 
for supplies. 

Mark’s wrist was only sprained. Grandma Miriam put an ice bag on it, and 
the swelling went right down. But Mark was groaning and complaining. He was 
really making the most of it. 

“Guess I’ll have to lie on the couch and watch TV for a week or so,” he 
moaned. 

Grandma Miriam served ham sandwiches and homemade coleslaw. Mark 
and I gobbled down our lunches. All that excitement had made us really hungry. 

As we ate, I decided to tell Grandpa Kurt everything that had been 
happening. I couldn’t hold it in any longer. 

I told him about how Sticks was making the scarecrows move at night. And 
how he was trying to frighten us, trying to make us think the scarecrows were 
alive. 

I caught a glimpse of fear in Grandpa Kurt’s blue eyes. But then he rubbed 
his white-stubbled cheeks, and he got a faraway look on his face. 

“Sticks and his little jokes,” he said finally, a smile spreading across his 
face. “That boy sure likes his jokes.” 

“He’s not joking,” I insisted. “He’s really trying to frighten us, Grandpa.” 

“We could have been killed this morning!” Mark joined in. He had 
mayonnaise smeared on his cheek. 

“Sticks is a good boy,” Grandma Miriam murmured. She was smiling, too. 
She and Grandpa Kurt exchanged glances. 

“Sticks wouldn’t really hurt you,” Grandpa Kurt said softly. “He just likes 
to have his fun.” 

“Great fun!” I muttered sarcastically, rolling my eyes. 

“Yeah. Great fun,” Mark groaned. “I almost broke my wrist!” 

Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam just smiled back at us, their faces 
frozen like the painted scarecrow faces. 

After lunch, Mark slumped to the couch, where he planned to spend the rest of 
the afternoon staring at the TV. He loved having an excuse not to go outdoors. 



I heard Stanley’s truck pull up the drive. I decided to go find Sticks and tell 
him how fed up we were with his stupid scarecrow tricks. 

I didn’t think his jokes were all in fun. I really believed he was trying to 
frighten us or hurt us—and I wanted to find out why. 

I didn’t see Sticks or Stanley out in the yard. So I made my way across the 
grass to the guest house where they lived. 

It was a warm, beautiful day. The sky was clear and bright. The air smelled 
fresh and sweet. 

But I couldn’t enjoy the sunshine. All I could think about was letting Sticks 
know how angry I was. 

I knocked on the guest house door. I took a deep breath and tossed my hair 
behind my shoulders, listening for signs of life inside. 

I tried to think of what I was going to say to Sticks. But I was too angry to 
plan it. My heart started to pound. I realized I was breathing hard. 

I knocked on the door again, harder this time. 

There was no one inside. 

I turned my gaze to the cornfields. The stalks stood stiffly, watched over by 
the motionless scarecrows. No sign of Sticks. 

I turned to the barn, across the wide grass from the guest house. Maybe 
Sticks is in there, I thought. 

I jogged to the barn. Two enormous crows hopped along the ground in front 
of the open barn doors. They flapped their wings hard and scrambled out of my 
way. 

“Hey—Sticks?” I shouted breathlessly as I stepped inside. 

No reply. 

The barn was dark. I waited for my eyes to adjust. 

Remembering my last creepy visit to the barn, I stepped reluctantly, my 
sneakers scraping over the straw on the floor. “Sticks? Are you in here?” I 
called, staring hard into the deep shadows. 

A rusted baling machine stood to one side of the straw bales. A 
wheelbarrow tilted against the wall. I hadn’t noticed them before. 

“Guess he isn’t here,” I said to myself out loud. 

I walked past the wheelbarrow. I saw something else I hadn’t noticed before 
—a pile of old coats on the barn floor. Empty burlap bags were stacked beside 
them. 

I picked one up. It had a frowning face painted on it in black paint. I 



dropped the bag back onto the pile. 

These must be Stanley’s scarecrow supplies, I realized. 

How many more scarecrows did he plan to build? 

Then something in the corner caught my eye. I walked quickly over the 
straw. Then I bent down to examine what I saw. 

Torches. At least a dozen torches, stacked in the corner, hidden by the 
darkness. Next to them I spotted a large bottle of kerosene. 

What on earth are these doing here? I asked myself. 

Suddenly, I heard a scraping sound. I saw shadows slide against shadows. 
And I realized that once again I was no longer alone. 

I jumped to my feet. “Sticks!” I cried. “You scared me.” 

His face was half hidden in darkness. His black hair fell over his forehead. 
He didn’t smile. “I warned you,” he said menacingly. 



19 


Feeling the fear rise to my throat, I stepped out of the corner and moved past 
him, into the light from the doorway. “I—I was looking for you,” I stammered. 
“Sticks, why are you trying to scare Mark and me?” 

“I warned you,” he said, lowering his voice to a whisper. “I warned you to 
get away from here, to go back home.” 

“But why?” I demanded. “What’s your problem, Sticks? What did we do to 
you? Why are you trying to scare us?” 

“I’m not,” Sticks replied. He glanced back nervously to the barn doors. 

“Huh?” I gaped at him. 

“I’m not trying to scare you. Really,” he insisted. 

“Liar,” I muttered angrily. “You must really think I’m a moron. I know you 
threw that scarecrow onto our path this morning. It had to be you, Sticks.” 

“I really don’t know what you’re talking about,” he insisted coldly. “But 
I’m warning you—” 

A sound at the doorway made him stop. 

We both saw Stanley step into the barn. He shielded his eyes with one hand 
as his eyes adjusted to the darkness. “Sticks—are you in here?” he called. 

Sticks’ features tightened in sudden fear. He let out a low gasp. 

“I—I’ve got to go,” Sticks whispered tensely to me. He turned and started 
jogging toward Stanley. “Here I am, Dad,” he called. “Is the tractor ready?” 

I watched the two of them hurry from the barn. Sticks didn’t look back. 

I stood in the darkness, my eyes on the empty doorway, thinking hard. 

I know Sticks was lying to me, I thought. 

I know he made the scarecrows move at night. I know he dressed as a 
scarecrow to scare me in the woods and at the barn. And I know he tossed that 
scarecrow in front of the horses this morning. 

I know he’s trying to frighten Mark and me. 

But enough is enough, I decided. 

Now it’s payback time. 

Now it’s time for Sticks to be frightened. Really frightened. 



20 


“I can’t do this!” Mark protested. 

“Of course you can,” I assured him. “This is going to be really cool.” 

“But my wrist hurts again,” my brother whined. “It just started hurting. I 
can’t use it.” 

“No problem,” I told him. “You won’t have to use it.” 

He started to protest some more. But then a smile spread across his face, 
and his eyes lit up gleefully. “It’s kind of a cool idea,” he said, laughing. 

“Of course it’s an awesome idea,” I agreed. “I thought of it!” 

We were standing in the doorway to the barn. The white light from a full 
moon shone down on us. Owls hooted somewhere nearby. 

It was a cool, clear night. The grass shimmered from a heavy dew. A soft 
wind made the trees whisper. The moonlight was so bright, I could see every 
blade of grass. 

After Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam had gone to bed, I dragged Mark 
from the house. I pulled him across the yard to the barn. 

“Wait right here,” I said. Then I hurried into the barn to get what we 
needed. 

It was a little creepy in the dark barn at night. I heard a soft fluttering sound 
high in the rafters. 

Probably a bat. 

My sneakers were wet from the grass. I slid over the straw on the barn 
floor. 

The bat swooped low over my head. I heard a high-pitched chittering up in 
the rafters. More bats. 

I grabbed one of the big, old coats from the pile. Then I pulled up one of the 
burlap bag faces and slung it on top of the coat. 

Ignoring the fluttering wings swooping back and forth, back and forth, 
across the barn, I hurried outside to Mark. 

And explained my plan, my plan to get our revenge on Sticks. 

It was actually a very simple plan. We’d dress Mark up as a scarecrow. 
He’d stand with the other scarecrows in the cornfield. 

I’d go to the guest house and get Sticks. I’d tell Sticks I saw something 



weird in the field. I’d pull Sticks out to the field. Mark would start to stagger 
toward him—and Sticks would be so freaked, he’d have a cow! 

A simple plan. And a good one. 

Sticks deserved it, too. 

I pulled the burlap bag over Mark’s head. The black, painted eyes stared 
back at me. I reached down, picked up a handful of straw, and began stuffing it 
under the bag. 

“Stop squirming!” I told Mark. 

“But the straw itches!” he cried. 

“You’ll get used to it,” I told him. I grabbed his shoulders. “Stand still. 
Don’t move.” 

“Why do I need straw?” he whined. 

“Mark, you have to look like all the other scarecrows,” I told him. 
“Otherwise, Sticks won’t be fooled.” 

I stuffed the burlap face with straw. Then I held up the old overcoat for 
Mark to put on. 

“I can’t do this!” he wailed. “I’m going to itch to death! I can’t breathe!” 

“You can breathe perfectly fine,” I told him. I stuffed straw into the sleeves. 
I was careful to let clumps of straw hang from the cuffs, covering Mark’s hands. 
Then I stuffed more straw into the jacket. 

“Will you stand still?” I whispered angrily. “This is a lot of hard work—you 
know?” 

He grumbled in a low voice to himself as I continued to work. 

“Just keep thinking how great it’ll be when Sticks sees you and thinks 
you’re a scarecrow that’s really coming to life,” I said. 

I had straw stuck to my hands, straw all down the front of my sweatshirt 
and jeans. I sneezed. Once. Twice. I’m definitely allergic to the stuff. 

But I didn’t care. I was so excited. I couldn’t wait to see Sticks’ terrified 
face. I couldn’t wait to pay him back for trying to frighten us all week. 

“I need a hat,” Mark said. He was standing stiffly, afraid to move under all 
the straw. 

“Hmmmm.” I thought hard. There weren’t any hats in the barn with the 
other scarecrow supplies. “We’ll just take one off a real scarecrow,” I told Mark. 

I stepped back to see my handiwork. Mark looked pretty good. But he still 
needed more straw. I set to work, stuffing him, making the old coat bulge. 

“Now don’t forget to stand straight and stiff, with your arms straight out,” I 



instructed. 

“Do I have a choice?” Mark complained. “I—I can’t move at all!” 

“Good,” I said. I arranged the straw that stuck out of his sleeves, then 
stepped back. “Okay. You’re ready,” I told him. 

“How do I look?” he asked. 

“Like a short scarecrow,” I told him. 

“I’m too short?” he replied. 

“Don’t worry, Mark,” I said, grabbing his arm. “I’m going to stick you up 
on a pole!” 

“Huh?” 

I laughed. “Gotcha,” I muttered. “I’m kidding.” I started to lead him to the 
cornfields. 

“Think this is going to work?” Mark asked, walking stiffly. “Think we’re 
really going to scare Sticks?” 

I nodded. An evil grin spread over my face. “I think so,” I told my brother. 
“I think Sticks is in for a terrifying surprise.” 

Little did I know that we all were! 



21 


I gripped Mark’s arm with both hands and led him to the cornfields. The bright 
moon bathed us in white light. The tall cornstalks shivered in a light breeze. 

Mark looked so much like a scarecrow, it was scary. Tufts of straw stuck 
out at his neck and the cuffs of his coat. The enormous old coat hung loosely 
over his shoulders and came down nearly to his knees. 

We stepped into the field. Our sneakers crunched over the dry ground as we 
edged through a narrow row. 

The cornstalks rose above our heads. The breeze made them lean over us, 
as if trying to close us in. 

I let out a gasp as I heard a rustling sound along the ground. 

Footsteps? 

Mark and I both froze. And listened. 

The tall stalks bent low as the wind picked up. They made an eerie creaking 
sound as they moved. The ripe corn sheaths bobbed heavily. 

Creeeeak. Creeeeak. 

The stalks shifted back and forth. 

Then we heard the rustling again. A soft brushing sound. 

Very nearby. 

“Ow. Let go!” Mark whispered. 

I suddenly realized I was still gripping his arm, squeezing it tightly. 

I let go. And listened. “Do you hear it?” I whispered to Mark. “That 
brushing sound?” 

Creeeeak. Creeeeak. 

The cornstalks leaned over us, shifting in the wind. 

A twig cracked. So nearby, I nearly jumped out of my skin. 

I held my breath. My heart was racing. 

Another soft rustling sound. I stared down at the ground, trying to follow 
the sound. 

“Oh.” 

A large gray squirrel scampered across the row and disappeared between 
the stalks. 



I burst out laughing, mostly from relief. “Just a squirrel,” I said. “Do you 
believe it? Just a squirrel!” 

Mark let out a long, relieved sigh from under the burlap bag. “Jodie, can we 
get going?” he demanded impatiently. “This thing itches like crazy!” 

He raised both hands and tried to scratch his face through the bag. But I 
quickly tugged his arms down. “Mark—stop. You’ll mess up the straw!” 

“But my face feels like a hundred bugs are crawling all over it!” he wailed. 
“And I can’t see. You didn’t cut the eyeholes big enough.” 

“Just follow me,” I muttered. “And stop complaining. You want to scare 
Sticks, don’t you?” 

Mark didn’t reply. But he let me lead him deeper into the cornfield. 

Suddenly, a black shadow fell over our path. 

I let out a sharp gasp before I realized it was the long shadow of a 
scarecrow. 

“How do you do,” I said, reaching out and shaking its straw hand. “May I 
borrow your hat?” 

I reached up and pulled the brown, floppy hat off the burlap head. Then I 
lowered it over Mark’s burlap head and pulled it down tight. 

“Hey—!” Mark protested. 

“I don’t want it to fall off,” I told him. 

“I’m never going to stop itching!” Mark whined. “Can you scratch my 
back? Please? My whole back is itching!” 

I gave the back of the old coat a few hard mbs. “Turn around,” I instructed 
him. I gave him a final inspection. 

Excellent. He looked more like a scarecrow than the scarecrows did. 

“Stand right here,” I told him, moving him into a small clearing between 
two rows of cornstalks. “Good. Now when you hear me bringing Sticks over, put 
your arms straight out. And don’t move a muscle.” 

“I know, I know,” Mark grumbled. “Think I don’t know how to be a 
scarecrow? Just hurry—okay?” 

“Okay,” I told him. I turned and made my way quickly along the shifting 
rows of cornstalks. Dry straw and leaves crackled beneath my sneakers. 

I was breathing hard by the time I reached the guest house. The doorway 
was dark. But an orange light glowed dimly behind the pulled shade in the 
window. 

I hesitated at the doorway and listened. Silence inside. 



How was I going to get Sticks to come out alone—without his father? 

I didn’t want to frighten Stanley. He was a really nice man, who would 
never think of playing mean jokes on Mark and me. And I knew how scared and 
upset he could get. 

I only wanted to frighten Sticks. To teach him a lesson. To teach him he had 
no business getting on our case just because Mark and I are “city kids”. 

The wind fluttered through my hair. I could hear the cornstalks creaking 
behind me in the fields. 

I shivered. 

Taking a deep breath, I raised my fist to knock on the door. 

But a sound behind me made me spin around. 

“Hey—!” I choked out. 

Someone was moving across the grass, half running, half stumbling. My 
eyes were all watery. It was hard to see. 

Was it Mark? 

Yes. I recognized the floppy hat, the bulky, dark overcoat falling down past 
his knees. 

What is he doing? I asked myself, watching him approach. 

Why is he following me? 

He’s going to ruin the whole joke! 

As he came closer, he raised a straw hand as if pointing at me. 

“Mark—what’s wrong?” I called in a loud whisper. 

He continued to gesture with his straw hand as he ran. 

“Mark—get back in the field!” I whispered. “You’re not supposed to follow 
me. You’re going to ruin everything! Mark—what are you doing here?” 

I motioned with both hands for him to go back to the cornfield. 

But he ignored me and kept coming, trailing straw as he ran. 

“Mark, please—go back! Go back!” I pleaded. 

But he stepped up in front of me and grabbed my shoulders. 

And as I stared into the cold, painted black eyes—I realized to my horror 
that it xvasn’t Mark! 



22 


I cried out and tried to pull away. 

But the scarecrow held on to me tightly. 

“Sticks—is that you?” I cried in a trembling voice. 

No reply. 

I stared into the blank, painted eyes. 

And realized there were no human eyes behind them. 

The straw hands scratched against my throat. 

I opened my mouth to scream. 

And the door to the guest house swung open. “Sticks—” I managed to 
choke out. 

Sticks stepped out onto the small stoop. “What on earth—!” he cried. 

He leaped off the stoop, grabbed the scarecrow by the coat shoulders—and 
heaved it to the ground. 

The scarecrow hit the ground without making a sound. It lay sprawled on its 
back, staring up at us blankly. 

“Who—who is it?” I cried, rubbing my neck where the straw hands had 
scratched it. 

Sticks bent down and jerked away the burlap scarecrow head. 

Nothing underneath. Nothing but straw. 

“It—it really is a scarecrow!” I cried in horror. “But it— walked !” 

“I warned you,” Sticks said solemnly, staring down at the headless dark 
figure. “I warned you, Jodie.” 

“You mean it wasn’t you?” I demanded. “It wasn’t you trying to scare Mark 
and me?” 

Sticks shook his head. He raised his dark eyes to mine. “Dad brought the 
scarecrows to life,” he said softly. “Last week. Before you came. He used his 
book. He chanted some words—and they all came to life.” 

“Oh, no,” I murmured, raising my hands to my face. 

“We were all so frightened,” Sticks continued. “Especially your 
grandparents. They begged Dad to recite the words and put the scarecrows back 
to sleep.” 



“Did he?” I asked. 

“Yes,” Sticks replied. “He put them back to sleep. But first he insisted your 
grandparents make some promises. They had to promise not to laugh at him 
anymore. And they had to promise to do everything he wanted from now on.” 

Sticks took a deep breath. He stared toward the guest house window. 
“Haven’t you noticed how different things are at the farm? Haven’t you noticed 
how frightened your grandparents are?” 

I nodded solemnly. “Of course I have.” 

“They’ve been trying to keep Dad happy,” Sticks continued. “They’ve been 
doing everything they can to keep him from getting upset or angry. Your 
grandmother fixes only his favorite food. Your grandfather stopped telling scary 
stories because Dad doesn’t like them.” 

I shook my head. “They’re that afraid of Stanley?” 

“They’re afraid he’ll read the chant in the book again and bring the 
scarecrows back to life,” Sticks said. He swallowed hard. “There’s only one 
problem,” he murmured. 

“What’s that?” I asked. 

“Well, I haven’t told Dad yet. But...” His voice trailed off. 

“But what?” I demanded eagerly. 

“Some of the scarecrows are still alive,” Sticks replied. “Some of them 
never went back to sleep.” 



23 


We both let out short cries as the front door to the house swung open. 

Startled, I leaped away from the doorway. 

As the door pulled open, it revealed a rectangle of orange light. Stanley 
stepped into the light. 

He held on to the door and peered out. His eyes showed surprise as they 
landed on Sticks and me. But then he goggled and uttered a choking sound as he 
spotted the headless scarecrow on the ground. 

“N-no!” Stanley sputtered. He pointed a trembling finger at the scarecrow. 
“It—it walks! The scarecrow walks!” 

“No, Dad—!” Sticks cried. 

But Stanley didn’t hear him. Stanley had already dived back into the house. 

Sticks started after him. But Stanley reappeared in the doorway. As he 
stepped outside, I saw that he was carrying the big superstition book. 

“The scarecrows walk!” Stanley screamed. “I must take charge! I must take 
charge of them all now!” 

His eyes were wild. His entire skinny body was trembling. He started 
toward the cornfields, totally crazy. Sticks tried to calm him down. 

“No, Dad!” Sticks cried desperately, hurrying after him. “The scarecrow 
was dropped here! I dropped it here, Dad! It didn’t walk! It didn’t walk!” 

Stanley kept walking, taking long, rapid strides. He didn’t seem to hear 
Sticks. “I must take charge now!” Stanley declared. “I must be the leader. I will 
bring the others back to life and take control.” 

He turned and glanced at Sticks, who was hurrying to catch up to him. 
“Stay back!” Stanley shouted. “Stay back—until I read the chant! Then you can 
follow!” 

“Dad—please listen to me!” Sticks cried. “The scarecrows are ah asleep! 
Don’t wake them!” 

Stanley finally stopped a few yards from the edge of the cornfields. He 
turned to Sticks and studied his face. “You’re sure? You’re sure they’re not out 
of my control? You’re sure they’re not walking?” 

Sticks nodded. “Yes. I’m sure, Dad. I’m really sure.” 

Stanley’s face filled with confusion. He kept staring hard at Sticks, as if not 



believing him. “I don’t have to read the chant?” Stanley asked, confused, his 
eyes on the swaying cornstalks. “I don’t have to take charge?” 

“No, Dad,” Sticks replied softly. “The scarecrows are all still. You can put 
the book away. The scarecrows are not moving.” 

Stanley sighed with relief. He lowered the book to his side. “None of 
them?” he asked warily. 

“None of them,” Sticks replied soothingly. 

And that’s when Mark—in full scarecrow costume—decided to come 
staggering out of the cornfield. 



24 


“Where’ve you been?” Mark called. 

Stanley’s eyes went wide, and he opened his mouth in a high shriek of 
terror. 

“Dad, please—!” Sticks pleaded. 

Too late. 

Stanley took off, heading into the cornfields, the big book raised high in 
front of him. “The scarecrows walk! They walk!” he cried. 

Mark tucked at the burlap bag face. “Did we blow it?” he called. “Is the 
joke over? What’s happening?” 

There was no time to answer him. 

Sticks turned to me, his features tight with fear. “We’ve got to stop Dad!” 
he cried. He started running to the swaying cornstalks. 

Stanley had already disappeared between the tall rows of corn. 

My allergies were really bad. I kept rubbing my eyes, trying to clear them. 
But as I followed Sticks, everything was a shimmering blur of grays and blacks. 

“Ow!” I cried out as I stumbled in a soft hole and fell. 

Mark, right behind me, nearly toppled over me. 

He reached down and helped pull me up. I had landed hard on both knees, 
and they were throbbing with pain. 

“Which way did they go?” I asked breathlessly, searching the dark, swaying 
rows of creaking cornstalks. 

“I—I’m not sure!” Mark stammered. “What’s going on, Jodie? Tell me!” 

“Not now!” I told him. “We have to stop Stanley. We have to—” 

Stanley’s voice, high and excited, rose up from somewhere nearby. Mark 
and I both froze as we listened to the strange words he was chanting. 

“Is he reading something from that weird book?” Mark demanded. 

Without answering, I headed in the direction of Stanley’s voice. It was easy 
to follow him. He was chanting the strange words at the top of his lungs. 

Where was Sticks? I wondered. 

Why hadn’t Sticks been able to stop his father? 

I pushed frantically through the tall stalks. I was moving blindly, my eyes 



watered over, brushing the stalks out of the way with both hands. 

In a small clearing, I found Stanley and Sticks. They were standing in front 
of two scarecrows on poles. 

Stanley held the book up close to his face as he chanted, moving his finger 
over the words. 

Sticks stood frozen, a blank expression on his face, a face of cold terror. 

Had the words of the chant somehow frozen him there like that? 

The scarecrows stood stiffly on their poles, their painted eyes staring 
lifelessly out from under their floppy black hats. 

Mark and I stepped into the clearing just as Stanley finished his chant. He 
slammed the big book shut and tucked it under one arm. 

“They’re going to walk now!” Stanley cried excitedly. “They’re going to 
come alive again!” 

Sticks suddenly seemed to come back to life. He blinked several times and 
shook his head hard, as if trying to clear it. 

We all stared at the two scarecrows. 

They stared back at us, lifeless, unmoving. 

The clouds floated away from the moon. The shadow over the cornfields 
rolled away. 

I stared into the eerie, pale light. 

A heavy silence descended over us. The only sounds I could hear were 
Stanley’s shallow breathing, tense gasps as he waited for his chant to work, for 
his scarecrows to come to life. 

I don’t know how long we stood there, none of us moving a muscle, 
watching the scarecrows. Watching. Watching. 

“It didn’t work,” Stanley moaned finally. His voice came out sad and low. 
“I did something wrong. The chant—it didn’t work.” 

A smile grew on Sticks’ face. He gazed at me. “It didn’t work!” Sticks 
exclaimed happily. 

And then I heard the scratch scratch scratch of dry straw. 

I saw the scarecrows’ shoulders start to twitch. I saw their eyes light up and 
their heads lean forward. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

The dry straw crinkled loudly as they both squirmed off their poles and 
lowered themselves silently to the ground. 



25 


“Go warn your grandparents!” Sticks cried. “Hurry! Go tell them what my dad 
has done! ” 

Mark and I hesitated. We stared at the scarecrows as they stretched their 
arms and rolled their burlap bag heads, as if waking up after a long sleep. 

“Jodie—look!” Mark choked out in a hushed whisper. He pointed out to the 
fields. 

I gasped in horror as I saw what Mark was staring at. 

All over the field, dark-coated scarecrows were stretching, squirming, 
lowering themselves from their poles. 

More than a dozen of them, silently coming to life. 

“Run!” Sticks was screaming. “Go! Tell your grandparents!” 

Stanley stood frozen in place, gripping the book in both hands. He stared in 
amazement, shaking his head, enjoying his triumph. 

Sticks’ face was knotted with fear. He gave my shoulders a hard shove. 
“Run!” 

The scarecrows were rolling their heads back and forth, stretching out their 
straw arms. The dry scratch of straw filled the night air. 

I forced myself to take my eyes off them. Mark and I turned and started 
mnning through the cornfield. We pushed the tall stalks away with both hands as 
we ran. We ducked our heads low, running in terrified silence. 

We ran across the grass, past the guest house. Past the dark, silent barn. 

The farmhouse loomed darkly ahead of us. The windows were dark. A dim 
porch light sent a circle of yellow light over the back porch. 

“Hey—!” Mark shouted, pointing. 

Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam must have heard our shouts back in the 
cornfields. They were waiting for us in the back yard. 

They looked frail and frightened. Grandma Miriam had pulled a flannel 
bathrobe over her nightdress. She had a scarf tied over her short red hair. 

Grandpa Kurt had pulled his overalls on over his pajamas. He leaned 
heavily on his cane, shaking his head as Mark and I came running up. 

“The scarecrows—!” I exclaimed breathlessly. 

“They’re walking!” Mark cried. “Stanley—he—” 



“Did you get Stanley upset?” Grandpa Kurt asked, his eyes wide with fear. 
“Who got Stanley upset? He promised us he wouldn’t do it again! He promised 
—if we didn’t upset him.” 

“It was an accident!” I told him. “We didn’t mean to. Really!” 

“We’ve worked so hard to keep Stanley happy,” Grandma Miriam said 
sadly. She chewed her lower lip. “So hard...” 

“I didn’t think he’d do it,” Grandpa Kurt said, his eyes on the cornfields. “I 
thought we convinced him it was too dangerous.” 

“Why are you dressed like that?” Grandma Miriam asked Mark. 

I was so frightened and upset, I had completely forgotten that Mark was 
still dressed as a scarecrow. 

“Mark, did you dress like that to scare Stanley?” Grandma Miriam 
demanded. 

“No!” Mark cried. “It was supposed to be a joke! Just a joke!” 

“We were trying to scare Sticks,” I told them. “But when Stanley saw Mark, 
he...” 

My voice trailed off as I saw the dark figures step out of the cornfields. 

In the silvery moonlight, I saw Stanley and Sticks. They were running hard, 
leaning forward as they ran. Stanley held the book in front of him. His shoes 
slipped and slid over the wet grass. 

Behind them came the scarecrows. They were moving awkwardly, 
staggering, lurching silently forward. 

Their straw arms stretched straight forward, as if reaching to grab Stanley 
and Sticks. Their round, black eyes glowed blankly in the moonlight. 

Staggering, tumbling, falling, they came after Stanley and Sticks. A dozen 
twisted figures in black coats and hats. Leaving clumps of straw as they pulled 
themselves forward. 

Grandma Miriam grabbed my arm and squeezed it in terror. Her hand was 
as cold as ice. 

We watched Stanley fall, then scramble to his feet. Sticks helped pull him 
up, and the two of them continued to run toward us in terror. 

The silent scarecrows lurched and staggered closer. Closer. 

“Help us— please !” Stanley called to us. 

“What can we do?” I heard Grandpa Kurt mutter sadly. 



26 


The four of us huddled close together, staring in helpless horror as the 
scarecrows made their way, chasing Stanley and Sticks across the moonlit lawn. 

Grandma Miriam held on to my arm. Grandpa Kurt leaned heavily, 
squeezing the handle of his cane. 

“They won’t obey me!” Stanley screamed breathlessly. He stopped in front 
of us, holding the book in one hand. 

His chest was heaving up and down as he struggled to catch his breath. 
Despite the coolness of the night, sweat poured down his forehead. 

“They won’t obey me! They must obey me! The book says so!” Stanley 
cried, frantically waving the book in the air. 

Sticks stopped beside his father. He turned to watch the scarecrows 
approach. “What are you going to do?” he asked his father. “You have to do 
something!” 

“They’re alive!” Stanley shrieked. “Alive!” 

“What does the book say?” Grandpa Kurt demanded. 

“They’re alive! They’re all alive!” Stanley repeated, his eyes wild with 
fright. 

“Stanley—listen to me!” Grandpa Kurt yelled. He grabbed Stanley by the 
shoulders and spun him around to face him. “Stanley—what does the book say 
to do? How do you get them in control?” 

“Alive,” Stanley murmured, his eyes rolling in his head. “They’re all alive.” 

“Stanley—what does the book say to do?” Grandpa Kurt demanded once 
again. 

“I—I don’t know,” Stanley replied. 

We turned back to the scarecrows. They were moving closer. Spreading out. 
Forming a line as they staggered toward us. Their arms reached forward 
menacingly, as if preparing to grab us. 

Clumps of straw fell from their sleeves. Straw spilled from their coats. 

But they continued to lurch toward us. Closer. Closer. 

The black, painted eyes stared straight ahead. They leered at us with their 
ugly, painted mouths. 

“Stop!” Stanley screamed, raising the book high over his head. “I command 



you to stop!” 

The scarecrows lurched slowly, steadily forward. 

“Stop!” Stanley shrieked in a high, frightened voice. “I brought you to life! 
You are mine! Mine! I command you! I command you to stop!” 

The blank eyes stared straight at us. The arms reached stiffly forward. The 
scarecrows pulled themselves closer. Closer. 

“Stop! I said stop!” Stanley screeched. 

Mark edged closer to me. Behind his burlap mask I could see his eyes. 
Terrified eyes. 

Ignoring Stanley’s frightened pleas, the scarecrows dragged themselves 
closer. Closer. 

And then I did something that changed the whole night. 

I sneezed. 



27 


Mark was so startled by my sudden, loud sneeze that he let out a short cry and 
jumped away from me. 

To my amazement, the scarecrows all stopped moving forward—and 
jumped back, too. 

“Whoa!” I cried. “What’s going on here?” 

The scarecrows all seemed to have trained their painted eyes on Mark. 

“Mark—quick—raise your right hand!” I cried. 

Mark gazed at me through the burlap bag. I could see confusion in his eyes. 

But he obediently raised his right hand high over his head. 

And the scarecrows all raised their right hands! 

“Mark—they’re imitating you!” Grandma Miriam cried. 

Mark raised both hands in the air. 

The scarecrows copied him again. I heard the scratch of straw as they lifted 
both arms. 

Mark tilted his head to the left. The scarecrows tilted their heads to the left. 

Mark dropped to his knees. The scarecrows sank in their straw, slaves to my 
brother’s every move. 

“They—they think you’re one of them,” Grandpa Kurt whispered. 

“They think you’re their leader !” Stanley cried, staring wide-eyed at the 
scarecrows slumped on the ground. 

“But how do I make them go back to their poles?” Mark demanded 
excitedly. “How do I make them go back to being scarecrows?” 

“Dad—find the right chant!” Sticks yelled. “Find the right words! Make 
them sleep again!” 

Stanley scratched his short, dark hair. “I—I’m too scared!” he confessed 
sadly. 

And then I had an idea. 

“Mark—” I whispered, leaning close to him. “Pull off your head.” 

“Huh?” He gazed at me through the burlap mask. 

“Pull off your scarecrow head,” I urged him, still whispering. 

“But why?” Mark demanded. He waved his hands in the air. The 



scarecrows obediently waved their straw hands in the air. 

Everyone was staring at me, eager to hear my explanation. 

“If you pull off your scarecrow head,” I told Mark, “then they will pull off 
their heads. And they’ll die.” 

Mark hesitated. “Huh? You think so?” 

“It’s worth a try,” Grandpa Kurt urged. 

“Go ahead, Mark. Hurry!” Sticks cried. 

Mark hesitated for a second. Then he stepped forward, just inches from the 
dark-coated scarecrows. 

“Hurry!” Sticks urged him. 

Mark gripped the top of the burlap bag with both hands. “I sure hope this 
works,” he murmured. Then he gave the bag a hard tug and pulled it off. 



28 


The scarecrows stopped moving. They stood still as statues as they watched 
Mark pull off his scarecrow head. 

Mark stared back at them, holding the burlap bag between his hands. His 
hair was matted wetly to his forehead. He was dripping with sweat. 

The scarecrows hesitated for a moment more. 

A long, silent moment. 

I held my breath. My heart was pounding. 

Then I let out a happy cry as the scarecrows all reached up with their straw 
hands—and pulled off their heads! 

The dark hats and burlap heads fell silently to the grass. 

None of us moved. We were waiting for the scarecrows to fall. 

Waiting for the headless scarecrows to collapse and fall. 

But they didn’t go down. 

Instead, they reached out their arms and moved stiffly, menacingly forward. 

“They—they’re coming to get us!” Stanley cried in a high, trembling voice. 

“Mark —do something!” I shouted, shoving him forward. “Make them stand 
on one foot or hop up and down. Stop them!” 

The headless figures dragged themselves toward us, arms outstretched. 

Mark stepped forward. He raised both hands over his head. 

The scarecrows didn’t stop, didn’t copy him. 

“Hey—hands up!” Mark shouted desperately. He waved his hands above 
his head. 

The scarecrows edged forward, silently, steadily. 

“Th-they’re not doing it!” Mark wailed. “They’re not following me!” 

“You don’t look like a scarecrow anymore,” Grandma Miriam added. “They 
don’t think you’re their leader.” 

Closer they came, staggering blindly. Closer. 

They formed a tight circle around us. 

A scarecrow brushed its straw hand against my cheek. 

I uttered a terrified cry. “Noooooo!” 

It reached for my throat, the dry straw scratching me, scratching my face, 



scratching, scratching. 

The headless scarecrows swarmed over Mark. He thrashed and kicked. But 
they were smothering him, forcing him to the ground. 

My grandparents cried out helplessly as the dark-coated figures surrounded 
them. Stanley let out a silent gasp. 

“Sticks—help me!” I shrieked as the straw hands wrapped around my neck. 
“Sticks? Sticks?” 

I glanced frantically around. 

“Sticks? Help me! Please! Where are you?” 

Then I realized to my horror that Sticks was gone. 



29 


“Sticks?” I let out a final muffled cry. 

The straw hands wrapped around my throat. The scarecrow rolled over me. 
My face was pressed into the dry straw of its chest. 

I tried to squirm free. But it held on, surrounded me, choked me. 

The straw smelled sour. Decayed. I felt sick. A wave of nausea swept over 
me. 

“Let go! Let go!” I heard Stanley pleading. 

The scarecrow was surprisingly strong. It wrapped its arms around me 
tightly, smothering me in the disgusting straw. 

I made one last attempt to pull free. Struggling with all my might, I raised 
my head. 

And saw two balls of fire. Orange streaks of light. 

Floating closer. 

And in the orange light, I saw Sticks’ face, hard and determined. 

I gave another hard tug. And tumbled backwards. 

“Sticks!” I cried. 

He was carrying two blazing torches. The torches from the barn, I realized. 
“I was saving these just in case!” Sticks called. 

The scarecrows seemed to sense danger. 

They let go of us, tried to scramble away. 

But Sticks moved quickly. 

He swept the two torches, swinging them like baseball bats. 

A scarecrow caught fire. Then another. 

Sticks made another wide swing. 

The fire crackled, a streak of orange against the darkness. 

The dry straw burst into flame. The old coats burned quickly. 

The scarecrows twisted and writhed as the bright flames danced over them. 
They sank to their backs on the ground. Burning. Burning so brightly, so silently, 
so fast. 

I took a step back, staring in horror and fascination. 

Grandpa Kurt had his arm around Grandma Miriam. They leaned close 



together, their faces reflecting the flickering flames. 

Stanley stood tensely, his eyes wide. He hugged the book tightly to his 
chest. He was murmuring to himself, but I couldn’t make out the words. 

Mark and I stood beside Sticks, who held a torch in each hand, watching 
with narrowed eyes as the scarecrows burned. 

In seconds, there was nothing left but clumps of dark ashes on the ground. 

“It’s over,” Grandma Miriam murmured softly, gratefully. 

“Never again,” I heard Stanley mutter. 

The house was quiet the next afternoon. 

Mark was out on the screen porch, lying in the hammock, reading a stack of 
comic books. Grandpa Kurt and Grandma Miriam had gone in for their 
afternoon nap. 

Sticks had driven into town to pick up the mail. 

Stanley sat at the kitchen table, reading his superstition book. His finger 
moved over the page as he muttered the words aloud in a low voice. 

“Never again,” he had repeated at lunch. “I’ve learned my lesson about this 
book. I’ll never try to bring any scarecrows to life again. I won’t even read the 
part about scarecrows!” 

We were all glad to hear that. 

So now, on this lazy, peaceful afternoon, Stanley sat at the table, quietly 
reading some chapter of the big book. 

And I sat alone on the couch in the living room, hearing Stanley’s gentle 
murmurings from the kitchen, thinking about the night before. 

It felt good to have a quiet afternoon, to be all alone to think about what had 
happened. 

All alone... 

The only one in the room... 

The only one to hear Stanley’s low mumbling as he read the book. 

The only one to see the gigantic stuffed brown bear blink its eyes. 

The only one to see the bear lick its lips, step off its platform, snarl and paw 
the air with its enormous claws. 

The only one to hear its stomach growl as it stared down at me. 

The only one to see the hungry look on its face as it magically came out of 
its long hibernation. 

“Stanley?” I called in a tiny, high voice. “Stanley? What chapter have you 
been reading?” 
